Montana, session 2025, SB558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of [sections 1 through 44] and [sections 45
through 89], unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "800 service" means any telecommunications service that allows a caller to dial a toll-free
number without incurring a charge for the call.
(2) "900 service" means an inbound toll telecommunications service purchased by a subscriber
that allows the subscriber's customers to call in to the subscriber's prerecorded announcement or live service. A
900 service does not include the charge for the collection of services provided by the seller of the
telecommunications services to the subscriber, service, or product sold by the subscriber to the subscriber's
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
customer.
(3) "Agricultural purposes" means the producing, raising, growing, or harvesting of food or fiber on
agricultural land, including dairy products, livestock, and crops. The term includes services of custom
harvesters, chemical applicators, fertilizer spreaders, hay grinders, and cultivators and the harvesting of timber
on land within the state.
(4) "Ancillary service" means a service that is associated with or incidental to the provision of
telecommunications services, including detailed telecommunications billing, directory assistance, vertical
service, and voice mail service.
(5) "Bullion" means any bar, ingot, or commemorative medallion of gold, silver, platinum,
palladium, or a combination of these metals for which the value of the metal depends on its content and not the
form.
(6) "Business" means any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in by a
person with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect.
(7) (a) "Call center" means a physical location where telephone calls are placed or received for the
purpose of making sales, marketing, customer service, or technical support.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) a location where telephone calls are primarily placed to or received from the same taxpayer, or
affiliates of the same taxpayer, that owns or operates the location; or
(ii) an insurance, real estate, or brokerage company.
(8) "Campground" means any property or premise kept, used, maintained, advertised or held out
to the public to be a place where sites are available for the placing of tents, campers, trailers, mobile homes or
other mobile accommodations to transient guests.
(9) (a) "Candy" means any preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in
combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces.
(b) The term does not include any preparation containing flour or a product requiring refrigeration.
(10) "Coin" or "currency" means any coins or currency made of gold, silver, or other metal or paper
that is or has been used as legal tender.
(11) "Component member" has the meaning provided in 26 U.S.C. 1563(b) of the Internal Revenue
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
Code.
(12) (a) "Conference bridging service" means an ancillary service that links two or more participants
of an audio or video conference call and may include the provision of a telephone number.
(b) The term does not include the telecommunications service used to reach the conference
bridge.
(13) "Controlled group" means any corporations or other entities eligible to file a consolidated
federal income tax return under the Internal Revenue Code or entitled to only a single surtax exemption for
federal corporate income tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code and includes a controlled group of
corporations as defined in 26 U.S.C. 1563. A controlled group also consists of any subchapter S. corporation,
limited liability company, limited liability partnership, general partnership, or limited partnership with at least
80% common ownership as if the entity was converted to or taxed as a subchapter C. corporation under the
Internal Revenue Code.
(14) "De minimis" means the retailer's purchase price or gross receipts of taxable products is 10%
or less of the total purchase price or gross receipts of the bundled products over the full term of a service
contract. The determination must be made using either purchase price or gross receipts and not a combination
of the two.
(15) (a) "Delivery charge" means a charge by the retailer for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of tangible personal property, a product transferred electronically, or services,
including transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating, and packing.
(b) The term does not include postage for direct mail.
(16) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(17) "Detailed telecommunications billing service" means an ancillary service of separately stating
information pertaining to individual calls on a customer's billing statement.
(18) (a) "Direct mail" means any printed material delivered or distributed by United States mail or
other delivery service to a mass audience or to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser if the cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipients. The term includes
tangible personal property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct mail seller for inclusion in
the package containing the printed material.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(b) The term does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to a single address.
(19) "Direct mail service" means any business that prepares direct mail.
(20) "Directory assistance" means an ancillary service of providing telephone number information or
address information.
(21) "Domesticated fur-bearing animal" means a fur-bearing animal pen bred for more than two
generations or a fur-bearing animal purchased from a breeder outside the state and brought into the state. All
other fur-bearing animals are wild fur-bearing animals.
(22) "Financial institution" means:
(a) any banking institution, production credit association, or savings and loan association
organized under the laws of the United States and located or doing business in this state;
(b) any bank, savings and loan association, mutual saving bank, or trust company, organized
under the laws of this state or of any other state, district, territory, or country, doing business within this state;
(c) any person in the business of buying loans, notes, or other evidences of debt, except a person
registered as a broker-dealer; and
(d) a person in the business of making installment repayment and open-end loans that may be
unsecured or secured by real or personal property, that are in an aggregate amount exceeding $500, that are
repaid in two or more installment payments or one lump sum payment extending over a time exceeding 30 days
from the day the loan was made except when the loan is made by the person selling the property, incidental to
the sale of the property and when the seller is primarily in the business of selling the real or personal property
except when the loan is made to a related corporation and the primary business of the related corporation is the
production and sale of tangible personal property or when the loan is made in the form of an advance to secure
the production of equipment to be obtained by the lender or to finance a joint venture between the lender and
others that has been formed to produce and sell tangible personal property.
(23) "Fixed wireless service" means a telecommunications service that provides radio
communication between fixed points.
(24) (a) "Food" or "food ingredient" means any substance, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid,
frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that is sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and is consumed for its taste
or nutritional value.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(b) The term does not include alcoholic beverages, candy, soft drinks, tobacco, or prepared food.
(25) "Gross receipts" has the meaning provided in [section 2].
(26) (a) "Interest" means compensation allowed by law for the use, forbearance, or detention of
money or its equivalent, including but not limited to points, loan origination fees, credit service or carrying
charges, charges for unanticipated late payments, and any other charges, direct or indirect, as an incident to or
as a condition of the extension of credit.
(b) The term does not include charges made by a third party.
(27) "International telecommunications service" means a telecommunications service that originates
or terminates in the United States or a United States territory or possession and terminates or originates
outside of the United States or a United States territory or possession, respectively.
(28) "Interstate telecommunications service" means a telecommunications service that originates in
one United States state or a United States territory or possession and terminates in a different United States
state or United States territory or possession.
(29) “Intrastate telecommunications service" means a telecommunications service that originates in
one United States state or a United States territory or possession and terminates in the same United States
state or United States territory or possession.
(30) (a) "Lease" or "rental" means any transfer of possession or control of tangible personal
property or any product transferred electronically for a fixed or indeterminate term for consideration. A lease or
rental may include a future option to purchase or extend.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) a transfer of possession or control of property under a security agreement or deferred payment
plan that requires the transfer of title on completion of the required payments;
(ii) a transfer of possession or control of property under an agreement that requires the transfer of
title on completion of required payments and payment of an option price does not exceed the greater of $100 or
1% of the total required payments; or
(iii) providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period
of time as long as the operator is necessary for the equipment to perform as designed. The operator shall do
more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(31) "Lodging establishment" means any building, structure, property or premise kept, used,
maintained, advertised or held out to the public to be a place where sleeping accommodations are furnished to
transient guests.
(32) "Mobile wireless service" means a telecommunications service that is transmitted, conveyed, or
routed regardless of the technology used, for which either the origination point or termination point, or both, of
the transmission, conveyance, or routing are not fixed.
(33) "Motorboat" has the meaning provided in 61-1-101.
(34) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in 61-1-101.
(35) "Paging service" means a telecommunications service that provides transmission of coded
radio signals for the purpose of activation of specific pages. The transmission may include either messages or
sounds, or both.
(36) "Pawnbroker" means a person who is engaged in the business of lending money and who
accepts the possession of tangible personal property or a product transferred electronically as security for the
loan.
(37) "Person" means an individual, estate, trust, fiduciary, corporation, partnership, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, the state of Montana and its political subdivisions, or any other legal
entity.
(38) "Pesticide" means:
(a) any substance or mixture of substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or
mitigating pests;
(b) any substance or mixture of substances intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or
desiccant; or
(c) any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as a spray adjuvant.
(39) "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access exclusively telecommunications services
that must be paid for in advance and that enables the origination of calls using an access number or
authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars
of which the number declines with use in a known amount.
(40) "Prepaid wireless calling service" means a telecommunications service that provides the right
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
to utilize mobile wireless service as well as other nontelecommunications services, including the download of
digital products delivered electronically, content, and ancillary services that must be paid for in advance and
that are sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount.
(41) (a) "Prepared food" means food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller, two or more food
ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item, or food sold with eating utensils provided
by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller; or
(ii) eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the
consumer to prevent food borne illnesses as recommended by the food and drug administration in chapter 3,
part 401.11 of its food code.
(42) "Private communication service" means a telecommunications service that entitles the
customer to exclusive or priority use of a communications channel or group of channels between or among
termination points, regardless of the manner in which the channel or channels are connected, and includes
switching capacity, extension lines, stations, and any other associated services that are provided in connection
with the use of the channel or channels.
(43) (a) "Product transferred electronically" means any product obtained by the purchaser by means
other than tangible storage media.
(b) A product transferred electronically does not include any intangible products, such as a patent,
stock, bond, goodwill, trademark, franchise, or copyright.
(44) "Professional employer organization" means a firm that:
(a) enters into a contractual agreement with a client company to create a coemployment
relationship for the provision of payroll, benefits, and other human resources functions;
(b) covers at least 75% of the client company's full-time or full-time equivalent employees
domiciled in Montana; and
(c) maintains separate books and records of account for each client company.
(45) "Raw materials" means containers, labels, cartons, packing cases, wrapping paper, twine, glue,
bags, bottles, shipping cases, wrapping film, strapping, rope, tape, cans, lids, boxes, pads, dividers,
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
stockinettes, casings, and similar articles and receptacles used by manufacturers, processors, or fabricators.
(46) "Related corporation" means a corporation associated with another as its parent or subsidiary,
or in a brother-sister relation.
(47) "Relief agency" means the state, a county, a municipality, a consolidated city-county
government, or any agency engaged in actual relief work.
(48) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail" means any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other than for
resale, sublease, or subrent.
(49) (a) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling:
(i) tangible goods, wares, or merchandise at retail;
(ii) gas, electricity, water, and communication service;
(iii) tickets or admissions to places of amusement and athletic events as provided in [sections 1
through 44];
(iv) retail products transferred electronically; or
(v) services not exempt under [section 17].
(b) The term does not include the isolated or occasional sale of tangible personal property or a
product transferred electronically at retail by a person who does not hold oneself out to engage in the business
of selling tangible personal property or products transferred electronically at retail.
(50) "Sale" means the transfer of tangible personal property or a product transferred electronically
for consideration or the performance of a service for consideration.
(51) (a) "Sectional home" means a home prebuilt in whole or in part for the purpose of permanent
placement on a foundation.
(b) The term does not include a mobile home or a manufactured home as defined in 15-1-101.
(52) (a) "Service" means an activity engaged in for another person for a fee, retainer, commission,
or other monetary charge that involves predominantly the performance of a service as distinguished from
selling property. In determining what is a service, the intended use, principal objective, or ultimate objective of
the contracting parties are not controlling.
(b) The term does not include services rendered by an employee for the employer.
(53) "Shoppers guide" means an advertising publication with advertisements solicited from the
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
general public and whose publications are for free distribution to the general public and are published regularly
at least once a month, consisting of printed sheets containing advertising, bearing a date of issue, and devoted
to advertising of general interest.
(54) (a) "Soft drink" means any nonalcoholic beverage that contains natural or artificial sweeteners.
(b) The term does not include a beverage that contains:
(i) milk or milk products;
(ii) soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes; or
(iii) more than 50% vegetable juice or fruit juice by volume.
(55) "Stocks of merchandise" means personal property that is held primarily for sale and not subject
to annual depreciation.
(56) "Tangible personal property" means personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured,
felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. The term includes electricity, water,
gas, steam, and prewritten computer software.
(57) (a) "Telecommunications service" means the electronic transmission, conveyance, or routing of
voice, data, audio, video, or any other information or signals to a point, or between or among points. The term
includes:
(i) transmission, conveyance, or routing in which computer processing applications are used to act
on the form, code, or protocol of the content for purposes of transmission, conveyance, or routing without
regard to whether the service is referred to as voice over internet protocol services or is classified by the federal
communications commission as enhanced or value-added;
(ii) 800 service;
(iii) 900 service;
(iv) fixed wireless service;
(v) mobile wireless service;
(vi) paging service;
(vii) prepaid calling service;
(viii) prepaid wireless calling service;
(ix) private communication service; and
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(x) value-added non-voice data service.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) data processing and information services that allow data to be generated, acquired, stored,
processed, or retrieved and delivered by an electronic transmission to a purchaser for which the purchaser's
primary purpose for the underlying transaction is the processed data or information;
(ii) installation or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a customer's premises;
(iii) tangible personal property;
(iv) advertising, including directory advertising;
(v) billing and collection services provided to third parties;
(vi) internet access service;
(vii) radio and television audio and video programming services, regardless of the medium,
including the furnishing of transmission, conveyance and routing of the services by the programming service
provider. Radio and television audio and video programming services include but are not limited to cable
service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522(6) and audio and video programming services delivered by commercial
mobile radio service providers as defined in 47 CFR 20.3;
(viii) ancillary services; or
(ix) digital products delivered electronically, including but not limited to software, music, video,
reading materials, or ring tones.
(58) "Transient guest" means a person who resides in a lodging establishment or campground less
than 30 consecutive days.
(59) "Value-added non-voice data service" means a service that otherwise meets the definition of
telecommunications services in which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, content,
code, or protocol of the information or data primarily for a purpose other than transmission, conveyance, or
routing.
(60) "Vertical service" means an ancillary service that is offered in connection with one or more
telecommunications services that offers advanced calling features that allow customers to identify callers and to
manage multiple calls and call connections, including conference bridging services.
(61) (a) "Voice mail service" means an ancillary service that enables the customer to store, send, or
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
receive recorded messages.
(b) The term does not include any vertical services that the customer may be required to have in
order to utilize the voice mail service.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Determining gross receipts -- conditional sales. (1) Gross receipts
are the total amount of consideration, including cash, credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal
property, a product transferred electronically, or services are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money or
otherwise, without deduction for:
(a) the retailer's costs of the property or services sold;
(b) the cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, costs of transportation to the
retailer, taxes imposed on the retailer, and other expenses of the retailer; or
(c) charges by the retailer for any services necessary to complete the sale, whether or not
separately stated, including delivery charges.
(2) (a) Gross receipts include consideration received by the retailer from a third party if:
(i) the retailer actually receives consideration from a party other than the purchaser and the
consideration is directly related to a price reduction or discount on the sale;
(ii) the retailer has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the purchaser;
(iii) the amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determined by the retailer
at the time of the sale of the item to the purchaser; and
(iv) one of the following criteria is met:
(A) the purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other documentation to the retailer to claim a
price reduction or discount for which the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized, distributed, or
granted by a third party with the understanding that the third party will reimburse any retailer to whom the
coupon, certificate, or documentation is presented;
(B) the purchaser is a member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or discount.
A preferred customer card that is available to any patron does not constitute membership in a group such as
this.
(C) the price reduction or discount is identified as a third-party price reduction or discount on the
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
invoice received by the purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the
purchaser.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the purchaser is the end consumer.
(3) Gross receipts do not include:
(a) fees or other interest imposed by a retailer for late charges on overdue accounts, no account,
or nonsufficient funds checks;
(b) the sales price of property returned by customers if the full sale price is refunded in cash or
credit;
(c) tangible personal property or a product transferred electronically if taken in trade as a credit or
partial payment for a retail sale taxable under [sections 1 through 44], and the tangible personal property or
product transferred electronically taken in trade is subject to the sales tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44]
when sold;
(d) gross receipts received by a retailer from a manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor pursuant to
a written contract between the retailer and the manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor that requires the retailer
to display the manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor's product or signage in a specified manner or location;
(e) a discount or deferred payment received by a retailer from a distributor, wholesaler, or
manufacturer for purchasing a product for sale at retail;
(f) discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third party that are
allowed by a retailer and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
(g) the charge of interest, except for interest charged by a pawnbroker;
(h) any fee or commission received by a retailer for arranging or assisting in the arrangement of a
loan for a customer to pay for tangible personal property or a product transferred electronically sold by the
retailer;
(i) interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of tangible personal
property, a product transferred electronically, or services, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill
of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser; or
(j) any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice,
bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser.
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(4) For the purposes of the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44], on any sale made under a
conditional sales contract, or under other forms of sale for which the payment of the principal sum is extended
over a period longer than 60 days from the date of sale, only the portion of the sale amount that has actually
been received in cash by the retailer during each reporting period is subject to the tax.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Tax on sale of tangible personal property. For the privilege of
engaging in business as a retailer, there is a tax of 4% on the gross receipts of all sales of tangible personal
property consisting of goods, wares, or merchandise sold at retail in the state to consumers or users unless
specifically exempt under [sections 1 through 44].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Tax on products transferred electronically. (1) There is a tax imposed
on the gross receipts of all sales, leases, or rentals of a product transferred electronically. The rate of the tax is
the same as the rate imposed on sales of tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].
(2) The tax is imposed if:
(a) the sale is to an end user;
(b) the sale is to a person who is not an end user, unless otherwise exempted by [sections 1
through 44];
(c) the seller grants the right of permanent or less than permanent use of the products transferred
electronically; or
(d) the sale is conditioned or not conditioned on continued payment.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "end user" does not include any person who received
by contract any product transferred electronically for further commercial broadcast, rebroadcast, transmission,
retransmission, licensing, relicensing, distribution, redistribution, or exhibition of the product, in whole or in part,
to another person.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "permanent use" means perpetual or for an indefinite
or unspecified length of time.
(5) The sale of a digital code that may be utilized to obtain a product transferred electronically is
taxed in the same manner as the product transferred electronically. A digital code is a code that permits a
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
purchaser to obtain at a later date a product transferred electronically.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Tax on receipts from business services. (1) There is a tax imposed on
the gross receipts of any business in which a service is rendered. The rate of the tax is the same as the rate
imposed on sales of tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].
(2) All services defined in [section 1] are taxable, unless the service is specifically exempt from the
provisions of [sections 1 through 44].
(3) Taxable services include but are not limited to the following services and services provided by:
(a) abstracters;
(b) accountants;
(c) amusement and recreation services, including airplane, helicopter, balloon, dirigible, and blimp
rides for amusement or sightseeing;
(d) ancillary services;
(e) animal grooming services;
(f) architects, engineers, or surveyors, except that services purchased by an architect, engineer,
or surveyor on behalf of a client in the performance of a contractor for the client are considered purchases for
resale purposes;
(g) automotive repair and services, garage and service stations, tire recapping, and parking;
(h) barbers and beauty shops;
(i) blacksmith shops;
(j) cable television;
(k) car washing;
(l) coating, engraving, and allied services;
(m) communication services;
(n) construction, electrical, and industrial services;
(o) consumer credit reporting agencies, mercantile reporting agencies, and adjustment and
collection agencies;
(p) dry cleaning, garment alteration, cleaning and pressing, and laundry, linen and towel supply;
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(q) dyeing;
(r) exterminators;
(s) floor laying and other floor work;
(t) funeral service and cremation service, except that purchases of goods or services with money
advanced as an accommodation and fees paid or donated for religious ceremonies are not includable in gross
receipts for funeral services;
(u) heavy equipment and transport operations, train crew operations, crane operations, drillers,
and blasters;
(v) hotels, motels, tourist courts, rooming and boarding houses, and campgrounds and
recreational vehicle parks subject to [section 11];
(w) janitorial services and supplies;
(x) lawn and garden, landscape, and horticultural services, except that chemicals purchased and
used for these services are considered purchases for resale;
(y) legal services;
(z) livestock slaughtering services;
(aa) loan brokers;
(bb) membership or entrance fees for the use of a facility or for the right to purchase tangible
personal property, any product transferred electronically, or services;
(cc) mining, including coal mining, metal mining services, and nonmetallic minerals services;
(dd) oil and gas field services;
(ee) photography and photo developing and enlarging;
(ff) printing trade services and printing press operators;
(gg) real estate agents and managers, appraiser services, and title services;
(hh) rentals of tangible personal property, except leases of tangible personal property between one
telephone company and another telephone company, motor vehicles as defined in 61-1-101 leased under a
single contract for more than 30 days, and mobile homes;
(ii) research, management, and related services, except noncommercial research organizations;
(jj) solid waste collection and disposal;
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(kk) specialty cleaners;
(ll) utility services, such as gas, electricity, or water services, including those provided by a local
government;
(mm) welding, locksmith, and repair services, except repair services for farm machinery, attachment
units, and irrigation equipment used exclusively for agricultural purposes; and
(nn) professional employer organization services. A professional employer organization may deduct
from its taxable gross receipts its actual disbursements, including appropriate reserves, for the wages, salaries,
payroll taxes, payroll deductions, workers' compensation costs, insurance premiums, welfare benefits,
retirement benefits, and other employee benefits of its coemployees. The exemption does not apply to
temporary help services or to any work arrangement in which a firm temporarily assigns employees of the firm
to support or supplement a client company's regular work force in special situations, such as employee
absences, temporary skill shortages, seasonal workloads, and special assignments or projects.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Retailer engaged in business of selling tangible personal property,
services, and products transferred electronically for use in state. (1) A retailer is engaged in the business
of selling tangible personal property, services, or products transferred electronically for use in this state if:
(a) (i) the retailer holds a substantial ownership interest in, or is owned in whole or in substantial
part by, a retailer maintaining a place of business within this state; and
(ii) the retailer sells the same or a substantially similar line of products as the related retailer in this
state and does so under the same or a substantially similar business name, or the in-state facility or in-state
employee of the related retailer is used to advertise, promote, or facilitate sales by the retailer to a consumer; or
(b) the retailer holds a substantial ownership interest in, or is owned in whole or in substantial part
by, a business that maintains a distribution house, sales house, warehouse, or similar place of business in this
state that delivers property sold by the retailer to consumers.
(2) The processing of orders electronically, including by facsimile, telephone, the internet, or other
electronic ordering process, does not relieve the retailer of responsibility for collection of the tax from the
purchaser if the retailer is doing business in this state.
(3) A retailer that is part of a controlled group with a component member that is a retailer engaged
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
in business in this state as described in this section is presumed to be a retailer engaged in business in this
state. This presumption may be rebutted by evidence that during the calendar year at issue the component
member that is a retailer engaged in business in this state did not engage in any of the activities described in
this section on behalf of the retailer.
(4) A retailer making sales of tangible personal property to purchasers in this state by mail,
telephone, the internet, or other media that has a contractual relationship with an entity to provide and perform
installation, maintenance, or repair services for the retailer's purchasers within this state is considered to be a
retailer under the provisions of this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Ownership" means both direct ownership and indirect ownership through a parent, subsidiary,
or affiliate.
(b) "Substantial ownership interest" means an interest in an entity that is not less than the degree
of ownership of equity interest in an entity that is specified by 15 U.S.C. 78p with respect to a person other than
a director or officer.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Retail sales include auctions and consignments -- deduction
allowed. (1) All auction sales and consignment sales of tangible personal property, any product transferred
electronically, and services are sales at retail. The auction clerk shall file the return and remit the tax imposed
by [sections 1 through 44] on the gross receipts from each auction after applying the deduction provided for in
subsection (3).
(2) The auctioneer is responsible for the payment of the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44] if
the auction clerk is an employee of the auctioneer or if the auction clerk does not have a permit as required by
[sections 1 through 44]. In addition to any other information required to be kept by [sections 1 through 44], each
auction clerk shall keep records that identify the owner of the property sold at auction and the auctioneer who
conducts the sale of the property.
(3) In determining the amount of tax due under [sections 1 through 44], auctioneers may deduct
from gross receipts amounts that represent direct expense charges for clients for tangible personal property,
any product transferred electronically, or services purchased by the auctioneer on behalf of a client. The sale of
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
the property or service to the auctioneer is not a sale for resale if this deduction is taken. This deduction may
only be taken if the amount to be deducted represents an expense specifically incurred for a particular client
and the amount is itemized and paid from the client's auction proceeds by the auctioneer or closing agent. The
deduction is disallowed if the auctioneer receives any profit or remuneration directly or indirectly from the
client's expense.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Sales of sectional homes subject to tax. (1) Sales of sectional homes
are subject to the tax provided for in [section 3].
(2) The tax is based on the fair market value of the raw materials used to construct the home.

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Tax on intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications
services -- exemptions -- bundled transactions. (1) Except as provided in [section 10] and subsection (2) of
this section, there is imposed a tax on the gross receipts from providing any intrastate, interstate, or
international telecommunications service that originates or terminates in this state and that is billed or charged
to a service address in this state, or that both originates and terminates in this state. The rate of the tax is the
same as the rate imposed on sales of tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].
(2) The tax imposed by this section does not apply to:
(a) an 800 or 800-type service unless the service both originates and terminates in this state;
(b) the sale of a telecommunication service to a provider of telecommunication services, including
access service, for use in providing a telecommunication service; or
(c) the sale of interstate telecommunication service provided to a call center that has been certified
by the department to meet the definition of call center in [section 1] if the call center has provided to the
telecommunications service provider an exemption certificate issued by the department indicating that it meets
the definition. If a call center uses an exemption certificate to purchase services not meeting the definition of
[section 1], the call center is liable for the applicable tax, penalty, and interest.
(3) If a bundled transaction includes telecommunications services, ancillary services, internet
access, or audio or video programming services and the charges are attributable to retail sales that are taxable
and retail sales that are nontaxable, the portion of the price attributable to the nontaxable retail sales is subject
- 18 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
to tax unless the provider can identify the nontaxable portion by reasonable and verifiable standards from its
books and records kept in the regular course of business.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) (i) "Bundled transaction" means the retail sale of two or more distinct and identifiable products
sold for one nonitemized price.
(ii) The term does not include:
(A) a transaction that includes the retail sale of real property or services to real property;
(B) a transaction that includes the retail sale of any products in which the gross receipts vary or are
negotiable, based on the selection by the purchaser of the products included in the transaction;
(C) a transaction that includes the retail sale of tangible personal property and a service for which
the tangible personal property is essential to the use of the service, and is provided exclusively in connection
with the service, and the true object of the transaction is the service;
(D) a transaction that includes the retail sale of any product transferred electronically and a service
for which the product transferred electronically is essential to the use of the service, and is provided exclusively
in connection with the service, and the true object of the transaction is the service;
(E) a transaction that includes the retail sale of services for which one service is provided that is
essential to the use or receipt of a second service and the first service is provided exclusively in connection with
the second service and the true object of the transaction is the second service;
(F) a transaction that includes the retail sale of taxable products and nontaxable products and the
purchase price or gross receipts of the taxable products is de minimis; or
(G) a transaction that includes the retail sale of exempt tangible personal property and taxable
tangible personal property for which:
(I) the transaction includes food and food ingredients, drugs, durable medical equipment, mobility
enhancing equipment, or prosthetic devices, or over-the-counter drugs or medical supplies; and
(II) the retailer's purchase price or gross receipts of the taxable tangible personal property is 50%
or less of the total purchase price or gross receipts of the bundled tangible personal property. A retailer may not
use a combination of the purchase price and gross receipts of the tangible personal property when making the
50% determination for a transaction.
- 19 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(b) "Distinct and identifiable products" do not include:
(i) packaging, including containers, boxes, sacks, bags, bottles, wrapping, labels, tags, and
instruction guides that accompany the retail sale of the product and are incidental or immaterial to the retail
sale;
(ii) a product provided free of charge with the required purchase of another product if the sales
price of the product purchased does not vary depending on the inclusion of the product provided free of charge;
or
(iii) items included in gross receipts.
(c) "One nonitemized price" does not include a price that is separately identified by product on
binding sales or other supporting sales-related documentation made available to the customer in paper or
electronic form, including an invoice, bill of sale, receipt, contract, service agreement, lease agreement, periodic
notice of rates and services, rate card, or price list.

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Tax on certain mobile telecommunications services. (1) There is a
tax imposed on the gross receipts of mobile telecommunications services, as defined in 4 U.S.C. 124, that
originate and terminate in the same state and are billed to a customer with a place of primary use in this state
or are considered to have originated or been received in this state and to be billed or charged to a service
address in this state if the customer's place of primary use is located in this state regardless of where the
service actually originates or terminates. The rate of the tax is the same as the rate imposed on sales of
tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of [sections 1 through 44] and for the purposes of the tax
imposed by this section, the tax imposed on mobile telecommunication services must be administered in
accordance with 4 U.S.C. 116 through 4 U.S.C. 126.

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Tax on room or parking site rentals to transient guests --
exemption. (1) There is a tax imposed on the gross receipts from rentals of rooms or parking sites by lodging
establishments or campgrounds received from transient guests. The rate of the tax is the same as the rate
imposed on sales of tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].
- 20 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(2) The provisions of this section do not apply to the casual or occasional rental of a sleeping
accommodation or camping site. For the purposes of this section, "casual or occasional" means the rental of a
sleeping accommodation or camping site by any establishment or campground for 10 or fewer days in a
calendar year. Any establishment or campground that has a permit or license issued under [sections 1 through
44] is not offering the rental of sleeping accommodations or camping sites on a casual or occasional basis.
(3) Gross receipts from membership fees paid to any lodging house and hotel membership
organization operated for the benefit of its members are exempt from the taxes provided for in [sections 1
through 44]. The exemption does not apply to a membership fee that represents payment for tangible personal
property, a product transferred electronically, or services provided by the membership organization.

NEW SECTION. Section 12. Tax on admission to amusements and athletic contests or events.
Except as otherwise provided in [sections 1 through 44], there is imposed a tax on the gross receipts from all
sales of tickets or admissions to places of amusement, athletic contests or events, and rodeos and rodeo-
related activities and events. The rate of the tax is the same as the rate imposed on sales of tangible personal
property provided for in [section 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 13. Tax on passenger transportation. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2), there is imposed a tax on the gross receipts from any transportation of passengers if the
passenger boards and exits the mode of transportation within this state. The rate of the tax is the same as the
rate imposed on sales of tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].
(2) The tax does not apply to any transportation service that the state is prohibited from taxing by
federal law or the United States constitution.

NEW SECTION. Section 14. Exemption of sales to United States, states, local governments,
charities, and Indian tribes. There are exempted from the provisions of [sections 1 through 44] and from the
computation of the amount of tax imposed by it the gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property, any
product transferred electronically, and services to:
(1) the United States;
- 21 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(2) the state of Montana or to any other state of the United States or the District of Columbia if the
other state provides a reciprocal exemption for Montana;
(3) an incorporated city or town, a county, or a consolidated city-county government of the state of
Montana or of any other state of the United States or the District of Columbia if the other state provides a
reciprocal exemption to Montana incorporated cities or towns, counties, or consolidated city-county
governments;
(4) a nonprofit corporation created for the purpose of fire protection that is controlled by any
political subdivision of this state;
(5) a nonprofit charitable organization maintaining a physical location within this state that devotes
its resources exclusively to the relief of the poor, distressed, or underprivileged and has been recognized as an
exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3); or
(6) any tribal government.

NEW SECTION. Section 15. Exemption of sales to educational institutions and hospital. (1)
There are exempted from the provisions of [sections 1 through 44] and from the computation of the amount of
tax imposed by it the gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property, any product transferred
electronically, and services to and for use by a qualified education provider or nonprofit, charitable hospital
when purchases are made by authorized officials, payment is made from the institution funds, and title to the
property is retained in the name of the institution.
(2) This exemption does not extend to sales or purchases of tangible personal property or any
product transferred electronically for the personal use of officials, members, or employees of the institutions or
to sales or purchases of tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically used in the
operation of a taxable retail business.
(3) Each institution claiming the exemption shall maintain a list of all purchases on which the
exemption was claimed, fully itemized, showing the name and address of vendors, description of property
purchased, date or dates of purchase, purchase price, and a brief explanation of the use or intended use.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "qualified education provider" has the same meaning as
provided in 15-30-3102.
- 22 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1

NEW SECTION. Section 16. Exempt tangible personal property and products transferred
electronically. Gross receipts from the sale of the following are exempt from the tax provided for in [sections 1
through 44]:
(1) the sale, resale, or leasing of farm machinery, attachment units, and irrigation equipment used
exclusively for agricultural purposes. Farm machinery includes all-terrain vehicles of three or more wheels used
exclusively by the purchaser for agricultural purposes on agricultural land. The purchaser shall sign and deliver
to the seller a statement that the all-terrain vehicle will be used exclusively for agricultural purposes.
(2) seed legumes, seed grasses, and seed grains, when 25 pounds or more are sold in a single
sale to be used exclusively for agricultural purposes;
(3) commercial fertilizers, either liquid or solid, when 500 pounds or more are sold in a single sale
to be used exclusively for agricultural purposes:
(4) pesticides to be used exclusively by the purchaser for agricultural purposes. Any product or
substance to be used in conjunction with the application or use of pesticides for agricultural purposes is also
exempt. The products or substances include adjuvants, surfactants, ammonium sulfate, inoculants, drift
retardants, water conditioners, seed treatments, foam markers, and foam dyes. Equipment for the application of
pesticides and related products and substances is not exempt except for farm machinery, attachment units, and
irrigation equipment used exclusively for agricultural purposes.
(5) livestock or live poultry, ostriches, emus, or rheas, if the sales are a part of a series of
transactions incident to producing a finished product intended to be offered for an ultimate retail sale, except
that an ultimate retail sale interrupting the series of transactions with an intended final use or consumption is
taxable;
(6) live gamebirds sold by the producer to nonprofit organizations that release the birds or to
commercial hunting operators who charge fees to hunt the birds;
(7) live cattle, buffalo, sheep, goats, swine, poultry, ostriches, emus, rheas, and domesticated fur-
bearing animals, used or to be used as breeding or production stock, and horses and other animals within the
family Equidae. Poultry does not include any fowl other than domestic fowl kept and raised for the market or the
production of eggs for human consumption.
- 23 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(8) feed and bedding for cattle, buffalo, sheep, goats, swine, pheasants, partridges, quail, poultry,
ostriches, emus, rheas, and domesticated fur-bearing animals, and horses and other animals within the family
Equidae, if the feed or bedding is used by farmers or ranchers who are regularly engaged in the business of
raising and feeding the animals or producing milk for sale for human consumption. Bedding includes only straw,
corn stover, and bean straw.
(9) live nondomestic animals and feed for the animals if the animal is to be used by a farmer or
rancher who is regularly engaged in the breeding and raising of the animals;
(10) swine semen and cattle semen to be used for agricultural purposes;
(11) parts and repair services on farm machinery, attachment units, and irrigation equipment used
exclusively for agricultural purposes that are exempt from the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44] if the part
replaces a farm machinery, attachment unit, or irrigation equipment part assigned a specific or generic part
number by the manufacturer of the farm machinery, attachment unit, or irrigation equipment;
(12) maintenance items and maintenance services used on farm machinery, attachment units, and
irrigation equipment used exclusively for agricultural purposes that are exempt from the tax imposed by
[sections 1 through 44];
(13) agricultural and industrial production equipment in international commerce if, under the terms of
the sales agreement, physical delivery of the goods takes place in the state. The exemption applies only if
written evidence of the contract of sale is retained, and the contract indicates that the goods are to be shipped
in international commerce to a point outside the United States not to be returned to a point within the United
States.
(14) motor vehicles and motorboats subject to registration fees under Title 61, chapter 3, part 3;
(15) gasoline, motor fuel, and special fuel subject to tax under Title 15, chapter 70;
(16) tangible personal property or products transferred electronically that this state is prohibited from
taxing under the constitution or laws of the United States or the constitution or laws of the state of Montana;
(17) tangible personal property or products transferred electronically to a person who leases the
property to a person in this state;
(18) freeport merchandise and stocks of merchandise brought as foreign or domestic merchandise
into a foreign trade zone. The exemption applies only if written evidence of the contract of sale is retained, and
- 24 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
the contract indicates that the merchandise is to be shipped in international commerce to a point outside the
United States not to be returned to a point within the United States.
(19) the handling fee paid by a religious organization recognized as an exempt organization under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to an approved relief agency recognized as an exempt
organization pursuant to [section 14] for the distribution of food that is used for the assistance or relief to the
poor, distressed, or underprivileged through a food giveaway program;
(20) furnishing goods or services to the purchaser or the purchaser's successor in interest of
tangible personal property or product transferred electronically to fulfill a warranty obligation of the manufacturer
to the extent that the goods or services are not charged to the purchaser or the purchaser's successor in
interest;
(21) lottery tickets for a lottery operated by the state;
(22) library copying charges;
(23) ink and newsprint when used in the production of shoppers' guides;
(24) raw materials and newspaper print that become a part of other tangible personal property by
means of fabrication, compounding, or manufacture for retail sale within or without the state of;
(25) paper and plastic bags, wrapping paper, twine, tape, and similar articles sold to retailers
licensed under [sections 1 through 44] if the retailer uses the articles as wrappers or containers to hold other
tangible personal property sold by the retailer and subject to sales or use tax and the articles are supplied free
by the retailer as a convenience to the customer;
(26) meals provided to inpatients of hospitals if the meals are paid for, by law or by contract, by the
United States, this state, or a political subdivision, including but not limited to, meals provided to medicare,
medicaid, or Indian health service patients;
(27) purchases made with benefits provided by the supplemental nutrition assistance program
provided for in 7 U.S.C. 51 and the special nutrition program for women, infants, and children provided for in 42
U.S.C. 1786;
(28) electricity used to power irrigation pumps whenever the purchaser has made the purchase
exclusively for agricultural purposes;
(29) bulk water delivered for domestic use;
- 25 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(30) replacement parts that are sold to retailers and that will be installed in tangible personal
property that will ultimately be for resale;
(31) carpet, floor covering, tacks, glue, and other materials purchased for use by those providing
floor laying and other floor work services;
(32) locks, lock parts, and other materials purchased for use by locksmiths;
(33) coins, currency, or bullion;
(34) any food or food product that is available for purchase under the federal supplemental nutrition
assistance program provided for in 7 U.S.C. 2012, regardless of whether the purchaser qualifies for the
program; and
(35) diapers intended for use by humans.

NEW SECTION. Section 17. Exempt services. (1) The following services are exempt from the
provisions of [sections 1 through 44]:
(a) advertising services;
(b) agricultural services except veterinarian services and animal specialty services;
(c) air transportation, including certified carriers and noncertified carriers, except chartered flights
and airplane, helicopter, balloon, dirigible, and blimp rides for amusement or sightseeing;
(d) architectural, engineering, and surveying services rendered for a project entirely outside this
state;
(e) credit counseling services provided by individual and family social services;
(f) credit services by credit bureaus to financial institutions;
(g) commissions earned or service fees paid by an insurance company to an agent or
representative for the sale of a policy;
(h) commissions or fees received for rendering a service that provides for the sale of tangible
personal property, a product transferred electronically, or services, unless otherwise specifically subject to tax;
(i) commodity contracts brokers and dealers;
(j) construction services except floor laying and other floor work and locksmiths and locksmith
shops;
- 26 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(k) consumer credit reporting agencies, mercantile reporting agencies, and adjustment and
collection agencies, if the debt was incurred out-of-state and the client does not reside within the state;
(l) credit card processing services to retailers;
(m) direct mail service for the cost of United States postage paid by the direct mail service if the
cost of postage, including any markup that is reasonable and customary in the seller's industry, is listed by the
direct mail service as a separate line item on the customer's bill;
(n) educational services, except schools and educational services not elsewhere classified, and
continuing education programs and tutoring;
(o) farm product warehousing and storage;
(p) financial services of financial institutions as defined in 32-6-103, including loan origination fees,
late payment charges, nonsufficient fund check charges, stop payment charges, safe deposit box rent,
exchange charges, commission on traveler’s checks, charges for administration of trusts, interest charges, and
points charged on loans;
(q) forestry services;
(r) health services;
(s) local and suburban passenger transportation except limousine services;
(t) motion picture rentals to a commercially operated theater primarily engaged in the exhibition of
motion pictures;
(u) motor vehicle rentals leased under a single contract for more than 30 days. Motor vehicle has
the same meaning as provided in 15-68-101.
(v) natural gas transportation services by a pipeline;
(w) officiating of amateur sporting events, except officiating a sporting event sponsored and
operated by an elementary, secondary, or postsecondary school;
(x) passenger transportation arrangement;
(y) pipelines, except natural gas pipelines;
(z) radio and television broadcasting;
(aa) railroad transportation and rental of railroad cars;
(bb) rental of devices for fertilizer and pesticide application;
- 27 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(cc) rental of devices used primarily for agricultural purposes if the devices are owned by a
conservation district provided for in Title 76, chapter 15;
(dd) school buses;
(ee) security brokers, dealers, and flotation companies;
(ff) services performed for rodeos by promoters, stock contractors, stock handlers, announcers,
judges, and clowns;
(gg) services provided by any corporation to another corporation that is centrally assessed having
identical ownership and services provided by any corporation to a wholly owned subsidiary that is centrally
assessed;
(hh) sewerage systems;
(ii) social services, including individual and family services, job training and vocational
rehabilitation services, child day-care services, and residential care services;
(jj) stock and commodity brokers and agents;
(kk) trading stamps sales;
(ll) transportation of freight and cargo arrangement;
(mm) transportation on rivers and canals;
(nn) trucking and courier services, except air and collection and disposal of solid waste;
(oo) water supply; and
(pp) water system services, including management, billing, bookkeeping, administrative, and related
services provided to a rural water system by any cooperative or nonprofit corporation that is wholly owned by
the water systems receiving the services.
(2) The exemptions from sales tax provided for in [section 16] also apply to services.

NEW SECTION. Section 18. Exemption of receipts used for civic and nonprofit associations
and purposes. Gross receipts from the following are exempt from the tax provided in [sections 1 through 44]:
(1) sales of tickets or admissions to the grounds and grandstand attractions of state, county,
district, regional, and local fairs;
(2) admissions to nonprofit historic sites and repertory theater performances operated by nonprofit
- 28 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
organizations;
(3) admissions to community operated celebrations and shows sponsored by a chamber of
commerce or other similar nonprofit organization if the county or municipality in which the activity takes place
officially sponsors the activity and no charge is made to the operators of the celebration or show for the use of
county, city or town facilities or services;
(4) admissions to events or receipts from activities sponsored and operated by colleges or
vocational schools or elementary or high schools or related clubs or supporting organizations approved or
supervised by a school or college when the entire net proceeds are spent for educational purposes and any
associations of them and receipts from tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically sold
at the events. Receipts from tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically sold at the
events or activities are included in the measure of sales tax at the time of purchase by the college or school or
related club or supporting organization.
(5) religious, benevolent, fraternal, youth association, or charitable activities, including any bingo or
lottery exempt under 23-5-406, for which the entire amount of the receipts after deducting all costs directly
related to the conduct of the activities is expended for religious, benevolent, fraternal, youth association, or
charitable purposes, and, except for any bingo or lottery, the receipts are not the result of engaging in business
for more than 3 consecutive days. For the purposes of determining whether the business has been engaged in
for more than 3 days, days necessary to set up, organize, prepare for, take down, or disassemble the business
or activity are not days engaged in business. Receipts from tangible personal property, any product transferred
electronically, or services purchased for use in the activity are included in the measure of sales tax.
(6) sales of tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically when the net
receipts are used primarily for the restoration or maintenance of the governor's mansion and capitol grounds;
(7) a charge or entry fee for engaging in participatory events limited to tournaments, contests, and
league activities. Receipts from tangible personal property, any product transferred electronically, or services
purchased for use in tournaments, contests, and league activities must be included in the measure of the tax
imposed by [sections 1 through 44].
(8) admissions to events or receipts from activities sponsored and operated by county or municipal
historical societies or centennial committees when the entire net proceeds are spent for centennial celebration
- 29 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
purposes. Receipts from tangible personal property, any product transferred electronically, or services
purchased for use in the activity are included in the measure of sales tax.
(9) religious, benevolent, fraternal, youth association, or charitable activities conducted at county
fairs, if the entire amount of the receipts after deducting all costs directly related to the conduct of the activities
is expended for religious, benevolent, fraternal, youth association, or charitable purposes, and the receipts are
not the result of engaging in business for more than 5 consecutive days. Receipts from tangible personal
property, any product transferred electronically, or services purchased for use in the activity are included in the
measure of sales tax.
(10) admissions to circus performances sponsored or operated by religious, benevolent, fraternal or
youth associations, if the entire amount of the receipts after deducting all costs directly related to the conduct of
the circus performances is expended for religious, benevolent, fraternal, youth association, or charitable
purposes; and
(11) admissions to events or receipts from activities sponsored and operated by religious,
benevolent, or charitable organizations for a period not to exceed 30 days in any calendar year, if the entire
amount of the receipts after deducting all costs directly related to the conduct of the event or activity is
expended for the benefit of homeless persons.

NEW SECTION. Section 19. Exemption of membership organizations. (1) Membership
organizations are exempt from the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44] on receipts from membership fees
and from sales of services by the organization. The exemption does not apply to the tax imposed on the gross
receipts of sales of tangible personal property or a product transferred electronically by the organization.
(2) This section does not exempt the gross receipts of a retailer for sales to a membership
organization or exempt the organization from payment of use tax on goods and services used in the conduct of
their activities.
(3) For the purposes of this section, membership organizations include business associations,
professional membership organizations, labor unions and similar labor organizations, political organizations,
religious organizations, and civic, social, and fraternal associations.

- 30 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
NEW SECTION. Section 20. Exemption of certain drugs, medical equipment, and medical
devices. (1) There are exempted from the provisions of [sections 1 through 44] and from the computation of the
amount of tax imposed by it, gross receipts from the sale of:
(a) any medical device, as that term is defined in this section, used by humans, if the medical
device is prescribed by prescription by a physician, chiropractor, optometrist, dentist, podiatrist, or audiologist;
(b) drugs used by humans if the drugs are prescribed by prescription, dispensed, or administered
by a physician, chiropractor, optometrist, dentist, podiatrist, or audiologist;
(c) durable medical equipment, mobility enhancing equipment, and prosthetic devices used by
humans, if the durable medical equipment, mobility enhancing equipment, and prosthetic devices are
prescribed by prescription by a physician, chiropractor, optometrist, dentist, podiatrist, or audiologist; and
(d) insulin used by humans that is not sold by prescription.
(2) (a) The term "medical device" means any instrument, apparatus, implement, contrivance, or
other similar or related article, including a component, part, or accessory, that is prescribed for use on a single
patient and that is:
(i) recognized in the official national formulary, or the United States pharmacopoeia, or any
supplement to them;
(ii) intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions, or in the cure, mitigation,
treatment, detection, or prevention of disease, of the human body; or
(iii) intended to affect the structure or any function of the human body and that does not achieve
any of its primary intended purposes through chemical action within or on the human body and that is not
dependent on being metabolized for the achievement of any of its primary intended purposes.
(b) A medical device does not include durable medical equipment, mobility enhancing equipment,
or a prosthetic device.

NEW SECTION. Section 21. Exemption of gaming proceeds. There are exempted from the
provisions of [sections 1 through 44] and from the computation of the tax imposed by it gross proceeds of the
state lottery and sports wagering provided for in Title 23, chapter 7.

- 31 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
NEW SECTION. Section 22. Exemption for fuel used for agricultural or railroad purposes. (1)
Motor fuel, including kerosene, tractor fuel, liquefied petroleum gas, natural and artificial gas, diesel fuels, and
distillate, when used for agricultural or railroad purposes, is exempt from the tax imposed by [sections 1 through
44].
(2) For the purpose of this section, agricultural purposes does not include the lighting or heating of
a farm residence.
(3) For the purpose of this section, railroad purposes includes only locomotives or track motor cars
being operated on railroad tracks in road service in this state.

NEW SECTION. Section 23. Exemption of fair market value of personal property or service
given without charge to exempt organization. There are specifically exempted from the provisions of
[sections 1 through 44] and the computation of the tax imposed by it, the fair market value of any tangible
personal property, product transferred electronically, or service given without charge to an institution,
organization, or group exempt from the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44].

NEW SECTION. Section 24. Exemption of payments between members of a controlled group.
(1) Payments made by one member of a controlled group to another member of a controlled group that
represent an allocation, reimbursement, or charge for services provided by or rendered by the members of the
controlled group are specifically exempt from the provisions of [sections 1 through 44] and the computation of
the taxes imposed by it. The exemption provided in this section does not apply to the lease of tangible personal
property or any product transferred electronically unless the sales or use tax has been paid on the property by
the lessor.
(2) Payments made by one member of a controlled group to another member of a controlled group
that represent an allocation, reimbursement, or charge for third-party services rendered to the controlled group
and on which a sales or use tax has been paid may not be considered as gross receipts under [sections 1
through 44].
(3) There are specifically exempted from the provisions of [sections 1 through 44] and the
computation of the tax imposed by it, gross receipts from the sale of services rendered by a related corporation
- 32 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
for use by a financial institution or on any service rendered by a financial institution for use by a related
corporation. For the purposes of this subsection, related corporation includes a corporation that together with
the financial institution is part of a controlled group of corporations as defined in 26 U.S.C. 1563, except that the
80% ownership requirements set forth in 26 U.S.C. 1563(a)(2)(A) for a brother-sister controlled group are
reduced to 51%. The exemption provided in this section does not apply to the lease of tangible personal
property or any product transferred electronically unless the sales or use tax has been paid on the property by
the lessor.

NEW SECTION. Section 25. Exemption for small sales by minors. [Sections 1 through 44] do not
apply to any person under 18 years old with gross receipts totaling less than $1,000 in any calendar year from
any sale of tangible personal property, any service delivered, or any product or service transferred electronically
for use in the state.

NEW SECTION. Section 26. Tax additional to other occupation and privilege taxes. The taxes
imposed under [sections 1 through 44] are in addition to all other occupation or privilege taxes imposed by the
state, or by any incorporated city or town, county, consolidated city-county government, tribal government, or
political subdivision unless otherwise specifically exempted by [sections 1 through 44].

NEW SECTION. Section 27. Addition of tax to price of product or service. (1) A retailer may add
the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44] to the price of the product or service as provided by law. If no
provision is made, the average equivalent of the tax may be added.
(2) Any person or retailer subject to taxation under [sections 1 through 44] may add the tax under
[sections 1 through 44], or the average equivalent of the tax, to the price or charge.

NEW SECTION. Section 28. Application for retailer permit. (1) A retailer or person engaging in a
business in this state whose receipts are subject to the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44] shall file with the
department an application for a permit. The application must be made on a form prescribed by the department
and must require the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of
- 33 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
each business, and other information the department may require.
(2) The applicant must have a permit for each place of business, unless the department grants a
request for a statewide permit. The department may grant a statewide permit if the applicant demonstrates the
ability to comply with the filing, auditing, and record-keeping requirements specified in rules adopted pursuant
to [section 43] for each location specified in the application.
(3) A seller registering under the agreement as defined in [section 91] must be registered in this
state, provided the state has entered into the agreement as provided in [section 95]. Any seller
who is registered under the agreement may cancel its registration at any time but is liable for remitting any
sales tax previously collected.

NEW SECTION. Section 29. Issuance of retailer permit. Except as provided in [section 30], the
department shall grant and issue to each applicant a permit for each place of business within the state unless a
statewide permit is granted. If a statewide permit is granted, the department shall issue a copy of the statewide
permit for each place of business within the state. A permit is not assignable and is valid only for the person in
whose name it is issued and for the transaction of business at the place designated. The permit must be
conspicuously displayed at the place of business at all times. The permit is valid and effective without further
payment of fees until canceled or revoked.

NEW SECTION. Section 30. Refusal of permit to delinquent taxpayer. The department may
refuse to issue a permit to any person who is delinquent in payment of taxes levied by the state. The
department may require an applicant to furnish a bond to the state, or other adequate security, as security for
payment of any sales tax that may become due or require a bond or security as a condition precedent to
remaining in business as a retailer.

NEW SECTION. Section 31. Filing return and remitting payment -- penalty. (1) A person who
holds a license issued pursuant to [sections 1 through 44] or who is a person whose receipts are subject to the
tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44] shall, except as otherwise provided in this section, file a return and pay
any tax due to the department on or before the 20th day of the month following each monthly period. The return
- 34 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
must be filed on forms prescribed and furnished by the department.
(2) If the person remits the tax by electronic transfer to the state, the person shall file the return by
electronic means on or before the 20th day of the month following each period and remit the tax on or before
the 25th day of the month following each period.
(3) The department may require or allow a person to file a return and pay any tax due on a basis
other than monthly. The return and remittance are due the 20th day of the month following the reporting period
or at a time otherwise determined by the department.
(4) If a person fails to file a return on or before the due date or fails to pay a tax on or before a due
date, the person is subject to the penalty and interest provisions of 15-1-216.

NEW SECTION. Section 32. Collection allowance credit for collecting tax. (1) (a) A person
required to file a return and remit the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44], who holds a license issued
pursuant to [sections 1 through 44], who timely files the return due, and who timely remits the tax due is
allowed, as compensation for the expense of collecting and paying the tax, a credit equal to 1.5% of the gross
amount of the tax due. The credit may not exceed $70 for each return period.
(b) If a person is required to file a return and to remit tax more than once within a 30-day period,
the collection allowance credit may not exceed $70 for all returns filed and all remittances made within the 30-
day period.
(2) The collection allowance credit authorized by this section only applies to taxes reported on the
sales and use tax return, including the taxes imposed by [sections 1 through 44, 45 through 89, and 117
through 124].
(3) The collection allowance credit authorized by this section may only be granted to a person who
timely files the return due by electronic means and who timely remits the tax due by electronic means.
(4) For any tax collected by the department on behalf of another entity on which the collection
allowance credit is calculated, the entities shall negotiate in good faith to share in the payment of the collection
allowance credit. The department may implement an allocation of collection allowance credit directly or through
the adjustment of any administrative fee charged to the entity.
(5) A person who has selected a certified service provider as defined in [section 91] is entitled to
- 35 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
the collection allowance credit authorized by this section if the certified service provider receives a monetary
allowance as provided by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement authorized by [sections 90 through 102]
for performing the retailer's sales and use tax functions in this state.
(6) A collection allowance credit may not be granted to any person who has outstanding tax
returns due to the department or who has outstanding tax remittances due to the department.

NEW SECTION. Section 33. Deduction for bad debts. (1) A bad debt may be deducted on the
return for the period during which the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the retailer's books and records
and is eligible to be deducted for federal income tax purposes. For the purposes of this section, a retailer who is
not required to file a federal income tax return may deduct a bad debt on a return filed for the period in which
the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the retailer's books and records and would be eligible for a bad
debt deduction for federal income tax purposes if the retailer was required to file a federal income tax return. If
a deduction is taken for a bad debt and the retailer subsequently collects the debt in whole or in part, the tax on
the amount collected must be paid and reported on the next return due after the collection. A retailer may
allocate its bad debts among states if the books and records of the retailer claiming the bad debt can support
the allocation.
(2) (a) For the purposes of this section, bad debt has the meaning provided in 26 U.S.C. 166 and
is any portion of the purchase price of a transaction that a retailer has reported as taxable and for which the
retailer or any party related to the retailer within the meaning of section 267 or 707 of the Internal Revenue
Code or any disregarded entity for federal income tax purposes that is owned by the retailer or a related party
has written off as uncollectible for federal income tax purposes.
(b) In computing the amount of tax due, a seller may deduct bad debts from the total amount on
which the tax is calculated for any return. Any deduction taken or refund paid that is attributed to bad debts may
not include interest. Bad debts include worthless checks, worthless credit card payments, and uncollectible
credit accounts. Bad debts do not include financing charges or interest, sales or use taxes charged on the
purchase price, uncollectible amounts on property that remains in the possession of the retailer until the full
purchase price is paid, expenses incurred in attempting to collect any debt, debts sold or assigned to unrelated
third parties for collection, and repossessed property. A bad debt deduction may not be claimed by any person
- 36 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
that has purchased accounts receivable for collection unless the person is a successor that has acquired the
entire business of the retailer that incurred the bad debt, the person is a related party, or the person is a
disregarded entity for federal income tax purposes that is owned by the seller or a related party.
(3) If a retailer's amount of bad debt exceeds the amount of taxable sales for the period during
which the bad debt is written off, the seller may obtain a credit or refund of tax on any amount of bad debt. A
credit or refund under this paragraph may not include interest.
(4) If a retailer's filing responsibilities have been assumed by a certified service provider as defined
in [section 91], the service provider may claim, on behalf of the retailer, any bad debt allowance provided by this
section. The service provider shall credit or refund the full amount of any bad debt allowance or refund received
to the retailer.

NEW SECTION. Section 34. Cash basis reporting and payment. (1) Notwithstanding other
provisions of [sections 1 through 44], the department shall allow retailers to report and pay sales tax measured
by gross receipts on a cash basis if:
(a) the retailer has not changed its basis in the previous calendar year;
(b) the retailer's records are kept in a manner that may be audited to determine whether sales tax
is paid on all taxable sales;
(c) the retailer has made a written request to the department for authority to pay tax on the cash
basis; and
(d) authority to pay tax on the cash basis applies only to sales made after the authority is granted.
(2) If the department has granted a retailer the authority to report and pay sales tax on the cash
basis and a retailer requests in writing the authority to report and pay sales tax on the accrual basis, the
department may grant the authority if assessment and collection of taxes are not jeopardized.

NEW SECTION. Section 35. Jeopardy assessment of sales tax. If the department believes that the
assessment or collection of taxes will be jeopardized by delay, the department may immediately make an
assessment of the estimated tax and penalty and demand payment from the taxpayer. If the payment is not
made, the department may file a lien and issue a distress warrant. The department may accept a bond from the
- 37 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
taxpayer to satisfy collection until the amount of tax legally due is determined and paid.

NEW SECTION. Section 36. Records of persons subject to tax -- inspection by department. A
person subject to tax under [sections 1 through 44] shall keep records and books of all receipts and sales,
together with invoices, bills of lading, copies of bills of sale, and other pertinent papers and documents. The
books and records and other papers and documents are, at all times during business hours of the day, subject
to inspection by the department to determine the amount of tax due. The books and records must be preserved
for a period of 3 years unless the department, in writing, authorizes their destruction or disposal at an earlier
date.

NEW SECTION. Section 37. Temporary vendors -- violation. (1) A temporary vendor shall
maintain, for a minimum of 3 years, inventory records, including a beginning inventory of merchandise. The
vendor shall provide records for immediate inspection and review to any agent or representative of the
department on request.
(2) A temporary vendor shall maintain daily sales receipts, such as cash register tapes,
handwritten receipts, credit card receipts, or other receipts, for a minimum of 3 years. The vendor shall provide
the receipts for immediate inspection and review to any agent or representative of the department ON request.
(3) A temporary vendor shall maintain for a minimum of 3 years a complete list of suppliers,
including names and addresses. The vendor shall provide the list for immediate inspection and review to any
agent or representative of the department ON request.
(4) A temporary vendor operating in this state may be subjected to reviews and audits without
notice.
(5) The department shall revoke the temporary license of any person that fails to comply with the
provisions of this section.
(6) Failure to comply with this section is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Section 38. Personal liability of officers, managers, or partners of entity failing
to file returns or pay tax. (1) If a corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability
- 38 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
partnership, or limited liability limited partnership subject to tax under [sections 1 through 44] fails for any
reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, any of the corporate officers, member-managers or
managers of limited liability companies or partners of partnerships that control, supervise, or are charged with
the responsibility of filing the returns or remitting tax payments are personally liable for the failure.
(2) The dissolution of a corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, or limited liability limited partnership does not discharge an officer, member-manager, manager, or
partner's liability for a prior failure of the corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, or limited liability limited partnership to file a return or remit the tax due. The sum due for a liability
may be assessed and collected as provided by law.
(3) If the corporate officers, limited liability company member-managers or managers, or partners
elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the corporation,
limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited liability limited partnership
shall provide the department with a surety bond or certificate of deposit as security for payment of any tax that
may become due. The bond or certificate of deposit provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to
the estimated annual gross receipts multiplied by the applicable sales or excise tax rate.

NEW SECTION. Section 39. Exemption certificate -- responsibility of purchaser -- violation. (1)
A retailer that possesses an exemption certificate from a purchaser of tangible personal property, any product
transferred electronically, or services that indicates the items or services being purchased are exempt may rely
on the exemption certificate and not charge sales tax to the provider of the exemption certificate until the
provider of the exemption certificate gives notice that the items or services being purchased are no longer
exempt by filing a new exemption certificate with the retailer.
(2) The exemption certificate must be signed by the purchaser. The exemption certificate must
provide the purchaser's name, address, and valid state tax license number, if applicable. A person filing an
electronic exemption certificate is not required to sign the exemption certificate.
(3) The purchaser claiming the protection of an exemption certificate is responsible for assuring
that the goods and services delivered are of a type covered by the exemption certificate. A retailer of tangible
personal property, any product transferred electronically, or services THAT are generally described under the
- 39 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
exemption certificate is not responsible for the collection of the tax unless otherwise directed by the purchaser.
(4) If the purchaser later determines there is tax due, the purchaser shall remit the tax owed by the
purchaser to the state. If the purchaser makes an exempt purchase and later determines that the goods or
services purchased are not exempt, the purchaser shall report the transaction and pay the use tax on the next
filing of the purchaser's return.
(5) A purchaser who knowingly files an exemption certificate with a retailer in order to purchase
tangible personal property, any product transferred electronically, or services with the intent to evade payment
of the tax and fails to timely report the same with the department is guilty of a misdemeanor. The department
may assess a penalty of up to 50% of the tax owed, in addition to the tax owed. No interest may be charged on
the penalty.
(6) The seller shall retain the exemption certificate for a period of 3 years from the date it is filed by
the purchaser and provide the exemption certificate to the department ON request.

NEW SECTION. Section 40. Sourcing of sales and services -- rulemaking. (1) For the purposes
of the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44], a retailer shall source sales of tangible personal property, any
product transferred electronically, and services to the location where the tangible personal property, the product
transferred electronically, or the service is received.
(2) The department shall adopt rules defining the location of receipt. The rules adopted pursuant to
this section may provide an alternative method of sourcing telecommunication services.

NEW SECTION. Section 41. Registration and tax collection does not create nexus for other
taxes. Registration under the agreement and collection of tax imposed under [sections 1 through 44] or
[sections 45 through 89] does not in and of itself create nexus for other taxes or fees imposed by this state.

NEW SECTION. Section 42. Relief from liability for failing to collect tax at new rate. (1) A retailer
is relieved of any liability for failing to collect a tax pursuant to [sections 1 through 44] at a new effective rate if
the state fails to provide a period of at least 30 days between enactment of the statute providing for a rate
change and the effective date of the rate change if:
- 40 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(a) the retailer collected the tax at the immediately preceding effective rate; and
(b) the retailer's failure to collect at the newly effective rate does not extend beyond 30 days after
the date of enactment of the new rate.
(2) This section does not apply if the retailer fraudulently failed to collect the tax at the new rate or
solicited purchasers based on the immediately preceding effective rate.

NEW SECTION. Section 43. Rulemaking authority. The department may adopt rules pursuant to
[sections 1 through 44] concerning:
(1) licensing, including bonding and filing license applications;
(2) the filing of returns and payment of the tax;
(3) determining the application of the tax and exemptions;
(4) forms for exemption certificates;
(5) taxpayer recordkeeping requirements; and
(6) determining audit methods.

NEW SECTION. Section 44. Sales tax proceeds. All money collected under [sections 1 through 44]
must, in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited by the department in the school equalization
and property tax reduction account provided for in 20-9-336.

NEW SECTION. Section 45. Definitions. For the purposes of [sections 45 through 89], unless the
context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) (a) "Contractor" means a person entering into a realty improvement contract or a contract for
construction services as enumerated in division c of the standard industrial classification manual, as prepared
by the statistical policy division of the United States office of management and budget, with the United States
and its instrumentalities, the state of Montana and its subdivisions, or any other state or public corporation or
person. If a contractor engages in services not specifically listed in division c of the standard industrial
classification manual, then the services must entail the construction, building, installation, or repair of a fixture
to realty before the gross receipts are subject to the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89]. Operative
- 41 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
builders, industry number 1531, as enumerated in the standard industrial classification manual, as prepared by
the statistical policy division of the United States office of management and budget, are contractors regardless
of whether they perform construction work themselves or contract with other contractors.
(b) A person who is not primarily in the business of making realty improvements and regularly
employs persons for the purpose of repairing, maintaining, or making realty improvements for the person's own
use and who repairs, maintains, or makes a realty improvement for the person's own use with the person's
regular employees is not a contractor.
(2) (a) "Fair market value" means the price at which a willing seller and willing buyer will trade as
determined at the time of purchase.
(b) If a public corporation is supplying tangible personal property or any product transferred
electronically that will be used in the performance of a contract, fair market value is the amount stated in the
contractor specifications or notice to bidders.
(3) "Included in the measure of the tax" means the tangible personal property, any product
transferred electronically, or the service that was purchased from a retailer licensed under [sections 1 through
44] and that retailer has included the tax in the amount received from the sale.
(4) "In this state" or "in the state" means within the exterior limits of the state of Montana and
includes all territory within the limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.
(5) "Purchase" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or
by any means whatsoever, for a consideration. A transaction in which the possession of property is transferred
but the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the price is a purchase.
(6) "Purchase price" means gross receipts as determined in [section 2(1)].
(7) "Retailer maintaining a place of business in the state" means any retailer having or maintaining
within this state, directly or by a subsidiary, an office, distribution house, sales house, warehouse, or other
place of business, or any agents operating within the state under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary,
irrespective of whether the place of business or agent is located here permanently or temporarily or whether the
retailer or subsidiary is admitted to do business within this state pursuant to the laws of the state of Montana
granting the rights of foreign corporations to do business in this state.
(8) "Storage" means any keeping or retention in this state for use or other consumption in the state
- 42 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
of Montana for any purpose except sale in the regular course of business.
(9) "Subcontractor" means a person contracting with a contractor to perform all or part of a realty
improvement the contractor has contracted to perform. For highway construction projects, a subcontractor
includes any person contracting with a contractor to perform any of the following services as part of the project:
traffic control, striping, flagging, operation of pilot cars, signing, landscaping, seeding, sodding, mulching, and
erosion control.
(10) "Use" means the exercise of right or power over tangible personal property or any product
transferred electronically incidental to the ownership of that property, except that it does not include the sale of
that property in the regular course of business. Use also includes the use of the types of services, the gross
receipts from the sale of which are to be included in the measure of the tax imposed by [sections 45 through
89], and the delivery or causing delivery into this state of tangible personal property or any product transferred
electronically intended to advertise any product or service or promote or facilitate any sale to Montana
residents.

NEW SECTION. Section 46. Tax on tangible personal property purchased for use in state. An
excise tax is imposed on the privilege of the use, storage, and consumption in this state of tangible personal
property purchased for use in this state at the same rate imposed on sales of tangible personal property
provided for in [section 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 47. Tax on use of product transferred electronically. (1) There is an
excise tax imposed on the use, storage, or consumption in this state of any product transferred electronically
purchased for use in this state. The rate of the tax is the same as the rate imposed on sales of tangible
personal property provided for in [section 3].
(2) The tax is imposed if:
(a) the sale is to an end user;
(b) the sale is to a person who is not an end user, unless otherwise exempted by [sections 45
through 89];
(c) the seller grants the right of permanent or less than permanent use of the product transferred
- 43 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
electronically; or
(d) the sale is conditioned or not conditioned on continued payment.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) the term "end user" does not include any person who received by contract any product
transferred electronically for further commercial broadcast, rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing,
relicensing, distribution, redistribution, or exhibition of the product, in whole or in part, to another person; and
(b) the term "permanent use" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time.
(4) The sale of a digital code that may be utilized to obtain a product transferred electronically is
taxed in the same manner as the product transferred electronically. A digital code is a code that permits a
purchaser to obtain at a later date a product transferred electronically.

NEW SECTION. Section 48. Tax on use of rented property and products transferred
electronically -- exemption. An excise tax is imposed on the privilege of the use of rented tangible personal
property and any product transferred electronically in this state at the rate imposed on sales of tangible
personal property provided for in [section 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 49. Tax imposed on use of services -- exemptions. For the privilege of
using services in the state, except those services exempt under [section 17], there is imposed on the person
using the service an excise tax on the value of the service at the time the service is rendered. The tax rate is
equal to the rate of the tax on sales of tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 50. Tax on tangible personal property and electronically transferred
products not originally purchased for use in state -- exemption -- rulemaking. (1) An excise tax is
imposed on the privilege of the use, storage, or consumption in this state of tangible personal property or any
product transferred electronically not originally purchased for use in this state, but subsequently used, stored, or
consumed in this state, at the rate imposed on sales of tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].
(2) The use, storage, or consumption of tangible personal property or any product transferred
electronically that is more than 7 years old at the time it is brought into the state by the person who purchased
- 44 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
the property for use in another state is exempt from the tax. The department may adopt rules relating to the
determination of the age and value of the tangible personal property or the product transferred electronically
brought into this state.

NEW SECTION. Section 51. Tax on passenger transportation. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2), there is imposed a tax on the privilege of the use of any transportation of passengers if the
passenger boards and exits the mode of transportation within this state. The rate of the tax is the same as the
rate imposed on sales of tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].
(2) The tax does not apply to any transportation service that the state is prohibited from taxing by
federal law or the United States constitution.

NEW SECTION. Section 52. Tax on use of certain mobile telecommunications services. (1)
There is imposed a tax on the privilege of the use of mobile telecommunications services, as defined in 4
U.S.C. 124(7), that originate and terminate in the same state and are billed to a customer with a place of
primary use in this state. The rate of the tax is the same as the rate imposed on sales of tangible personal
property provided for in [section 3].
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of [sections 45 through 89] and for purposes of the tax
imposed by this section, the tax imposed on mobile telecommunication services must be administered in
accordance with 4 U.S.C. 116-126.

NEW SECTION. Section 53. Tax on intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications
service -- exemptions. (1) Except as provided in [section 52] and subsection (2), there is imposed a tax on the
privilege of the use of any intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications service that originates or
terminates in this state and that is billed or charged to a service address in this state, or that both originates and
terminates in this state. The rate of the tax is the same as the rate imposed on sales of tangible personal
property provided for in [section 3].
(2) The tax imposed by this section does not apply to:
(a) any 800 or 800-type service unless the service both originates and terminates in this state;
- 45 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(b) any sale of a telecommunication service to a provider of telecommunication services, including
access service, for use in providing any telecommunication service; or
(c) any sale of interstate telecommunication service provided to a call center that has been
certified by the department to meet the definition in [section 1] and the call center has provided to the
telecommunications service provider an exemption certificate issued by the department indicating that it meets
the definition. If a call center uses an exemption certificate to purchase services not meeting the definition of a
call center, the call center is liable for the applicable tax, penalty, and interest.

NEW SECTION. Section 54. Tax on ancillary services. There is a tax on the privilege of use of
ancillary services at the rate imposed on sales of tangible personal property provided for in [section 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 55. Tax imposed on person using property. The use tax provided for in
[sections 45 through 89] is imposed on each person using, storing, or otherwise consuming taxable property
within this state until the tax has been paid directly to a retailer or to the department.

NEW SECTION. Section 56. Contractor and subcontractor taxed on property used in
performance of contract. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), if a contractor or subcontractor uses
tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically in the performance of a contract or to fulfill
contract or subcontract obligations, the contractor or subcontractor shall pay a tax at the rate prescribed by
[section 3] unless the property has been previously subjected to a sales or use tax in this state and the tax due
has been paid. This section applies whether the title to the property is in the name of the contractor,
subcontractor, contractee, subcontractee, or any other person, or whether the titleholder of the property would
be subject to pay the sales or use tax. The amount of tax due is measured by the purchase price or fair market
value of the property, whichever is greater.
(2) If the contractor or subcontractor fabricates tangible personal property for use in the
performance of a contract, fair market value excludes the value of the contractor's or subcontractor's fabrication
costs. The value of molds and dies produced in connection with the fabrication or manufacture of other tangible
personal property is limited to the cost of materials incorporated in the molds or dies to the extent the cost of
- 46 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
the materials have not previously been subjected to sales or use tax.
(3) A tax increase may not be levied on materials incorporated in construction work pursuant to
construction contracts bid or entered into on or before the effective date of a tax increase.

NEW SECTION. Section 57. Sectional homes subject to use tax. A contractor who erects a
sectional home shall hold a sales tax or use tax license and pay use tax based on the fair market value of the
raw materials used to construct and erect a sectional home.

NEW SECTION. Section 58. Retail sales include auctions and consignments -- deduction
allowed. (1) All auction sales and consignment sales of tangible personal property, any product transferred
electronically, and services are sales at retail. The auction clerk shall file the return and remit the tax imposed
by [sections 45 through 89] on the gross receipts from each auction after applying the deduction provided for in
subsection (3).
(2) The auctioneer is responsible for the payment of the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89] if
the auction clerk is an employee of the auctioneer or if the auction clerk does not have a permit as required by
[sections 45 through 89]. In addition to any other information required to be kept by [sections 45 through 89],
each auction clerk shall keep records that identify the owner of the property sold at auction and the auctioneer
who conducts the sale of the property.
(3) In determining the amount of tax due, auctioneers may deduct from gross receipts amounts
that represent direct expense charges for clients for tangible personal property any product transferred
electronically or services purchased by the auctioneer on behalf of a client. The sale of the property or service
to the auctioneer is not a sale for resale if this deduction is taken. This deduction may only be taken if the
amount to be deducted represents an expense specifically incurred for a particular client and the amount is
itemized and paid from the client's auction proceeds by the auctioneer or closing agent. The deduction is
disallowed if the auctioneer receives any profit or remuneration directly or indirectly from the client's expense.

NEW SECTION. Section 59. Exemption of property and services subject to sales tax. The use in
this state of tangible personal property, any product transferred electronically, or services, the gross receipts
- 47 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
from the sale of which are to be included in the measure of the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44], are
exempt from the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89].

NEW SECTION. Section 60. Credit for sales or use tax paid to another state -- reciprocity
required. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), the amount of any use tax imposed with respect to tangible
personal property, any product transferred electronically, or services must be reduced by the amount of any
sales or use tax previously paid by the taxpayer with respect to the property on account of liability to another
state or its political subdivisions.
(2) The amount of use tax imposed with respect to tangible personal property and any product
transferred electronically in the form of equipment brought into this state on a permanent basis for direct use in
a manufacturing, fabricating, or processing business must be reduced by the amount of any sales or use tax
previously paid by the taxpayer with respect to the property on account of liability to another state or its political
subdivisions to the extent that the tax equals or exceeds the rate of the tax in this state. If the sales or use tax
of the other state is less than the tax of this state, the taxpayer is subject to the payment of the balance to this
state.
(3) A credit may not be given under this section for taxes paid on tangible personal property, any
product transferred electronically, or services in another state or its political subdivisions if that state does not
reciprocally grant a credit for taxes paid on similar tangible personal property or any product transferred
electronically.

NEW SECTION. Section 61. Exemption for uses exempt from sales tax. The use in this state of
tangible personal property, any product transferred electronically, or services, the gross receipts from the sale
of which are exempt from the sales tax provided for in [sections 1 through 44], are exempt from the tax imposed
by [sections 45 through 89].

NEW SECTION. Section 62. Exemption of use of property leased. The use, storage, or
consumption of tangible personal property and any product transferred electronically actually leased to persons
in this state is exempted from the provisions of [sections 45 through 89] and the tax imposed by them.
- 48 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1

NEW SECTION. Section 63. Constitutional exemptions from tax. Tangible personal property and
any product transferred electronically, the storage, use, or other consumption of which this state is prohibited
from taxing under the constitution or laws of the United States or under the constitution of this state, is exempt
from the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89].

NEW SECTION. Section 64. Exemption of property brought in for personal use of nonresident.
The use in this state of all articles of tangible personal property and any product transferred electronically
brought into the state by a nonresident individual for personal use or enjoyment while in the state, is exempt
from the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89].

NEW SECTION. Section 65. Exemption of materials becoming part of out-of-state signage or
advertising. The use in this state of tangible personal property and any product transferred electronically that
becomes an integral and component part of a final product manufactured by a business classified in signs and
advertising specialties that is installed by the manufacturer outside of this state is exempt from the tax imposed
by [sections 45 through 89].

NEW SECTION. Section 66. Prima facie evidence of taxability. For the purpose of the proper
administration of [sections 45 through 89] and to prevent the evasion of the tax:
(1) evidence that tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically was sold by
any person for delivery in this state is prima facie evidence that the tangible personal property or the product
transferred electronically was sold for use in this state; and
(2) evidence that a service is used in this state is prima facie evidence that the service is subject to
tax.

NEW SECTION. Section 67. Money paid as evidence of value of service. (1) Except as provided
in subsection (2), in determining the amount of tax due on the use of a service, it is presumed, in the absence
of preponderant evidence of another value, that the value means the total amount of money or the reasonable
- 49 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
value of other consideration paid for the service exclusive of any type of time-price differential.
(2) In an exchange in which the amount paid does not represent the value of the service
purchased, the tax must be imposed on the reasonable value of the service purchased.

NEW SECTION. Section 68. List of sales of property or sales to residents. If property is delivered
to this state or the beneficial use of the service occurs in this state, the person selling the property or services to
residents of this state shall provide a list of the sales to the department. The list must include the names and
addresses of the purchasers and the amount of the sale. The department shall pay to any person furnishing a
list under this section an amount equal to the reasonable cost of reproducing the list.

NEW SECTION. Section 69. Collection of tax by retailer maintaining place of business in state.
(1) Any retailer maintaining a place of business in this state and making sales of tangible personal property or
any product transferred electronically or services for storage, use, or other consumption in this state not
exempted under the provisions of [sections 45 through 89] shall, at the time of making a sale, whether within or
without the state, collect the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89] from the purchaser and give to the
purchaser a receipt in the manner and form prescribed by the department.
(2) The retailer shall list with the department the name and address of all the retailer's agents
operating in this state and the location of any of the retailer's distribution or sales houses or offices or other
places of business in this state.

NEW SECTION. Section 70. Semiannual report of sales by retailer maintaining place of
business in state. (1) Each retailer maintaining a place of business in this state and making sales of tangible
personal property or any product transferred electronically for storage, use, or other consumption in this state
shall, twice annually, furnish the department with a report covering the 6-month period just preceding the
submission of the report.
(2) The report must contain:
(a) the names and addresses of all persons within the state who have made purchases of tangible
personal property or any product transferred electronically from the retailer for use, storage, or consumption;
- 50 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
and
(b) the total amount of the purchase price of all personal property purchased during the period.
(3) The report is not required to include any information on the sale of tangible personal property
or any product transferred electronically if exempt under [sections 45 through 89].

NEW SECTION. Section 71. Permit for collection of tax by retailer not maintaining place of
business in state -- security for collection. (1) The department may, on application, authorize the collection
of the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89] by any retailer not maintaining a place of business within this
state who, to the satisfaction of the department, furnishes adequate security to ensure collection and payment
of the tax.
(2) The retailer must be issued, without charge, a permit to collect the tax subject to requirements
the department may prescribe by rule.
(3) If authorized, the retailer shall collect the tax on any tangible personal property or any product
transferred electronically sold to the retailer's knowledge for use, storage, or other consumption within this state
in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as a retailer maintaining a place of business within
this state.
(4) The authority and permit may be canceled if, at any time, the department considers the security
inadequate or that the tax can more effectively be collected from the person using the property in this state.

NEW SECTION. Section 72. Collection and remittance of tax by retailer. The tax on the use,
storage, or other consumption of all tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically that is
sold by a retailer maintaining a place of business in this state or by a retailer authorized by the department
pursuant to [section 71] must be collected by the retailer and remitted to the department as provided in
[sections 73 through 78].

NEW SECTION. Section 73. Surety bond filed by retailer. In order to ensure the collection of the
tax levied under [sections 45 through 89], the department may authorize a person subject to the tax and a
retailer required or authorized to collect the tax to file with the department a bond issued by a surety company
- 51 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
to secure the payment of any tax or penalties due or that may become due. The surety company must be
authorized to transact business in this state and approved by the department. The bond must be in the amount
required by the department.

NEW SECTION. Section 74. Securities deposited by retailer in lieu of bond. The department may
approve securities in lieu of a bond. Securities deposited with the department must be kept in the custody of the
department and may be sold at public or private sale, without notice to the depositor, if it becomes necessary to
do so to recover a tax or penalties due. If a security is sold for more than the amount due, the surplus must be
returned to the person who deposited the securities.

NEW SECTION. Section 75. Tax collected as debt of retailer. The tax required to be collected by
any retailer pursuant to [sections 69 through 71] constitutes a debt owed by the retailer to this state.

NEW SECTION. Section 76. Time for filing of return and payment of tax -- extension. (1) A
person required to pay or a retailer required or authorized to collect the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89]
shall, except as otherwise provided in this section, file a return and pay any tax due to the department on or
before the 20th day of the month following each monthly period. The return must be filed on forms prescribed
and furnished by the department.
(2) If the person or retailer remits the tax by electronic transfer to the state, the person or retailer
shall file the return by electronic means on or before the 20th day of the month following each period and remit
the tax on or before the 25th day of the month following each period.
(3) The department may require or allow a person or retailer to file a return and pay any tax due on
a basis other than monthly. The return and remittance are due the 20th day of the month following the reporting
period or at a time otherwise determined by the department.
(4) The department may grant an extension of not more than 5 days for filing a return and
remittance.
(5) Unless an extension is granted, a person or retailer is subject to the penalty and interest
provisions of 15-1-216 if a return or remittance is not made on time.
- 52 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1

NEW SECTION. Section 77. Contents of return -- remittance. (1) At the time specified in [section
76], the person or retailer shall file with the department a return for the preceding reporting period in a form
prescribed by the department showing the sales price of any tangible personal property, any product
transferred electronically, or services sold by the retailer during the preceding reporting period, the use,
storage, or consumption of which is subject to the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89], and other
information required by the department. Each return must be accompanied by a remittance of the amount of tax
due for the period covered by the return.
(2) Returns must be signed by the retailer or the retailer's authorized agent and must be certified
by the retailer to be correct.

NEW SECTION. Section 78. Amounts of tax paid on conditional sales or installment contract
receipts. If tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically is sold under a conditional sales
contract or under any other form of sale for which the payment of the principal sum, or a part of the principal
sum, is extended over a period longer than 60 days from the date of the sale, the retailer may collect and remit
for each month that portion of the tax equal to the rate of tax as provided for in [sections 45 through 89] of that
portion of the purchase price actually received during the month.

NEW SECTION. Section 79. Direct payment of tax by user. (1) The tax on the use, storage, or
consumption of any tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically not paid pursuant to
[section 72] must be paid to the department directly by any person using the property within this state.
(2) Any person who uses, stores, or otherwise consumes any property or services subject to tax by
[sections 45 through 89] on which the tax has not been paid, either to a retailer or directly to the department, is
liable for the tax and shall, on or before the time specified in [section 76], pay the tax on all the property used by
the person during the preceding month as required by [section 76]. The provisions of [sections 76 through 79],
with reference to returns and payments, are applicable to the returns and payments required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Section 80. Administration and enforcement -- sales tax collection provisions
- 53 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
applicable. The department shall enforce and administer [sections 45 through 89] in the same manner and
subject to all of the provisions contained in [sections 1 through 44].

NEW SECTION. Section 81. Determination of tax by department in absence of correct return. If
any return required by [sections 45 through 89] is not filed, or if any return when filed is incorrect or insufficient,
and the maker or person from whom it is due fails to file a corrected or sufficient return within 10 days after the
time required by notice from the department, the department shall determine the amount due.

NEW SECTION. Section 82. Department's certificate as prima facie evidence of failure to file
return or pay tax. The certificate of the department to the effect that a tax or amount required to be paid by
[sections 45 through 89] has not been paid, that a return has not been filed, or that information has not been
supplied pursuant to the provisions of [sections 45 through 89] is prima facie evidence that the tax or amount
has not been paid.

NEW SECTION. Section 83. Records maintained by retailers and users. (1) Each retailer required
or authorized to collect taxes imposed by [sections 45 through 89] and each person using, storing, or otherwise
consuming in this state tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically shall keep records,
receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers as required by the department in the form required by the
department.
(2) The department and its authorized agents may examine the books, papers, records, and
equipment of any person either selling tangible personal property or products transferred electronically or liable
for the tax imposed by [sections 45 through 89] and investigate the character of the person's business in order
to verify the accuracy of any return made or to determine the amount due under the provisions of [sections 45
through 89].
(3) Any books, papers, and records must be made available within this state for examination on
reasonable notice by the department.

NEW SECTION. Section 84. Revocation of retailer's sales tax permit on failure to comply. (1) If
- 54 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
a retailer maintaining a place of business in this state, who is authorized to collect the tax imposed pursuant to
[section 71], fails to comply with the provisions of [sections 45 through 89] or orders or rules of the department,
the department may, on notice and hearing, revoke the permit by order.
(2) The department may not authorize a revocation order until the retailer is given an opportunity to
be heard and show cause why the order should not be made and must be given 10 days' notice of the time,
place, and purpose of the hearing. The notice must be served in the manner provided for service of summons
in civil actions.
(3) The department may restore a revoked permit at its discretion.

NEW SECTION. Section 85. Personal liability of officers, managers, or partners of entity failing
to file returns or pay tax. (1) If a corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, or limited liability limited partnership subject to tax under [sections 45 through 89] fails for any
reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, any of the corporate officers, member-managers or
managers of limited liability companies or partners of partnerships that control, supervise, or are charged with
the responsibility of filing the returns or remitting tax payments are personally liable for the failure.
(2) The dissolution of a corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, or limited liability limited partnership does not discharge an officer, member-manager, manager, or
partner's liability for a prior failure of the corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, or limited liability limited partnership to file a return or remit the tax due. The sum due for a liability
may be assessed and collected as provided by law.
(3) If the corporate officers, limited liability company member-managers or managers, or partners
elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the corporation,
limited liability company, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited liability limited partnership
shall provide the department with a surety bond or certificate of deposit as security for payment of any tax that
may become due. The bond or certificate of deposit provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to
the estimated annual gross receipts multiplied by the applicable sales or excise tax rate.

NEW SECTION. Section 86. Department authorized to issue direct payment permits to certain
- 55 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
retailers -- rulemaking. (1) The department may authorize a retailer to use a direct payment permit if the
retailer purchases goods or services subject to the tax imposed by [sections 1 through 44]. Applicants for a
direct payment permit must apply in writing to the department.
(2) A retailer may appeal the denial of a direct payment permit or contest a revocation of a direct
payment permit.
(3) A retailer that makes a sale to a direct payment permit holder has no liability for sales tax on
the sale if the retailer has written evidence of the sale. The written evidence must clearly indicate the name of
the buyer, the product or service purchased, and the amount of the purchase.
(4) The department may adopt rules concerning the administration and use of a direct payment
permit.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "direct payment permit" means a permit issued by the
department that allows a holder of the permit to accrue and pay the taxes imposed by [sections 1 through 44]
directly to the department.

NEW SECTION. Section 87. Relief from liability for failing to report tax at new rate --
conditions. (1) A retailer is relieved of any liability for failing to report a tax pursuant to [sections 45 through 89]
at the new effective rate if the state fails to provide a period of at least 30 days between enactment of the
statute providing for a rate change and the effective date of the rate change if:
(a) the retailer reported the tax at the immediately preceding effective rate; and
(b) the retailer's failure to report at the newly effective rate does not extend beyond 30 days after
the date of enactment of the new rate.
(2) This section does not apply if the retailer fraudulently failed to report the tax at the new rate.

NEW SECTION. Section 88. Rulemaking authority. The department may adopt rules pursuant to
[sections 45 through 89] concerning:
(1) licensing, including bonding and filing license applications;
(2) the filing of returns and payment of the tax;
(3) determining the application of the tax and exemptions;
- 56 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(4) forms for exemption certificates;
(5) taxpayer recordkeeping requirements; and
(6) determining audit methods.

NEW SECTION. Section 89. Use tax proceeds. All money collected under [sections 45 through 89]
must, in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited by the department IN the school equalization
and property tax reduction account provided for in 20-9-336.

NEW SECTION. Section 90. Short title. [Sections 90 through 102] must be known as and referred to
as the Uniform Sales and Use Tax Administration Act.

NEW SECTION. Section 91. Definitions. For the purposes of [sections 90 through 102], the
following definitions apply:
(1) "Agreement" means the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(2) "Certified automated system" means software certified jointly by the states that are signatories
to the agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a transaction, determine the amount of
tax to remit to the appropriate state, and maintain a record of the transaction.
(3) "Certified service provider" means an agent certified jointly by the states that are signatories to
the agreement to perform all of the seller's sales tax functions.
(4) "Person" means an individual, trust, estate, fiduciary, partnership, limited liability company,
limited liability partnership, corporation, or any other legal entity.
(5) "Sales tax" means the tax levied under [sections 1 through 44].
(6) "Seller" means any person making sales, leases, or rentals of personal property or services.
(7) "State" means any state of the United States and the District of Columbia.
(8) "Use tax" means the tax levied under [sections 45 through 89].

NEW SECTION. Section 92. Legislative findings. The legislature finds that this state should enter
into an agreement with one or more states to simplify and modernize sales and use tax administration in order
- 57 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
to substantially reduce the burden of tax compliance for all sellers and for all types of commerce.

NEW SECTION. Section 93. Authority to enter agreement. (1) The department is authorized and
directed to enter into the streamlined sales and use tax agreement with one or more states to simplify and
modernize sales and use tax administration in order to substantially reduce the burden of tax compliance for all
sellers and for all types of commerce. In furtherance of the agreement, the department is authorized to act
jointly with other states that are members of the agreement to establish standards for certification of a certified
service provider and certified automated system and establish performance standards for multistate sellers.
(2) The department is authorized to take other actions reasonably required to implement the
provisions of [sections 90 through 102]. Other actions authorized by [sections 90 through 102] include but are
not limited to the adoption of rules consistent with the department's rulemaking authority in [sections 43 and 88]
and the joint procurement, with other member states, of goods and services in furtherance of the cooperative
agreement.
(3) The department or the department's designee is authorized to represent this state before the
other states that are signatories to the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Section 94. Relationship to state law. No provision of the agreement authorized
by [sections 90 through 102] in whole or in part invalidates or amends any provision of the laws of this state.
Adoption of the agreement by this state does not amend or modify any law of this state. Implementation of any
condition of the agreement in this state, whether adopted before, at, or after membership of this state in the
agreement, must be by the action of this state.

NEW SECTION. Section 95. Agreement requirements. (1) The department may not enter into the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement unless the agreement requires each state to abide by the
requirements of this section.
(2) The agreement must set restrictions to achieve over time more uniform state rates through the
following:
(a) limiting the number of state rates;
- 58 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(b) limiting the application of maximums on the amount of state tax that is due on a transaction;
and
(c) limiting the application of thresholds on the application of state tax.
(3) The agreement must establish uniform standards for the following:
(a) the sourcing of transactions to taxing jurisdictions;
(b) the administration of exempt sales;
(c) the allowances a seller may take for bad debts; and
(d) sales and use tax returns and remittances.
(4) The agreement must require states to develop and adopt uniform definitions of sales and use
tax terms. The definitions must enable a state to preserve its ability to make policy choices not inconsistent with
the uniform definitions.
(5) The agreement must provide a central, electronic registration system that allows a seller to
register to collect and remit sales and use taxes for all signatory states.
(6) The agreement must provide that registration with the central registration system and the
collection of sales and use taxes in the signatory states will not be used as a factor in determining whether the
seller has nexus with a state for any tax
(7) The agreement must provide for reduction of the burdens of complying with local sales and use
taxes through the following:
(a) restricting variances between the state and local tax bases;
(b) requiring states to administer any sales and use taxes levied by local jurisdictions within the
state so that sellers collecting and remitting these taxes will not have to register or file returns with, remit funds
to, or be subject to independent audits from local taxing jurisdictions;
(c) restricting the frequency of changes in the local sales and use tax rates and setting effective
dates for the application of local jurisdictional boundary changes to local sales and use taxes; and
(d) providing notice of changes in local sales and use tax rates and of changes in the boundaries
of local taxing jurisdictions.
(8) The agreement must outline any monetary allowances that are to be provided by the states to
sellers or certified service providers.
- 59 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(9) The agreement must require each state to certify compliance with the terms of the agreement
prior to joining and to maintain compliance, under the laws of the member state, with all provisions of the
agreement while a member.
(10) The agreement must require each state to adopt a uniform policy for certified service providers
that protects the privacy of consumers and maintains the confidentiality of tax information.
(11) The agreement must provide for the appointment of an advisory council of private sector
representatives and an advisory council of nonmember state representatives to consult with in the
administration of the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Section 96. Cooperating sovereigns. The agreement authorized by [sections 90
through 102] is an accord among individual cooperating sovereigns in furtherance of their governmental
functions. The agreement provides a mechanism among the member states to establish and maintain a
cooperative, simplified system for the application and administration of sales and use taxes under the duly
adopted law of each member state.

NEW SECTION. Section 97. Seller and third-party liability. (1) A certified service provider is the
agent of a seller, with whom the certified service provider has contracted, for the collection and remittance of
sales and use taxes. As the seller's agent, the certified service provider is liable for sales and use tax due each
member state on all sales transactions it processes for the seller except as set out in this section.
(2) A seller that contracts with a certified service provider is not liable to the state for sales or use
tax due on transactions processed by the certified service provider unless the seller misrepresented the type of
items it sells or committed fraud. In the absence of probable cause to believe that the seller has committed
fraud or made a material misrepresentation, the seller is not subject to audit on the transactions processed by
the certified service provider. A seller is subject to audit for transactions not processed by the certified service
provider. The member states acting jointly may perform a system check of the seller and review the seller's
procedures to determine if the certified service provider's system is functioning properly and the extent to which
the seller's transactions are being processed by the certified service provider.
(3) A person that provides a certified automated system is responsible for the proper functioning of
- 60 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
that system and is liable to the state for underpayments of tax attributable to errors in the functioning of the
certified automated system. A seller that uses a certified automated system remains responsible and is liable to
the state for reporting and remitting tax.
(4) A seller that has a proprietary system for determining the amount of tax due on transactions
and has signed an agreement establishing a performance standard for that system is liable for the failure of the
system to meet the performance standard.

NEW SECTION. Section 98. Seller registering to collect sales and use tax not liable for
uncollected tax -- exception. A seller who registers to pay or to collect and remit applicable Montana sales or
use tax in accordance with the terms of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement is not liable for any
uncollected or unpaid sales or use tax, penalty, or interest, unless the seller was registered in this state during
the 12-month period preceding the date the state is found in compliance with the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement. For any seller who is not obligated to collect and remit the tax imposed under [sections 1 through
44, 45 through 89, and 117 through 124], the amnesty period provided by this section ends 12 months after the
date the streamlined sales tax governing board has determined that adequate certified service providers and
certified automated systems are available.

NEW SECTION. Section 99. Assessment for uncollected tax prohibited for period seller not
registered if registration occurs as required. The provisions of [section 98] preclude assessment for any
uncollected or unpaid sales or use tax, penalty, or interest for sales made during the period the seller was not
registered in the state if registration occurs within 12 months of the date the state is found in compliance with
the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

NEW SECTION. Section 100. Provisions not applicable to matters relating to unresolved audits
or paid taxes. The provisions of [section 98] do not apply to any seller with respect to any matter or matters for
which the seller received notice of the commencement of an audit and the audit is not yet finally resolved,
including any related administrative and judicial processes. The provisions of [section 98] do not apply to any
sales or use taxes already paid or remitted to the state or to taxes collected by the seller.
- 61 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1

NEW SECTION. Section 101. Effectiveness of unresolved audit provisions -- requirements --
statute of limitations. Absent the seller's fraud or intentional misrepresentation of a material fact, the
provisions of [section 98] are fully effective if the seller remains registered and continues payment or collection
and remittance of applicable sales or use taxes for a period of at least 36 months from the date of the seller's
original registration. The state's statute of limitations applicable to asserting a tax liability is tolled during this 36-
month period.

NEW SECTION. Section 102. Provisions applicable to taxes due from seller in capacity as
seller. The provisions of [section 98] are applicable only to sales or use taxes due from a seller in its capacity
as a seller and not to sales or use taxes due from a seller in its capacity as a buyer.

NEW SECTION. Section 103. Certain sellers located outside of state required to collect and
remit sales taxes. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any seller selling tangible personal property,
products transferred electronically, or services for delivery into the state, who does not have a physical
presence in the state, is subject to [sections 1 through 44, 45 through 89, and 117 through 124], shall remit the
sales tax, and shall follow all applicable procedures and requirements of law as if the seller had a physical
presence in the state, provided the seller meets either of the following criteria in the previous calendar year or
the current calendar year:
(1) the seller's gross revenue from the sale of tangible personal property, any product transferred
electronically, or services delivered into the state exceeds $100,000; or
(2) the seller sold tangible personal property, any product transferred electronically, or services for
delivery into the state in 200 or more separate transactions.

NEW SECTION. Section 104. Definitions. For the purposes of [sections 104 through 107], the
following definitions apply:
(1) "Marketplace" means any means by which any marketplace seller sells or offers for sale
tangible personal property, products transferred electronically, or services for delivery into this state, regardless
- 62 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
of whether the marketplace seller has a physical presence in this state.
(2) "Marketplace provider" means any person that facilitates a sale for a marketplace seller
through a marketplace by:
(a) offering for sale by the marketplace seller, by any means, tangible personal property, products
transferred electronically, or services for delivery into this state; and
(b) directly, or indirectly through any agreement or arrangement with third parties, collecting
payment from a purchaser and transmitting the payment to the marketplace seller, regardless of whether the
person receives compensation or other consideration in exchange for facilitating the sale or providing any other
service.
(3) "Marketplace seller" means a retailer that sells or offers for sale tangible personal property,
products transferred electronically, or services for delivery into this state through a marketplace that is owned,
operated, or controlled by a marketplace provider.
(4) "Person" has the meaning provided in [section 1].
(5) "Retailer" has the meaning provided in [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 105. Certain marketplace providers required to collect and remit sales
tax. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a marketplace provider is subject to [sections 1 through 44, 45
through 89, and 117 through 124], and shall collect and remit sales tax on all sales of tangible personal
property, products transferred electronically, or services for delivery into this state that the marketplace provider
makes or facilitates for a marketplace seller if the marketplace provider:
(1) is a seller subject to [section 103];
(2) facilitates the sales of at least one marketplace seller that is subject to [section 103]; or
(3) facilitates the sales of two or more marketplace sellers that, when the sales are combined, are
subject to [section 103], even if the marketplace sellers are not separately or individually subject to [section
103].

NEW SECTION. Section 106. Sale for resale. A marketplace seller making a sale through a
marketplace provider that is subject to the provisions of [sections 104 through 107] shall consider the sale as a
- 63 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
sale for resale.

NEW SECTION. Section 107. Failure to collect or remit sales tax -- relief from liability. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (2), a marketplace provider that fails to collect or remit sales tax as provided
in [section 105] may be relieved of liability if the failure was due to incorrect or insufficient information provided
to the marketplace provider by a marketplace seller. The relief provided by this section may not exceed 5% of
the total sales tax due on all sales into this state that are facilitated by a marketplace provider for marketplace
sellers in a calendar year.
(2) The provisions of this section do not apply to any sales for which the marketplace provider is
affiliated with the marketplace seller. A marketplace provider and a marketplace seller are affiliated if:
(a) either owns more than 5% of the other; or
(b) both are subject to the control of a common entity that owns more than 5% of each.

NEW SECTION. Section 108. Definition of terms related to sales of property, services, and
products transferred electronically. For the purposes of [sections 108 through 116], the following definitions
apply:
(1) "De minimis online auction website" means any online auction website that facilitates total
gross sales in Montana in the prior calendar year of less than $100,000 and reasonably expects Montana sales
in the current calendar year will be less than $100,000.
(2) "De minimis retailer" means any noncollecting retailer that made total gross sales in Montana in
the prior calendar year of less than $100,000 and reasonably expects Montana sales in the current calendar
year will be less than $100,000.
(3) "Montana purchaser" means any purchaser that purchases tangible personal property,
services, or products transferred electronically to be shipped or transferred to Montana.
(4) "Noncollecting retailer" means any retailer, not currently registered to collect and remit Montana
sales and use tax, who makes sales of tangible personal property, services, and products transferred
electronically from a place of business outside of Montana to be shipped to Montana for use, storage, or
consumption and who is not required to collect Montana sales or use taxes.
- 64 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(5) "Online auction website" means a collection of web pages on the internet that allows any
person to display tangible personal property, services, or products transferred electronically for sale that is
purchased through a competitive process for which a participant places a bid with the highest bidder purchasing
the property, service, or product when the bidding period ends.

NEW SECTION. Section 109. Notice of use tax due on purchases of tangible personal property,
services, or products transferred electronically. Pursuant to [sections 108 through 116], each noncollecting
retailer shall give notice that Montana use tax is due on nonexempt purchases of tangible personal property,
services, or products transferred electronically and must be paid by the Montana purchaser. The notice must be
readily visible and contain the information as follows:
(1) the noncollecting retailer is not required to, and does not collect, Montana sales or use tax;
(2) the purchase is subject to state use tax unless it is specifically exempt from taxation;
(3) the purchase is not exempt merely because the purchase is made over the internet, by catalog,
or by other remote means;
(4) the state requires each Montana purchaser to report any purchase that was not taxed and pay
tax on the purchase. The tax may be reported and paid on the Montana use tax form.
(5) the use tax form and corresponding instructions are available on the Montana department of
revenue website.

NEW SECTION. Section 110. Notice on website or in catalog. (1) The notice required by [section
109] on a website must be on a page necessary to facilitate the applicable transaction. The notice is sufficient if
the noncollecting retailer provides a prominent linking notice that reads as follows: "See important Montana
sales and use tax information regarding the tax you may owe directly to the State of Montana." The prominent
linking notice must direct the purchaser to the principal notice information required by [section 109].
(2) The notice required by [section 109] in a catalog must be part of the order form. The notice is
sufficient if the noncollecting retailer provides a prominent reference to a supplemental page that reads as
follows: "See important Montana sales and use tax information regarding the tax you may owe directly to the
State of Montana on page ____." The notice on the order form must direct the purchaser to the page that
- 65 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
includes the principal notice required by [section 109].

NEW SECTION. Section 111. Invoice notice for internet or catalog purchase. (1) For any internet
purchase made pursuant to [sections 108 through 116], the invoice notice must be on the electronic order
confirmation. The notice is sufficient if the noncollecting retailer provides a prominent linking notice that reads
as follows: "See important Montana sales and use tax information regarding the tax you may owe directly to the
State of Montana." The invoice notice link must direct the purchaser to the principal notice required by [section
109]. If the noncollecting retailer does not issue an electronic order confirmation, the complete notice must be
placed on the purchase order, bill, receipt, sales slip, order form, or packing statement.
(2) For any catalog or phone purchase made pursuant to [sections 108 through 116], the complete
notice must be placed on the purchase order, bill, receipt, sales slip, order form, or packing statement.

NEW SECTION. Section 112. Notice on checkout page for internet purchase fulfills
requirements. (1) For any internet purchase made pursuant to [sections 108 through 116], notice on the
checkout page fulfills both the website and invoice notice requirements simultaneously. The notice is sufficient if
the noncollecting retailer provides a prominent linking notice that reads as follows: "See important Montana
sales and use tax information regarding the tax you may owe directly to the State of Montana." The checkout
page notice link must direct the purchaser to the principal notice required by [section 109].
(2) If a retailer is required to provide a similar notice for another state in addition to Montana, the
retailer may provide a consolidated notice so long as the notice includes the information contained in [section
109], specifically references Montana, and meets the placement requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Section 113. Displays to be accompanied by notice of tax due. (1) A
noncollecting retailer may not state or display or imply that no tax is due on any Montana purchase unless the
display is accompanied by the notice required by [section 109] each time the display appears. If a summary of
the transaction includes a line designated "sales tax" and shows the amount of sales tax as zero, this
constitutes a display implying that no tax is due on the purchase. This display must be accompanied by the
notice required by [section 109] each time it appears.
- 66 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(2) Notwithstanding the limitation in this section, if a noncollecting retailer knows that a purchase is
exempt from Montana tax pursuant to Montana law, the noncollecting retailer may display or indicate that no
sales or use tax is due even if the display is not accompanied by the notice required by [section 109].

NEW SECTION. Section 114. Online auction websites. With the exception of notification on an
invoice, the provisions of [sections 108 through 116] apply to online auction websites.

NEW SECTION. Section 115. De minimis retailers and de minimis online auction websites. A de
minimis retailer and a de minimis online auction website are exempt from the notice requirements provided by
[sections 108 through 116].

NEW SECTION. Section 116. Criminal penalty or civil liability not applicable. No criminal penalty
or civil liability may be applied or assessed for failure to comply with the provisions of [sections 108 through
116].

Section 117. Section 7-15-4286, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-15-4286. Procedure to determine and disburse tax increment -- remittance of excess portion
of tax increment for targeted economic development district. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsection
(1)(b), mill rates of taxing bodies for taxes levied after the effective date of the tax increment provision must be
calculated on the basis of the sum of the taxable value, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll, of all
taxable property located outside the urban renewal area or targeted economic development district and the
base taxable value of all taxable property located within the area or district. The mill rate determined must be
levied against the sum of the actual taxable value of all taxable property located within as well as outside the
area or district.
(b) If a mill levy is excluded from the tax increment calculation pursuant to subsections (2)(b)
through (2)(d), the calculation pursuant to subsection (1)(a) must use the total taxable value of all property
located within the area or district.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsections (2)(b) through (2)(d) and (3), the tax increment, if any,
- 67 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
received in each year from the levy of the combined mill rates of all the affected taxing bodies against the
incremental taxable value within the area or district must be paid into a special fund held by the treasurer of the
local government and used as provided in 7-15-4282 through 7-15-4294.
(b) For targeted economic development districts and urban renewal areas created before April 6,
2017, the combined mill rates used to calculate the tax increment may not include the mill rates for the
university system mills levied pursuant to 15-10-109 and 20-25-439.
(c) For targeted economic development districts created on or after April 6, 2017, and before July
1, 2022, and urban renewal areas created on or after April 6, 2017, the combined mill rates used to calculate
the tax increment may not include mill rates for:
(i) the university system mills levied pursuant to 15-10-109 and 20-25-439; and
(ii) a new mill levy approved by voters as provided in 15-10-425 after the adoption of a tax
increment provision.
(d) For targeted economic development districts created after June 30, 2022, the combined mill
rates used to calculate the tax increment may not include mill rates for:
(i) the university system mills levied pursuant to 15-10-109 and 20-25-439;
(ii) one-half of the elementary, high school, and state equalization mills levied pursuant to 20-9-
331, 20-9-333, and 20-9-360 ;
(iii) (ii) a new mill levy approved by voters as provided in 15-10-425 after the adoption of a tax
increment provision; and
(iv) (iii) any portion of an existing mill levy designated by the local government as excluded from the tax
increment.
(3) (a) Subject to 7-15-4287 and subsection (3)(b) of this section, a targeted economic
development district with a tax increment provision adopted after October 1, 2019, may expend or accumulate
tax increment for:
(i) the payment of the costs listed in 7-15-4288;
(ii) the cost of issuing bonds; or
(iii) any pledge to the payment of the principal of any premium, if any, and interest on the bonds
issued pursuant to 7-15-4289 and sufficient to fund any reserve fund in respect of the bonds in an amount not
- 68 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
to exceed 125% of the maximum principal and interest on the bonds in any year during the term of the bonds.
(b) Any excess tax increment remaining after the use or accumulation of funds as set forth in
subsection (3)(a) must be:
(i) remitted to each taxing jurisdiction for which the mill rates are included in the calculation of the
tax increment as provided in subsections (1) and (2); and
(ii) proportional to the taxing jurisdiction's share of the total mills levied.
(c) A targeted economic development district is not subject to the provisions of this subsection (3)
if bonds have not been issued to finance the project.
(4) Any portion of the excess tax increment remitted to a school district pursuant to subsection (3)
is subject to the provisions of 7-15-4291(2) through (5).
(5) The balance of the taxes collected in each year must be paid to each of the taxing bodies as
otherwise provided by law."

Section 118. Section 15-1-409, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-1-409. Exclusion of certain property subject to property tax protest -- guaranteed tax base -
- tax refund. (1) A school district that has centrally assessed property subject to pending property tax protests
shall, prior to February 1 of each year, elect whether to waive the school district's right to receive its portion of
protested taxes under 15-1-402(5)(b) for the previous year.
(2) If the school district elects to waive its right to its portion of the protested taxes under
subsection (1), the district's guaranteed tax base aid calculated under 20-9-366 must be determined based on
the total taxable value of property in the school district less the taxable value of the centrally assessed property
for which a school district waived its right to receive its portion of protested taxes. Upon On settlement or other
resolution of the protest, the department is responsible for refunding protested taxes or paying any other costs
due the protesting taxpayer and retaining any portion of protested taxes that would have been distributed to the
school district for each year the school district has elected to waive receiving its portion of the protested taxes.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "centrally assessed property" means property that is centrally
assessed pursuant to 15-23-101 and industrial property that is assessed annually by the department."

- 69 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
Section 119. Section 15-10-420, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-10-420. Procedure for calculating levy. (1) (a) Subject to the provisions of this section, a
governmental entity that is authorized to impose mills may impose a mill levy sufficient to generate the amount
of property taxes actually assessed in the prior year plus one-half of the average rate of inflation for the prior 3
years. The maximum number of mills that a governmental entity may impose is established by calculating the
number of mills required to generate the amount of property tax actually assessed in the governmental unit in
the prior year based on the current year taxable value, less the current year's newly taxable value, plus one-half
of the average rate of inflation for the prior 3 years.
(b) A governmental entity that does not impose the maximum number of mills authorized under
subsection (1)(a) may carry forward the authority to impose the number of mills equal to the difference between
the actual number of mills imposed and the maximum number of mills authorized to be imposed. The mill
authority carried forward may be imposed in a subsequent tax year.
(c) For the purposes of subsection (1)(a), the department shall calculate one-half of the average
rate of inflation for the prior 3 years by using the consumer price index, U.S. city average, all urban consumers,
using the 1982-84 base of 100, as published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of
labor.
(2) A governmental entity may apply the levy calculated pursuant to subsection (1)(a) plus any
additional levies authorized by the voters, as provided in 15-10-425, to all property in the governmental unit,
including newly taxable property.
(3) (a) For purposes of this section, newly taxable property includes:
(i) annexation of real property and improvements into a taxing unit;
(ii) construction, expansion, or remodeling of improvements;
(iii) transfer of property into a taxing unit;
(iv) subdivision of real property; and
(v) transfer of property from tax-exempt to taxable status.
(b) Newly taxable property does not include an increase in value that arises because of an
increase in the incremental value within a tax increment financing district.
(4) (a) For the purposes of subsection (1), the taxable value of newly taxable property includes the
- 70 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
release of taxable value from the incremental taxable value of a tax increment financing district because of:
(i) a change in the boundary of a tax increment financing district;
(ii) an increase in the base value of the tax increment financing district pursuant to 7-15-4287; or
(iii) the termination of a tax increment financing district.
(b) If a tax increment financing district terminates prior to the certification of taxable values as
required in 15-10-202, the increment value is reported as newly taxable property in the year in which the tax
increment financing district terminates. If a tax increment financing district terminates after the certification of
taxable values as required in 15-10-202, the increment value is reported as newly taxable property in the
following tax year.
(c) For the purpose of subsection (3)(a)(ii), the value of newly taxable class four property that was
constructed, expanded, or remodeled property since the completion of the last reappraisal cycle is the current
year market value of that property less the previous year market value of that property.
(d) For the purpose of subsection (3)(a)(iv), the subdivision of real property includes the first sale
of real property that results in the property being taxable as class four property under 15-6-134 or as
nonqualified agricultural land as described in 15-6-133(1)(c).
(5) Subject to subsection (8), subsection (1)(a) does not apply to:
(a) school district levies established in Title 20; or
(b) a mill levy imposed for a newly created regional resource authority.
(6) For purposes of subsection (1)(a), taxes imposed do not include net or gross proceeds taxes
received under 15-6-131 and 15-6-132.
(7) In determining the maximum number of mills in subsection (1)(a), the governmental entity:
(a) may increase the number of mills to account for a decrease in reimbursements; and
(b) may not increase the number of mills to account for a loss of tax base because of legislative
action that is reimbursed under the provisions of 15-1-121(7).
(8) The department shall calculate, on a statewide basis, the number of mills to be imposed for the
purposes of 15-10-109, 20-9-331, 20-9-333, 20-9-360, and 20-25-439. However, the number of mills calculated
by the department may not exceed the mill levy limits established in those sections. The mill calculation must
be established in tenths of mills. If the mill levy calculation does not result in an even tenth of a mill, then the
- 71 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
calculation must be rounded up to the nearest tenth of a mill.
(9) (a) The provisions of subsection (1) do not prevent or restrict:
(i) a judgment levy under 2-9-316, 7-6-4015, or 7-7-2202;
(ii) a levy to repay taxes paid under protest as provided in 15-1-402;
(iii) an emergency levy authorized under 10-3-405, 20-9-168, or 20-15-326;
(iv) a levy for the support of a study commission under 7-3-184;
(v) a levy for the support of a newly established regional resource authority;
(vi) the portion that is the amount in excess of the base contribution of a governmental entity's
property tax levy for contributions for group benefits excluded under 2-9-212 or 2-18-703;
(vii) a levy for reimbursing a county for costs incurred in transferring property records to an
adjoining county under 7-2-2807 upon relocation of a county boundary;
(viii) a levy used to fund the sheriffs' retirement system under 19-7-404(3)(b); or
(ix) a governmental entity from levying mills for the support of an airport authority in existence prior
to May 7, 2019, regardless of the amount of the levy imposed for the support of the airport authority in the past.
The levy under this subsection (9)(a)(ix) is limited to the amount in the resolution creating the authority.
(b) A levy authorized under subsection (9)(a) may not be included in the amount of property taxes
actually assessed in a subsequent year.
(10) A governmental entity may levy mills for the support of airports as authorized in 67-10-402, 67-
11-301, or 67-11-302 even though the governmental entity has not imposed a levy for the airport or the airport
authority in either of the previous 2 years and the airport or airport authority has not been appropriated
operating funds by a county or municipality during that time.
(11) The department may adopt rules to implement this section. The rules may include a method for
calculating the percentage of change in valuation for purposes of determining the elimination of property, new
improvements, or newly taxable value in a governmental unit."

Section 120. Section 15-24-1402, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-24-1402. New or expanding industry -- assessment -- notification. (1) In the first 5 years after
commencement of construction, qualifying improvements or modernized processes that represent new industry
- 72 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
or expansion of an existing industry, as designated in the approving resolution, must be taxed at 25% or 50% of
their taxable value. Subject to 15-10-420, each year thereafter, the percentage must be increased by equal
percentages until the full taxable value is attained in the 10th year. In subsequent years, the property must be
taxed at 100% of its taxable value.
(2) (a) In order for a taxpayer to receive the tax benefits described in subsection (1), the taxpayer
may submit an application for a project with a project plan and receive approval for an abatement prior to
commencement of construction. A taxpayer that does not seek approval prior to commencing construction must
have applied by March 1 of the year during which the benefit is first applicable. The governing body of the
affected county or the incorporated city or town must have approved by separate resolution for each project,
following due notice as provided in 7-1-2121 if a county or 7-1-4127 if an incorporated city or town and a public
hearing, the use of the schedule provided for in subsection (1) for its respective jurisdiction. The governing body
may not grant approval for the project until all of the applicant's taxes have been paid in full. Taxes paid under
protest do not preclude approval. If a taxpayer receives approval of a tax abatement prior to commencement of
construction, the abatement does not extend to property that is outside the scope of the project plan that was
submitted to the governing body with the application.
(b) The governing body shall:
(i) publish due notice within 60 days of receiving a taxpayer's complete application for the tax
treatment provided for in this section; and
(ii) conduct a public hearing regarding an application for the tax treatment provided for in this
section and deny or approve it within 120 days of receiving the application as provided in subsection (2)(b)(i).
(c) If the governing body fails to hold a hearing or deny or approve the application within 120 days
of receiving the application, the applicant may seek from the district court in the jurisdiction in which the county,
city, or town is located a writ of mandamus to compel the governing body to make a determination.
(d) Subject to 15-10-420 and subsection (2)(f) of this section, a tax benefit may not be denied once
approved.
(e) The resolution provided for in subsection (2)(a) must include a definition of the improvements
or modernized processes that qualify for the tax treatment that is to be allowed in the taxing jurisdiction. The
resolution may provide that real property other than land, personal property, improvements, or any combination
- 73 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
thereof is eligible for the tax benefits described in subsection (1).
(f) Property taxes abated from the reduction in taxable value allowed by this section are subject to
termination or recapture by the local governing body if the ownership or use of the property does not meet the
requirements of 15-24-1401, this section, or the resolution required by subsections (2)(a) and (2)(e) of this
section. The recapture is equal to the amount of taxes avoided, plus interest and penalties for nonpayment of
property taxes provided in 15-16-102, during any period in which an abatement under the provisions of this
section was in effect. The amount recaptured, including penalty and interest, must be distributed by the
treasurer to funds and accounts subject to the abatement in the same ratio as the property tax was abated. A
recapture of taxes abated by this section is not allowed with regard to property ceasing to qualify for the
abatement by reason of an involuntary conversion. The recapture of abated taxes may be canceled, in whole or
in part, if the local governing body determines that the taxpayer's failure to meet the requirements is a result of
circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.
(3) The taxpayer shall apply to the department for the tax treatment allowed under subsection (1).
The application by the taxpayer must first be approved by the governing body of the appropriate local taxing
jurisdiction, and the governing body shall indicate in its approval that the property of the applicant qualifies for
the tax treatment provided for in this section. Upon receipt of the form with the approval of the governing body
of the affected taxing jurisdiction, the department shall make the assessment change pursuant to this section.
(4) The tax benefit described in subsection (1) applies only to the number of mills levied and
assessed for local high school district and elementary school district purposes and to the number of mills levied
and assessed by the governing body approving the benefit over which the governing body has sole discretion.
The benefit described in subsection (1) may not apply to levies or assessments required under Title 15, chapter
10, 20-9-331, 20-9-333, or 20-9-360 or otherwise required under state law.
(5) Prior to approving the resolution under this section, the governing body shall notify by certified
mail all taxing jurisdictions affected by the tax benefit.
(6) The taxpayer may terminate an abatement provided pursuant to this section on a form
promulgated by the department."

Section 121. Section 15-24-1703, MCA, is amended to read:
- 74 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
"15-24-1703. Application of suspension or cancellation. The suspension or cancellation of
delinquent property taxes pursuant to this part:
(1) applies to all mills levied in the county or otherwise required under state law, including levies or
assessments required under Title 15, chapter 10, 20-9-331, and 20-9-333;
(2) does not apply to assessments made against property for the payment of bonds issued
pursuant to Title 7, chapter 12."

Section 122. Section 15-24-1802, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-24-1802. Business incubator tax exemption -- procedure. (1) A business incubator owned or
leased and operated by a local economic development organization is eligible for an exemption from property
taxes as provided in this section.
(2) In order for a taxpayer to qualify for the tax exemption described in this section, the taxpayer
must have applied by March 1 of the year during which the benefit is first applicable. The governing body of the
county, consolidated government, incorporated city or town, or school district in which the property is located
shall approve the tax exemption by resolution, after due notice, as provided in 7-1-2121 if a county,
consolidated government, or school district or 7-1-4127 if an incorporated city or town, and hearing. The
governing body may approve or disapprove the tax exemption provided for in subsection (1). If a tax exemption
is approved, the governing body shall do so by a separate resolution for each business incubator in its
respective jurisdiction. The governing body may not grant approval for the business incubator until all of the
applicant's taxes have been paid in full or, if the property is leased to a business incubator, until all of the
owner's property taxes on that property have been paid in full. Taxes paid under protest do not preclude
approval. Prior to holding the hearing, the governing body shall determine that the local economic development
organization:
(a) is a private, nonprofit corporation as provided in Title 35, chapter 2, and is exempt from taxation
under section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(b) is engaged in economic development and business assistance work in the area; and
(c) owns or leases and operates or will operate the business incubator.
(3) (a) The governing body shall:
- 75 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(i) publish due notice within 60 days of receiving a taxpayer's complete application for the tax
treatment provided for in this section; and
(ii) conduct a public hearing regarding an application for the tax treatment provided for in this
section and deny or approve it within 120 days of receiving the application as provided in subsection (3)(a)(i).
(b) If the governing body fails to hold a hearing or deny or approve the application within 120 days
of receiving the application, the applicant may seek from the district court in the jurisdiction in which the county,
consolidated government, city, town, or school district is located a writ of mandamus to compel the governing
body to make a determination.
(4) Upon receipt of approval of the governing body of the affected taxing jurisdiction, the
department shall make the assessment change for the tax exemption provided for in this section.
(5) The tax exemption described in subsection (1) applies only to the number of mills levied and
assessed by the governing body approving the exemption over which the governing body has sole discretion. If
the governing body of a county, consolidated government, or incorporated city or town approves the exemption,
the exemption applies to levies and assessments required under Title 15, chapter 10, 20-9-331, or 20-9-333 or
otherwise required under state law.
(6) Property taxes abated from the reduction in property taxes allowed by this section are subject
to recapture by the local governing body if the ownership or use of the property does not meet the requirements
of 15-24-1801, this section, or the resolution required by subsection (2) of this section. The recapture is equal to
the amount of taxes avoided, plus interest and penalties for nonpayment of property taxes provided in 15-16-
102, during any period in which an abatement under the provisions of this section was in effect. The amount
recaptured, including penalty and interest, must be distributed by the treasurer to funds and accounts subject to
the abatement in the same ratio as the property tax was abated. A recapture of taxes abated by this section is
not allowed with regard to property ceasing to qualify for the abatement by reason of an involuntary conversion.
The recapture of abated taxes may be canceled, in whole or in part, if the local governing body determines that
the taxpayer's failure to meet the requirements is a result of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer."

Section 123. Section 15-24-1902, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-24-1902. Industrial park tax exemption -- procedure -- termination. (1) An industrial park
- 76 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
owned and operated by a local economic development organization or a port authority is eligible for an
exemption from property taxes as provided in this section.
(2) In order for a taxpayer to qualify for the tax exemption described in this section, the taxpayer
must have applied by March 1 of the year during which the benefit is first applicable. The governing body of the
county, consolidated government, incorporated city or town, or school district in which the property is located
shall approve the tax exemption by resolution, after due notice, as provided in 7-1-2121 if a county,
consolidated government, or school district or 7-1-4127 if an incorporated city or town, and hearing. The
governing body may approve or disapprove the tax exemption provided for in subsection (1). If a tax exemption
is approved, the governing body shall do so by a separate resolution for each industrial park in its respective
jurisdiction. The governing body may not grant approval for the industrial park until all of the applicant's taxes
have been paid in full. Taxes paid under protest do not preclude approval. Prior to holding the hearing, the
governing body shall determine that:
(a) the local economic development organization:
(i) is a private, nonprofit corporation as provided in Title 35, chapter 2, and is exempt from taxation
under section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(ii) is engaged in economic development and business assistance work in the area; and
(iii) owns and operates or will own and operate the industrial development park; or
(b) the port authority legally exists under the provisions of 7-14-1101 or 7-14-1102.
(3) (a) The governing body shall:
(i) publish due notice within 60 days of receiving a taxpayer's complete application for the tax
treatment provided for in this section; and
(ii) conduct a public hearing regarding an application for the tax treatment provided for in this
section and deny or approve it within 120 days of receiving the application as provided in subsection (3)(a)(i).
(b) If the governing body fails to hold a hearing or deny or approve the application within 120 days
of receiving the application, the applicant may seek from the district court in the jurisdiction in which the county,
consolidated government, city, town, or school district is located a writ of mandamus to compel the governing
body to make a determination.
(4) Upon receipt of approval of the governing body of the affected taxing jurisdiction, the
- 77 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
department shall make the assessment change for the tax exemption provided for in this section.
(5) The tax exemption described in subsection (1) applies only to the number of mills levied and
assessed by the governing body approving the exemption over which the governing body has sole discretion. If
the governing body of a county, consolidated government, or incorporated city or town approves the exemption,
the exemption applies to levies or assessments required under Title 15, chapter 10, 20-9-331, or 20-9-333 or
otherwise required under state law.
(6) If a local economic development organization sells, leases, or otherwise disposes of the
exempt property to a purchaser or lessee that is not a local economic development organization or a unit of
federal, state, or local government, the tax exemption provided in this section terminates. The termination of the
exemption applies January 1 of the taxable year immediately following the sale, lease, or other disposition of
the property. Upon termination of the exemption, the property must be assessed as provided in 15-16-203.
(7) Property taxes abated from the reduction in property taxes allowed by this section are subject
to recapture by the local governing body if the ownership or use of the property does not meet the requirements
of 15-24-1901, this section, or the resolution required by subsection (2) of this section. The recapture is equal to
the amount of taxes avoided, plus interest and penalties for nonpayment of property taxes provided in 15-16-
102, during any period in which an abatement under the provisions of this section was in effect. The amount
recaptured, including penalty and interest, must be distributed by the treasurer to funds and accounts subject to
the abatement in the same ratio as the property tax was abated. A recapture of taxes abated by this section is
not allowed with regard to property ceasing to qualify for the abatement by reason of an involuntary conversion.
The recapture of abated taxes may be canceled, in whole or in part, if the local governing body determines that
the taxpayer's failure to meet the requirements is a result of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer."

Section 124. Section 15-24-2002, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-24-2002. Building and land tax exemption -- procedure -- termination. (1) A building and land
owned by a local economic development organization that the local economic development organization
intends to sell or lease to a profit-oriented, employment-stimulating business are eligible for an exemption from
property taxes as provided in this section.
(2) In order for a taxpayer to qualify for the tax exemption described in this section, the taxpayer
- 78 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
must have applied by March 1 of the year during which the benefit is first applicable. The governing body of the
affected county, consolidated government, incorporated city or town, or school district in which the building and
land are located shall approve the tax exemption by resolution, after due notice, as provided in 7-1-2121 if a
county, consolidated government, or school district or 7-1-4127 if an incorporated city or town, and hearing. The
governing body may approve or disapprove the tax exemption provided for in subsection (1). The governing
body shall approve a tax exemption by a separate resolution. The governing body may not grant approval for
the building and land until all of the applicant's taxes have been paid in full. Taxes paid under protest do not
preclude approval. Prior to holding the hearing, the governing body shall determine that the local economic
development organization:
(a) is a private, nonprofit corporation, as provided in Title 35, chapter 2, and is exempt from
taxation under section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(b) is engaged in economic development and business assistance work in the area; and
(c) owns or will own the building and land.
(3) (a) The governing body shall:
(i) publish due notice within 60 days of receiving a taxpayer's complete application for the tax
treatment provided for in this section; and
(ii) conduct a public hearing regarding an application for the tax treatment provided for in this
section and deny or approve it within 120 days of receiving the application as provided in subsection (3)(a)(i).
(b) If the governing body fails to hold a hearing or deny or approve the application within 120 days
of receiving the application, the applicant may seek from the district court in the jurisdiction in which the county,
consolidated government, city, town, or school district is located a writ of mandamus to compel the governing
body to make a determination.
(4) Upon receipt of approval of the governing body of the affected taxing jurisdiction, the
department shall make the assessment change for the tax exemption provided for in this section.
(5) The tax exemption described in subsection (1) applies only to the number of mills levied and
assessed by the governing body approving the exemption over which the governing body has sole discretion. If
the governing body of a county, consolidated government, or incorporated city or town approves the exemption,
the exemption applies to levies or assessments required under Title 15, chapter 10, 20-9-331, or 20-9-333 and
- 79 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
other levies required under state law.
(6) When a local economic development organization sells, leases, or otherwise disposes of the
exempt property to a purchaser or lessee that is not a local economic development organization or a unit of
federal, state, or local government, the tax exemption provided in this section terminates. The termination of the
exemption applies January 1 of the taxable year immediately following the sale, lease, or other disposition of
the property. Upon termination of the exemption, the property must be assessed as provided in 15-16-203.
(7) Property taxes abated from the reduction in property taxes allowed by this section are subject
to recapture by the local governing body if the ownership or use of the property does not meet the requirements
of this section or the resolution required by subsection (2). The recapture is equal to the amount of taxes
avoided, plus interest and penalties for nonpayment of property taxes provided in 15-16-102, during any period
in which an abatement under the provisions of this section was in effect. The amount recaptured, including
penalty and interest, must be distributed by the treasurer to funds and accounts subject to the abatement in the
same ratio as the property tax was abated. A recapture of taxes abated by this section is not allowed with
regard to property ceasing to qualify for the abatement by reason of an involuntary conversion. The recapture of
abated taxes may be canceled, in whole or in part, if the local governing body determines that the taxpayer's
failure to meet the requirements is a result of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer."

Section 125. Section 15-39-110, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-39-110. Distribution of taxes. (1) (a) For each semiannual period, the department shall
determine the amount of tax, late payment interest, and penalties collected under this part from bentonite mines
that produced bentonite before January 1, 2005. The tax is distributed as provided in subsections (2) through
(9).
(b) For each semiannual period, the department shall determine the amount of tax, late payment
interest, and penalties collected under this part from bentonite mines that first began producing bentonite after
December 31, 2004. The tax is distributed as provided in subsection (10).
(2) The percentage of the tax determined under subsection (1)(a) and specified in subsections (3)
through (9) is allocated according to the following schedule:
(a) 2.33% to the state special revenue fund to be appropriated to the Montana university system
- 80 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
for the purposes of the state tax levy as provided in 15-10-109;
(b) 18.14% to the state general fund to be appropriated for the purposes of the tax levies as
provided in 20-9-331, 20-9-333, and 20-9-360 school equalization and property tax reduction account provided
for in 20-9-336;
(c) 3.35% to Carbon County to be distributed in proportion to current fiscal year mill levies in the
taxing jurisdictions in which production occurs, except a distribution may not be made for county and state
levies under 15-10-109, 20-9-331, 20-9-333, and 20-9-360; and
(d) 76.18% to Carter County to be distributed in proportion to current fiscal year mill levies in the
taxing jurisdictions in which production occurs, except a distribution may not be made for county and state
levies under 15-10-109, 20-9-331, 20-9-333, and 20-9-360.
(3) For the production of bentonite occurring after December 31, 2008, and before January 1,
2010, 60% of the tax determined under subsection (1)(a) must be distributed as provided in subsection (2) and
40% must be distributed as provided in subsection (10).
(4) For the production of bentonite occurring after December 31, 2009, and before January 1,
2011, 50% of the tax determined under subsection (1)(a) must be distributed as provided in subsection (2) and
50% must be distributed as provided in subsection (10).
(5) For the production of bentonite occurring after December 31, 2010, and before January 1,
2012, 40% of the tax determined under subsection (1)(a) must be distributed as provided in subsection (2) and
60% must be distributed as provided in subsection (10).
(6) For the production of bentonite occurring after December 31, 2011, and before January 1,
2013, 30% of the tax determined under subsection (1)(a) must be distributed as provided in subsection (2) and
70% must be distributed as provided in subsection (10).
(7) For the production of bentonite occurring after December 31, 2012, and before January 1,
2014, 20% of the tax determined under subsection (1)(a) must be distributed as provided in subsection (2) and
80% must be distributed as provided in subsection (10).
(8) For the production of bentonite occurring after December 31, 2013, and before January 1,
2015, 10% of the tax determined under subsection (1)(a) must be distributed as provided in subsection (2) and
90% must be distributed as provided in subsection (10).
- 81 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(9) For the production of bentonite occurring in tax years beginning after December 31, 2014,
100% of the tax determined under subsection (1)(a) must be distributed as provided in subsection (10).
(10) For the production of bentonite, 100% of the tax determined under subsection (1)(b) and the
distribution percentages determined under subsections (3) through (9) are allocated according to the following
schedule:
(a) 1.30% to the state special revenue fund to be appropriated to the Montana university system
for the purposes of the state tax levy as provided in 15-10-109;
(b) 20.75% to the state general fund to be appropriated for the purposes of the tax levies as
provided in 20-9-331, 20-9-333, and 20-9-360 school equalization and property tax reduction account provided
for in 20-9-336;
(c) 77.95% to the county in which production occurred to be distributed in proportion to current
fiscal year mill levies in the taxing jurisdictions in which production occurs, except a distribution may not be
made for county and state levies under 15-10-109, 20-9-331, 20-9-333, and 20-9-360.
(11) Except as provided by subsection (14), the department shall remit the amounts to be
distributed in this section to the county treasurer by the following dates:
(a) On or before October 1 of each year, the department shall remit the county's share of bentonite
production tax payments received for the semiannual period ending June 30 of the current year to the county
treasurer.
(b) On or before April 1 of each year, the department shall remit the county's share of bentonite
production tax payments received to the county treasurer for the semiannual period ending December 31 of the
previous year.
(12) (a) The department shall also provide to each county the amount of gross yield of value from
bentonite, including royalties, for the previous calendar year. Thirty-three and one-third percent of the gross
yield of value must be treated as taxable value for determining school district debt limits under 20-9-406.
(b) The percentage amount of the gross yield of value determined under subsection (12)(a) must
be treated as assessed value under 15-8-111 for the purposes of local government debt limits and other
bonding provisions as provided by law.
(13) The bentonite tax proceeds are statutorily appropriated, as provided in 17-7-502, to the
- 82 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
department for distribution as provided in this section.
(14) A payment required pursuant to this section may be withheld if, for more than 90 days, a local
government fails to:
(a) file a financial report required by 15-1-504;
(b) remit any amounts collected on behalf of the state as required by 15-1-504; or
(c) remit any other amounts owed to the state or another taxing jurisdiction."

Section 126. Section 17-3-213, MCA, is amended to read:
"17-3-213. Allocation of forest reserve funds and other federal funds -- options provided in
federal law. (1) The board of county commissioners in each county shall decide among payment options
provided in subsections (2) through (6), as provided in Public Law 106-393, Public Law 110-343, and any
similar subsequent act to determine how the forest reserve funds, Public Law 106-393, funds, Public Law 110-
343 funds, and funds received pursuant to a similar subsequent act apportioned to each county must be
distributed by the county treasurer pursuant to this section.
(2) If a board of county commissioners chooses to receive a payment that is 25% of the revenue
derived from national forest system lands, as provided in 16 U.S.C. 500 or any similar subsequent act, all funds
received must be distributed as provided in subsection (5).
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (4), if a county elects to receive the county's full payment
under Public Law 106-393 or any similar subsequent act, a minimum of 80% up to a maximum of 85% of the
county's full payment must be designated by the county for distribution as provided in subsection (5).
(b) The balance not distributed pursuant to subsection (3)(a) may be allocated by the county in
accordance with Public Law 106-393 or any similar subsequent act.
(4) If a county's full payment under Public Law 106-393 or any similar subsequent act is less than
$100,000, the county may elect to distribute up to 100% of the payment as provided in subsection (5).
(5) The total amount designated by a county in accordance with subsection (3)(a) or (4) must be
distributed as follows:
(a) to the general road fund, 66 2/3% of the amount designated;
(b) to the following countywide school levies, 33 1/3% of the amount designated:
- 83 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(i) county equalization for elementary schools provided for in 20-9-331 ;
(ii) county equalization for high schools provided for in 20-9-333 ;
(iii) (i) the county transportation fund provided for in 20-10-146; and
(iv) (ii) the elementary and high school district retirement fund obligations provided for in 20-9-501.
(6) The apportionment of money to the funds provided for under subsection (5)(b) must be made
by the county superintendent based on the proportion that the mill levy of each fund bears to the total number
of mills for all the funds. Whenever the total amount of money available for apportionment under subsection
(5)(b) is greater than the total requirements of a levy, the excess money and any interest income must be
retained in a separate reserve fund, to be reapportioned in the ensuing school fiscal year to the levies
designated in subsection (5)(b).
(7) In counties in which special road districts have been created according to law, the board of
county commissioners shall distribute a proportionate share of the 66 2/3% distributed under subsection (5)(a)
for the general road fund to the special road districts within the county based upon the percentage that the total
area of the road district bears to the total area of the entire county.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (9), if a county elects to receive the county's full payment
under Public Law 110-343 or any similar subsequent act, not less than 80% but not more than 85% of the funds
must be expended in the same manner as provided in subsection (5). A county may reserve not more than 7%
of the county's full payment for projects in accordance with Title III of section 601 of Public Law 110-343. The
balance of the funds may be:
(a) reserved for projects in accordance with Title II of section 601 of Public Law 110-343 or any
similar subsequent act; or
(b) returned to the United States.
(9) (a) If a county's full payment is more than $100,000 but less than or equal to $350,000, the
county may use all of the funds as provided in Title II or Title III of section 601 of Public Law 110-343 or any
similar subsequent act, or return the funds to the United States.
(b) If a county's full payment is less than or equal to $100,000, the county may elect to distribute
up to 100% of the payment as provided in subsection (5)."

- 84 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
Section 127. Section 20-3-106, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-3-106. Supervision of schools -- powers and duties. The superintendent of public instruction
has the general supervision of the public schools and districts of the state and shall perform the following duties
or acts in implementing and enforcing the provisions of this title:
(1) resolve any controversy resulting from the proration of costs by a joint board of trustees under
the provisions of 20-3-362;
(2) issue, renew, or deny teacher certification and emergency authorizations of employment;
(3) negotiate reciprocal tuition agreements with other states in accordance with the provisions of
20-5-314;
(4) approve or disapprove the opening or reopening of a school in accordance with the provisions
of 20-6-502, 20-6-503, 20-6-504, or 20-6-505;
(5) approve or disapprove school isolation within the limitations prescribed by 20-9-302;
(6) generally supervise the school budgeting procedures prescribed by law in accordance with the
provisions of 20-9-102 and prescribe the school budget format in accordance with the provisions of 20-9-103
and 20-9-506;
(7) establish a system of communication for calculating joint district revenue in accordance with the
provisions of 20-9-151;
(8) approve or disapprove the adoption of a district's budget amendment resolution under the
conditions prescribed in 20-9-163 and adopt rules for an application for additional direct state aid for a budget
amendment in accordance with the approval and disbursement provisions of 20-9-166;
(9) generally supervise the school financial administration provisions as prescribed by 20-9-201(2);
(10) prescribe and furnish the annual report forms to enable the districts to report to the county
superintendent in accordance with the provisions of 20-9-213(6) and the annual report forms to enable the
county superintendents to report to the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with the provisions of
20-3-209;
(11) approve, disapprove, or adjust an increase of the average number belonging (ANB) in
accordance with the provisions of 20-9-313.
(12) distribute BASE aid and special education allowable cost payments in support of the BASE
- 85 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
funding program in accordance with the provisions of 20-9-331, 20-9-333, 20-9-342, 20-9-346, and 20-9-347,
and 20-9-366 through 20-9-369;
(13) provide for the uniform and equal provision of transportation by performing the duties
prescribed by the provisions of 20-10-112;
(14) request, accept, deposit, and expend federal money in accordance with the provisions of 20-9-
603;
(15) authorize the use of federal money for the support of an interlocal cooperative agreement in
accordance with the provisions of 20-9-703 and 20-9-704;
(16) prescribe the form and contents of and approve or disapprove interstate contracts in
accordance with the provisions of 20-9-705;
(17) recommend standards of accreditation for all schools to the board of public education in
accordance with the provisions of 20-7-101;
(18) evaluate compliance with the accreditation standards and recommend accreditation status of
every school to the board of public education in accordance with the provisions of 20-7-102;
(19) collect and maintain a file of curriculum guides and assist schools with instructional programs in
accordance with the provisions of 20-7-113 and 20-7-114;
(20) establish and maintain a library of visual, aural, and other educational media in accordance
with the provisions of 20-7-201;
(21) license textbook dealers and initiate prosecution of textbook dealers violating the law in
accordance with the provisions of the textbooks part of this title;
(22) as the governing agent and executive officer of the state of Montana for K-12 career and
vocational/technical education, adopt the policies prescribed by and in accordance with the provisions of 20-7-
301;
(23) supervise and coordinate the conduct of special education in the state in accordance with the
provisions of 20-7-403;
(24) administer the traffic education program in accordance with the provisions of 20-7-502;
(25) administer the school food services program in accordance with the provisions of 20-10-201
through 20-10-203;
- 86 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(26) review school building plans and specifications in accordance with the provisions of 20-6-622;
(27) provide schools with information and technical assistance for compliance with the student
assessment rules provided for in 20-2-121 and collect and summarize the results of the student assessment for
the board of public education and the legislature;
(28) upon request and in compliance with confidentiality requirements of state and federal law,
disclose to interested parties all school district student assessment data for a test required by the board of
public education; and
(29) administer the distribution of guaranteed tax base aid in accordance with 20-9-366 through 20-
9-369 ; and
(30) (29) perform any other duty prescribed from time to time by this title, any other act of the
legislature, or the policies of the board of public education."

Section 128. Section 20-5-324, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-5-324. Tuition payment provisions -- state obligations -- district obligations -- financing --
reporting. (1) In order to be eligible to receive state reimbursement or payment under subsection (2)(a), the
trustees of a district shall report to the superintendent of public instruction by June 30 the following information
for the concluding school fiscal year:
(a) the name and district of residence of each child who attended a school of the district under a
mandatory out-of-district attendance agreement approved under the provisions of 20-5-321(1)(d) or (1)(e);
(b) the number of days of enrollment for each child reported under the provisions of subsection
(1)(a);
(c) the annual tuition rate for each child's tuition payment, as determined under the provisions of
20-5-323, and the tuition cost for each child reported under the provisions of subsection (1)(a);
(d) the names, districts of attendance, and amount of tuition paid by the district for resident
students attending public schools out of state; and
(e) the names, schools of attendance, and amount of tuition to be paid by the district for resident
students attending day-treatment programs under approved individualized education programs at private,
nonsectarian schools.
- 87 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(2) (a) Subject to the limitations of 20-5-323, the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(i) except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, pay the district of attendance the
amount of the tuition obligation reported under subsection (1)(c) of this section, prorated for the actual days of
enrollment;
(ii) determine the total per-ANB entitlement for which the district of residence would have been
eligible if the students reported in subsections (1)(d) and (1)(e) of this section had been enrolled in the resident
district in the prior year; and
(iii) reimburse the district of residence for the state portion of the per-ANB entitlement for each
student reported in subsections (1)(d) and (1)(e) of this section, not to exceed the district's actual payment of
tuition or fees for service for the student in the previous year.
(b) The district of residence for each child reported under the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this
section shall pay the district of attendance the tuition rate under 20-5-323(1) prorated for the actual days of
enrollment. The superintendent of public instruction is only responsible for any additional tuition amount
pursuant to 20-5-323(2) and (3).
(3) Whenever a child enrolls in and attends a school outside of the child's district of residence
under the provisions of 20-5-320 or 20-5-321, by July 15 following the year of attendance, the district of
attendance shall notify the district of residence of an obligation under 20-5-323.
(4) (a) (i) When a child attends a school outside the child's district of residence at the resident
district's expense under the provisions of 20-5-320 or 20-5-321 or when a child has approval to attend a day-
treatment program under an approved individualized education program at a private, nonsectarian school
located in or outside of the child's district of residence, the district of residence shall finance any tuition amount
required under 20-5-323 from the levy authorized to support the district tuition fund or from the district's general
fund or any other legally available fund in the discretion of the trustees and any transportation amount from the
levy authorized to support the transportation fund or from the district's general fund or any other legally
available fund in the discretion of the trustees.
(ii) By December 31 of the school fiscal year following the year of attendance, the district of
residence shall pay at least one-half of any tuition and transportation obligation established under subsection
(4)(a)(i). The remaining tuition and transportation obligation must be paid by June 15 of the school fiscal year
- 88 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
following the year of attendance.
(iii) In addition to use of a tuition levy to pay tuition for out-of-district attendance of a resident pupil,
a school district may also include in its tuition levy an amount necessary to pay for the full costs of providing a
free appropriate public education, as defined in 20-7-401, in the district to any child with a disability who lives in
the district. The amount of the levy imposed for the costs associated with educating each child with a disability
under this subsection (4)(a)(iii) is limited to the actual cost of service under the child's individualized education
program minus:
(A) the student's state special education payment;
(B) the student's federal special education payment;
(C) the student's per-ANB amount;
(D) the prorated portion of the district's basic entitlement for each qualifying student; and
(E) the prorated portion of the district's general fund payments in 20-9-327 through 20-9-330 for
each qualifying student.
(b) When a child has approval to attend a school outside the child's district of residence because
of a parent's or guardian's request under the provisions of 20-5-320 or 20-5-321(1)(c), the parent or guardian of
the child is responsible for transportation unless otherwise agreed to in the out-of-district attendance
agreement.
(5) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b), the district of attendance shall anticipate and credit
tuition receipts to the district general fund, to reduce the general fund net levy requirement first to the BASE
budget and any remaining to the over-BASE budget pursuant to 20-9-141, and transportation receipts to the
transportation fund. In order to provide local property tax reduction for the tuition amount received under 20-5-
323(1), the amount of the reduction in the BASE budget mills levied as a result of anticipated tuition payments
must be calculated as a final step in computing the district's general fund net BASE levy requirement pursuant
to the procedure set forth in 20-9-141(2) and the district's guaranteed tax base aid must be calculated prior to
the reduction in BASE mills.
(b) Any tuition receipts received for a pupil who is a child with a disability under 20-5-323(2) or for
a student without disabilities who requires a program with costs that exceed the average district costs under 20-
5-323(3) that exceed the tuition amount received for a pupil without disabilities must be deposited in the district
- 89 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
miscellaneous programs fund and must be used in the manner provided for in 20-9-507 to support the costs of
the program for which the tuition was received.
(6) The reimbursements paid under subsection (2)(a)(iii) must be deposited into the district tuition
fund and must be used by the district to pay obligations for resident students attending public schools out of
state or for resident students attending day-treatment programs under approved individualized education
programs at private, nonsectarian schools at district expense.
(7) The provisions of this section do not apply to out-of-state placements made by a state agency
pursuant to 20-7-422.
(8) In accordance with 5-11-210, the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to
the education interim committee on out-of-district attendance under 20-5-320 through 20-5-324 in the prior
school fiscal year. The report must include the following for each school district:
(a) the total enrollment of the district;
(b) the number of nonresident students served by the district under out-of-district attendance
agreements; and
(c) the number of resident students served by other school districts under out-of-district attendance
agreements."

Section 129. Section 20-6-326, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-6-326. Procedure for expansion of elementary school district into K-12 school district --
trustee resolution. (1) An existing elementary district that is not part of a unified school system or governed by
a joint board with a high school district may expand into a K-12 district under the procedures outlined in this
section only if the elementary district's ANB, as calculated under the provisions of 20-9-311, is at least 1,000.
(2) The expansion to a K-12 district may be requested by the trustees of an existing elementary
district through passage of a resolution that includes the information outlined in 20-6-105(3) and requests the
county superintendent to order an election to allow the electors of the elementary district to consider the
proposition of expanding the elementary school district into a K-12 district. The trustees of an existing
elementary district with an ANB of at least 1,000 may not pass a resolution for expansion more than one time
within a 5-year period.
- 90 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(3) (a) If the proposition for the expansion is approved by the electors of the elementary district and
the trustees issue a certificate of election as provided in 20-20-416, for a period of 2 years from the date of the
certification of the election the elementary trustees have the authority to propose to the electors of the
elementary district:
(i) a transition costs levy pursuant to 20-9-502; and
(ii) a general obligation bond pursuant to Title 20, chapter 9, part 4, for the purpose of building,
altering, repairing, buying, furnishing, equipping, purchasing lands for, or obtaining a water supply for a school
to accommodate high school students.
(b) The bond limitations pursuant to 20-9-406 imposed on a district proposing a bond under
subsection (3)(a) must be calculated on the limits for a K-12 district with the high school ANB calculated by
dividing the ANB of the elementary district by 9 and multiplying the result by 4.
(c) A bond approved under subsection (3)(a) becomes a bond of, and may not be issued until the
creation of, the K-12 district formed pursuant to subsection (4).
(d) A district that issues a bond under this subsection (3) is eligible for facility reimbursements and
advances pursuant to 20-9-366 through 20-9-371 that, until the new high school has enrolled students in all
grades and has established an actual ANB for budgeting purposes, must be based on an estimated high school
ANB calculated by dividing the ANB of the elementary district by 9 and multiplying the result by 4.
(e) (d) Until the county superintendent orders the creation of a new high school district and attachment
of the expanding elementary district to form a new K-12 district pursuant to subsection (4), the existing high
school district remains intact for all purposes.
(4) If elementary electors approve a bond pursuant to subsection (3), on July 1 following the
approval of the bond the county superintendent shall order the creation of a new high school district with
identical boundaries to the expanding elementary district and the immediate attachment of the expanding
elementary district to form a K-12 district. The county superintendent shall send a copy of the order to the board
of county commissioners and to the trustees of the districts affected by the creation of the district. The trustees
of the expanding elementary district must be designated as the trustees of the new K-12 district.
(5) Prior to the first school fiscal year in which the K-12 district will enroll students in a particular
high school grade, the K-12 trustees shall prepare operating budgets for the new high school according to the
- 91 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
school budgeting provisions of this title, except that:
(a) the ANB for any inaugural grades for the high school program of the K-12 district must be
estimated by the trustees and may not exceed the number resulting from dividing the highest budgeted ANB of
the elementary program in the preceding 3 fiscal years by 9 and multiplying the result by the number of grades
in which the high school will enroll students for the first time in the ensuing school year;
(b) the number of quality educators for the high school program must be estimated by the trustees
and may not exceed the number resulting from dividing the ANB estimated under subsection (5)(a) by 10;
(c) the taxable value for budgeting purposes of both the elementary and high school programs of
the K-12 district must be based on the taxable value as most recently determined by the department of
revenue;
(d) the general fund budget adopted by the trustees must be based on only the basic entitlement,
the quality educator payment, and the budget components derived from ANB counts; and
(e) the district's BASE aid for the upcoming year must be based on the general fund budget
adopted by the trustees for the upcoming school year.
(6) Until the first school year in which the K-12 school district enrolls high school students in all
grades and for a period of time not to exceed 6 years following the creation of the K-12 district:
(a) the high school district shall provide high school instruction to high school students of the K-12
district in any grades in which the K-12 district is not enrolling students;
(b) the K-12 district shall be responsible for providing transportation for its students enrolled in the
high school district pursuant to subsection (6)(a), may establish a transportation budget for this purpose, and
may receive state and county reimbursements under Title 20, chapter 10; and
(c) the K-12 district shall pay the high school district 20% of the per-ANB maximum rate
established in 20-9-306 for each of its students enrolled in the high school district with one-half of the amount
due by December 31 of the year following the year of attendance and the remainder due no later than June 15
of the year following the year of attendance. The K-12 trustees shall establish a tuition fund and levy to fund
these payments.
(7) (a) Bonded indebtedness of the high school district that is outstanding as of the date of creation
of the K-12 district must remain secured by and be the indebtedness of the original territory against which the
- 92 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
bonds of the high school district were issued and must be paid by tax levies against the original territory.
(b) Bonded indebtedness of the high school district that is issued by the high school district
following the creation of the K-12 district is secured by the territory of the high school district as of the date of
issuance of the high school district bonds and must be paid by tax levies against the territory of the high school
district. However, if bonds of the high school district were approved at a bond election conducted before the
creation of the K-12 district, all bonds of the high school district issued by the high school district under the
bond election authority must remain secured by and be the indebtedness of the territory of the high school
district as of the date the bond authority was approved by voters and must be paid by tax levies against that
territory.
(c) Bonded indebtedness of the K-12 district is secured by the territory of the K-12 district as of the
date of issuance of the K-12 district bonds and must be paid by tax levies against the territory of the K-12
district.
(d) Bonded indebtedness of the elementary district that is outstanding as of the date of creation of
the K-12 district must become upon the date of creation of the K-12 district the bonded indebtedness of the K-
12 district and must be secured by the territory of the K-12 district and paid by tax levies against the territory of
the K-12 district. The debt service on the bonds must be allocated to the elementary program of the K-12
district.
(e) Bonded indebtedness of the high school district or the K-12 district that is subsequently
affected by a later reorganization of the high school district or the K-12 district is governed by the provisions of
Title 20, chapter 6, part 4.
(8) When a K-8 district expands to a K-12 district as provided for in this section, a principal,
teacher, or other certified employee of the original high school district who has a right of tenure under Montana
law must be given preference in hiring for a vacant position in the new K-12 district for which the employee is
qualified with the required certification endorsements."

Section 130. Section 20-6-702, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-6-702. Funding for K-12 school districts. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (2)
through (6), a K-12 school district formed under the provisions of 20-6-701 is subject to the provisions of law for
- 93 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
high school districts.
(2) The number of elected trustees of the K-12 school district must be based on the classification
of the attached elementary district under the provisions of 20-3-341 and 20-3-351.
(3) Calculations for the following must be made separately for the elementary school program and
the high school program of a K-12 school district:
(a) the calculation of ANB for purposes of determining the total per-ANB entitlements must be in
accordance with the provisions of 20-9-311;
(b) the basic county tax for elementary equalization and revenue for the elementary BASE funding
program for the district must be determined in accordance with the provisions of 20-9-331, and the basic county
tax for high school equalization and revenue for the high school BASE funding program for the district must be
determined in accordance with 20-9-333 ;
(c) (b) the guaranteed tax base aid for BASE funding program purposes for a K-12 school district
must be calculated separately, using each district's guaranteed tax base ratio, as defined in 20-9-366. The the
BASE budget levy to be levied for the K-12 school district must be prorated based on the ratio of the BASE
funding program amounts for elementary school programs to the BASE funding program amounts for high
school programs. ;
(d) (c) the levy authority limits under 20-9-502(3) and the corresponding state school major
maintenance aid under 20-9-525(3) for a K-12 school district must be calculated separately for the K-12 school
district's elementary and high school programs in the same manner as those limits and aid would be calculated
if the K-12 school district consisted of a separate elementary and high school district.
(4) The retirement obligation and eligibility for retirement guaranteed tax base aid for a K-12 school
district must be calculated and funded as a high school district retirement obligation under the provisions of 20-
9-501.
(5) For the purposes of budgeting for a K-12 school district, the trustees shall adopt a single fund
for any of the budgeted or nonbudgeted funds described in 20-9-201 for the costs of operating all grades and
programs of the district.
(6) Tuition for attendance in the K-12 school district must be determined separately for high school
pupils and for elementary pupils under the provisions of 20-5-320 through 20-5-324, except that the actual
- 94 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
expenditures used for calculations in 20-5-323 must be based on an amount prorated between the elementary
and high school programs in the appropriate funds of each district in the year prior to the attachment of the
districts."

Section 131. Section 20-9-141, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-141. Computation of general fund net levy requirement by county superintendent. (1) The
county superintendent shall compute the levy requirement for each district's general fund on the basis of the
following procedure:
(a) Determine the funding required for the district's final general fund budget less the sum of direct
state aid and the special education allowable cost payment for the district by totaling:
(i) the district's nonisolated school BASE budget requirement to be met by a district levy as
provided in 20-9-303; and
(ii) any general fund budget amount adopted by the trustees of the district under the provisions of
20-9-308 and 20-9-353.
(b) Determine the money available for the reduction of the property tax on the district for the
general fund by totaling:
(i) the general fund balance reappropriated, as established under the provisions of 20-9-104;
(ii) amounts received in the last fiscal year for which revenue reporting was required for each of
the following:
(A) interest earned by the investment of general fund cash in accordance with the provisions of 20-
9-213(4); and
(B) any other revenue received during the school fiscal year that may be used to finance the
general fund, excluding any guaranteed tax base aid;
(iii) anticipated oil and natural gas production taxes;
(iv) pursuant to subsection (4), anticipated revenue from coal gross proceeds under 15-23-703;
(v) if applicable, a coal-fired generating unit closure mitigation block grant as provided in 20-9-638;
and
(vi) any portion of the increment remitted to a school district under 7-15-4286(3) or 7-15-4291 used
- 95 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
to reduce the BASE levy budget.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2), subtract the money available to reduce the
property tax required to finance the general fund that has been determined in subsection (1)(b) from any
general fund budget amount adopted by the trustees of the district, up to the BASE budget amount, to
determine the general fund BASE budget levy requirement.
(d) Determine the sum of:
(i) any amount remaining after the determination in subsection (1)(c);
(ii) any portion of the increment remitted to a school district under 7-15-4286(3) or 7-15-4291 used
to reduce the over-BASE budget levy; and
(iii) after first applying anticipated tuition revenue to the BASE budget under subsection (2)(b), any
remaining tuition payments for out-of-district pupils to be received under the provisions of 20-5-320 through 20-
5-324, except the amount of tuition received for a pupil who is a child with a disability in excess of the amount
received for a pupil without disabilities, as calculated under 20-5-323(2).
(e) Subtract the amount determined in subsection (1)(d) from any additional funding requirement to
be met by an over-BASE budget amount and a district levy as provided in 20-9-303 to determine any additional
general fund levy requirements.
(2) The county superintendent shall calculate the number of mills to be levied on the taxable
property in the district to finance the general fund levy requirement for any amount that does not exceed the
BASE budget amount for the district by:
(a) dividing the amount determined in subsection (1)(c) by the sum of:
(i) the amount of guaranteed tax base aid that the district will receive for each mill levied, as
certified by the superintendent of public instruction; and
(ii) the current total taxable valuation of the district, as certified by the department of revenue
under 15-10-202, divided by 1,000; and
(b) if applicable, subtracting the result of dividing any tuition payments for out-of-district pupils to
be received under the provisions of 20-5-320 through 20-5-324, except the amount of tuition received for a pupil
who is a child with a disability in excess of the amount received for a pupil without disabilities, as calculated
under 20-5-323(2), that are available for reduction of the district's BASE budget levy by the current total taxable
- 96 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
valuation of the district, as certified by the department of revenue under 15-10-202 divided by 1,000.
(3) The net general fund levy requirement determined in subsections (1)(c) and (1)(d) must be
reported to the county commissioners by the later of the first Tuesday in September or within 30 calendar days
after receiving certified taxable values by the county superintendent as the general fund net levy requirement
for the district, and a levy must be set by the county commissioners in accordance with 20-9-142.
(4) For each school district, the department of revenue shall calculate and report to the county
superintendent the amount of revenue anticipated for the ensuing fiscal year from revenue from coal gross
proceeds under 15-23-703."

Section 132. Section 20-9-212, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-212. Duties of county treasurer. The county treasurer of each county:
(1) must receive and shall hold all school money subject to apportionment and keep a separate
accounting of its apportionment to the several districts that are entitled to a portion of the money according to
the apportionments ordered by the county superintendent or by the superintendent of public instruction. A
separate accounting must be maintained for each county fund supported by a countywide levy for a specific,
authorized purpose, including:
(a) the basic county tax for elementary equalization;
(b) the basic county tax for high school equalization;
(c) (a) the county tax in support of the transportation schedules;
(d) (b) the county tax in support of the elementary and high school district retirement obligations; and
(e) (c) any other county tax for schools, including the community colleges, that may be authorized by
law and levied by the county commissioners.
(2) whenever requested, shall notify the county superintendent and the superintendent of public
instruction of the amount of county school money on deposit in each of the funds enumerated in subsection (1)
and the amount of any other school money subject to apportionment and apportion the county and other school
money to the districts in accordance with the apportionment ordered by the county superintendent or the
superintendent of public instruction;
(3) shall keep a separate accounting of the receipts, expenditures, and cash balances for each
- 97 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
fund;
(4) except as otherwise limited by law, shall pay all warrants properly drawn on the county or
district school money;
(5) must receive all revenue collected by and for each district and shall deposit these receipts in
the fund designated by law or by the district if a fund is not designated by law. Interest and penalties on
delinquent school taxes must be credited to the same fund and district for which the original taxes were levied.
(6) shall send all revenue received for a joint district, part of which is situated in the county, to the
county treasurer designated as the custodian of the revenue, no later than December 15 of each year and
every 3 months after that date until the end of the school fiscal year;
(7) at the direction of the trustees of a district, shall assist the district in the issuance and sale of
tax and revenue anticipation notes as provided in Title 7, chapter 6, part 11;
(8) shall register district warrants drawn on a budgeted fund in accordance with 7-6-2604 when
there is insufficient money available in all funds of the district to make payment of the warrant. Redemption of
registered warrants must be made in accordance with 7-6-2605 and 7-6-2606.
(9) when directed by the trustees of a district, shall invest the money of the district within 3 working
days of the direction;
(10) each month, shall give to the trustees of each district an itemized report for each fund
maintained by the district, showing the paid warrants, registered warrants, interest distribution, amounts and
types of revenue received, and the cash balance;
(11) shall remit promptly to the department of revenue receipts for the county tax for a vocational-
technical program within a unit of the university system when levied by the board of county commissioners
under the provisions of 20-25-439;
(12) shall invest the money received from the basic county taxes for elementary and high school
equalization, the county levy in support of the elementary and high school district retirement obligations, and
the county levy in support of the transportation schedules within 3 working days of receipt. The money must be
invested until the working day before it is required to be distributed to school districts within the county or
remitted to the state. Clerks of a school district shall provide a minimum of 30 hours' notice in advance of cash
demands to meet payrolls, claims, and electronic transfers that are in excess of $50,000, pursuant to 20-3-325.
- 98 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
If a clerk of a district fails to provide the required 30-hour notice, the county treasurer shall assess a fee equal
to any charges demanded by the state investment pool or other permissible investment manager for improperly
noticed withdrawal of funds. Permissible investments are specified in 20-9-213(4). All investment income must
be deposited, and credited proportionately, in the funds established to account for the taxes received for the
purposes specified in subsections (1)(a) through (1)(d) (1)(c).
(13) shall remit on a monthly basis to the department of revenue, as provided in 15-1-504, all county
equalization revenue received under the provisions of 20-9-331 and 20-9-333, including all interest earned, in
repayment of the state advance for county equalization prescribed in 20-9-347. Any funds in excess of a state
advance must be used as required in 20-9-331 (1)(b) and 20-9-333 (1)(b)."

Section 133. Section 20-9-306, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-306. Definitions. As used in this title, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following definitions apply:
(1) "BASE" means base amount for school equity.
(2) "BASE aid" means:
(a) direct state aid for 44.7% of the basic entitlement and 44.7% of the total per-ANB entitlement
for the general fund budget of a district;
(b) guaranteed tax base aid for an eligible district for any amount up to 35.3% of the basic
entitlement, up to 35.3% of the total per-ANB entitlement budgeted in the general fund budget of a district, and
40% of the special education allowable cost payment;
(c) (b) the total quality educator payment;
(d) (c) the total at-risk student payment;
(e) (d) the total Indian education for all payment;
(f) (e) the total American Indian achievement gap payment;
(g) (f) the total data-for-achievement payment; and
(h) (g) the special education allowable cost payment.
(3) "BASE budget" means the minimum general fund budget of a district, which includes 80% of
the basic entitlement, 80% of the total per-ANB entitlement, 100% of the total quality educator payment, 100%
- 99 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
of the total at-risk student payment, 100% of the total Indian education for all payment, 100% of the total
American Indian achievement gap payment, 100% of the total data-for-achievement payment, and 140% of the
special education allowable cost payment.
(4) "BASE budget levy" means the district levy in support of the BASE budget of a district, which
may be supplemented by guaranteed tax base aid if the district is eligible under the provisions of 20-9-366
through 20-9-369.
(5) "BASE funding program" means the state program for the equitable distribution of the state's
share of the cost of Montana's basic system of public elementary schools and high schools, through county
equalization aid as provided in 20-9-331 and 20-9-333 and state equalization aid as provided in 20-9-343, in
support of the BASE budgets of districts and special education allowable cost payments as provided in 20-9-
321.
(6) "Basic entitlement" means:
(a) for each high school district:
(i) $343,483 for fiscal year 2024 and $353,787 for each succeeding fiscal year for school districts
with an ANB of 800 or fewer; and
(ii) $343,483 for fiscal year 2024 and $353,787 for each succeeding fiscal year for school districts
with an ANB of more than 800, plus $17,175 for fiscal year 2024 and $17,690 for each succeeding fiscal year
for each additional 80 ANB over 800;
(b) for each elementary school district or K-12 district elementary program without an approved
and accredited junior high school, 7th and 8th grade program, or middle school:
(i) $57,246 for fiscal year 2024 and $58,963 for each succeeding fiscal year for school districts or
K-12 district elementary programs with an ANB of 250 or fewer; and
(ii) $57,246 for fiscal year 2024 and $58,963 for each succeeding fiscal year for school districts or
K-12 district elementary programs with an ANB of more than 250, plus $2,863 for fiscal year 2024 and $2,949
for each succeeding fiscal year for each additional 25 ANB over 250;
(c) for each elementary school district or K-12 district elementary program with an approved and
accredited junior high school, 7th and 8th grade program, or middle school:
(i) for the district's kindergarten through grade 6 elementary program:
- 100 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(A) $57,246 for fiscal year 2024 and $58,963 for each succeeding fiscal year for school districts or
K-12 district elementary programs with an ANB of 250 or fewer; and
(B) $57,246 for fiscal year 2024 and $58,963 for each succeeding fiscal year for school districts or
K-12 district elementary programs with an ANB of more than 250, plus $2,863 for fiscal year 2024 and $2,949
for each succeeding fiscal year for each additional 25 ANB over 250; and
(ii) for the district's approved and accredited junior high school, 7th and 8th grade programs, or
middle school:
(A) $114,493 for fiscal year 2024 and $117,928 for each succeeding fiscal year for school districts
or K-12 district elementary programs with combined grades 7 and 8 with an ANB of 450 or fewer; and
(B) $114,493 for fiscal year 2024 and $117,928 for each succeeding fiscal year for school districts
or K-12 district elementary programs with combined grades 7 and 8 with an ANB of more than 450, plus $5,724
for fiscal year 2024 and $5,896 for each succeeding fiscal year for each additional 45 ANB over 450.
(7) "Budget unit" means the unit for which the ANB of a district is calculated separately pursuant to
20-9-311.
(8) "Direct state aid" means 44.7% of the basic entitlement and 44.7% of the total per-ANB
entitlement for the general fund budget of a district and funded with state and county equalization aid.
(9) "Maximum general fund budget" means a district's general fund budget amount calculated from
the basic entitlement for the district, the total per-ANB entitlement for the district, the total quality educator
payment, the total at-risk student payment, the total Indian education for all payment, the total American Indian
achievement gap payment, the total data-for-achievement payment, and the greater of the district's special
education allowable cost payment multiplied by:
(a) 175%; or
(b) the ratio, expressed as a percentage, of the district's special education allowable cost
expenditures to the district's special education allowable cost payment for the fiscal year that is 2 years
previous, with a maximum allowable ratio of 200%.
(10) "Over-BASE budget levy" means the district levy in support of any general fund amount
budgeted that is above the BASE budget and within the general fund budget limits established in 20-9-308 and
calculated as provided in 20-9-141.
- 101 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(11) "Total American Indian achievement gap payment" means the payment resulting from
multiplying $235 for fiscal year 2024 and $242 for each succeeding fiscal year times the number of American
Indian students enrolled in the district as provided in 20-9-330.
(12) "Total at-risk student payment" means the payment resulting from the distribution of any funds
appropriated for the purposes of 20-9-328.
(13) "Total data-for-achievement payment" means the payment provided in 20-9-325 resulting from
multiplying $22.89 for fiscal year 2024 and $23.58 for each succeeding fiscal year by the district's ANB
calculated in accordance with 20-9-311.
(14) "Total Indian education for all payment" means the payment resulting from multiplying $23.91
for fiscal year 2024 and $24.63 for each succeeding fiscal year times the ANB of the district or $100 for each
district, whichever is greater, as provided for in 20-9-329.
(15) "Total per-ANB entitlement" means the district entitlement resulting from the following
calculations and using either the current year ANB or the 3-year ANB provided for in 20-9-311:
(a) for a high school district or a K-12 district high school program, a maximum rate of $7,840 for
fiscal year 2024 and $8,075 for each succeeding fiscal year for the first ANB, decreased at the rate of 50 cents
per ANB for each additional ANB of the district up through 800 ANB, with each ANB in excess of 800 receiving
the same amount of entitlement as the 800th ANB;
(b) for an elementary school district or a K-12 district elementary program without an approved and
accredited junior high school, 7th and 8th grade program, or middle school, a maximum rate of $6,123 for fiscal
year 2024 and $6,307 for each succeeding fiscal year for the first ANB, decreased at the rate of 20 cents per
ANB for each additional ANB of the district up through 1,000 ANB, with each ANB in excess of 1,000 receiving
the same amount of entitlement as the 1,000th ANB; and
(c) for an elementary school district or a K-12 district elementary program with an approved and
accredited junior high school, 7th and 8th grade program, or middle school, the sum of:
(i) a maximum rate of $6,123 for fiscal year 2024 and $6,307 for each succeeding fiscal year for
the first ANB for kindergarten through grade 6, decreased at the rate of 20 cents per ANB for each additional
ANB up through 1,000 ANB, with each ANB in excess of 1,000 receiving the same amount of entitlement as the
1,000th ANB; and
- 102 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(ii) a maximum rate of $7,840 for fiscal year 2024 and $8,075 for each succeeding fiscal year for
the first ANB for grades 7 and 8, decreased at the rate of 50 cents per ANB for each additional ANB for grades
7 and 8 up through 800 ANB, with each ANB in excess of 800 receiving the same amount of entitlement as the
800th ANB.
(16) "Total quality educator payment" means the payment resulting from multiplying $3,566 for fiscal
year 2024 and $3,673 for each succeeding fiscal year by the sum of:
(a) the number of full-time equivalent educators as provided in 20-9-327; and
(b) as provided in 20-9-324, for a school district meeting the legislative goal for competitive base
pay of teachers, the number of full-time equivalent teachers that were in the first 3 years of the teacher's
teaching career in the previous year.
(17) "Total special education allocation" means the state payment distributed pursuant to 20-9-321
that is the greater of the amount resulting from multiplying $293.74 for fiscal year 2024 and $302.55 for each
succeeding fiscal year by the statewide current year ANB or the amount of the previous year's total special
education allocation."

Section 134. Section 20-9-308, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-308. BASE budgets and general fund budget limits. (1) The trustees of a district shall adopt
a general fund budget that is at least equal to the BASE budget established for the district. The trustees of a
district may adopt a general fund budget up to the greater of:
(a) the current year maximum general fund budget; or
(b) the previous year's general fund budget plus any increase in direct state aid for the basic and
per-ANB entitlements and any increases in state funding of the data-for-achievement payment under 20-9-325
and in the general fund payments in 20-9-327 through 20-9-330.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), whenever the trustees of a district propose to adopt
a general fund budget that exceeds the BASE budget for the district and propose to increase the over-BASE
budget levy over the highest revenue previously authorized by the electors of the district or imposed by the
district in any of the previous 5 years to support the general fund budget, the trustees shall submit a proposition
to the electors of the district, as provided in 20-9-353.
- 103 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(b) The intent of this section is to increase the flexibility and efficiency of elected school boards
without increasing school district property taxes. In furtherance of this intent and provided that budget
limitations otherwise specified in law are not exceeded, the trustees of a district may increase the district's over-
BASE budget levy without a vote if the board of trustees reduces nonvoted property tax levies authorized by
law to be imposed by action of the trustees of the district by at least as much as the amount by which the over-
BASE budget levy is increased. The ongoing authority for any nonvoted increase in the over-BASE budget levy
imposed under this subsection (2)(b) must be decreased in future years to the extent that the trustees of the
district impose any increase in other nonvoted property tax levies.
(3) The BASE budget for the district must be financed by the following sources of revenue:
(a) state equalization aid, as provided in 20-9-343, including any guaranteed tax base aid for which
the district may be eligible, as provided in 20-9-366 through 20-9-369;
(b) county equalization aid, as provided in 20-9-331 and 20-9-333 ;
(c) (b) a district levy for support of a school not approved as an isolated school under the provisions of
20-9-302;
(d) (c) payments in support of special education programs under the provisions of 20-9-321;
(e) (d) nonlevy revenue, as provided in 20-9-141; and
(f) (e) a BASE budget levy on the taxable value of all property within the district.
(4) The over-BASE budget amount of a district must be financed by a levy on the taxable value of
all property within the district or other revenue available to the district, as provided in 20-9-141."

Section 135. Section 20-9-310, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-310. Oil and natural gas production taxes for school districts -- allocation and limits. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (5), the maximum amount of oil and natural gas production taxes that a
school district may retain is 130% of the school district's maximum budget, determined in accordance with 20-9-
308.
(2) Upon receipt of school district budget reports required under 20-9-134, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide the department of revenue with a list reporting the maximum general fund
budget for each school district.
- 104 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(3) Except as provided by 15-36-332(9), the department of revenue shall make the full quarterly
distribution of oil and natural gas production taxes as required under 15-36-332(6) until the amount distributed
reaches the limitation in subsection (1) of this section. The department of revenue shall deposit any amount
exceeding the limitation in subsection (1) in the guarantee account provided for in 20-9-622.
(4) (a) Subject to the limitation in subsection (1) and the conditions in subsection (4)(b), the
trustees shall budget and allocate the oil and natural gas production taxes anticipated by the district in any
budgeted fund at the discretion of the trustees. Oil and natural gas production taxes allocated to the district
general fund may be applied to the BASE or over-BASE portions of the general fund budget at the discretion of
the trustees.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (4)(c), if the trustees apply an amount less than 12.5% of the
total oil and natural gas production taxes received by the district in the prior school fiscal year to the district's
general fund BASE budget for the upcoming school fiscal year, then:
(i) the trustees shall levy the number of mills required to raise an amount equal to the difference
between 12.5% of the oil and natural gas production taxes received by the district in the prior school fiscal year
and the amount of oil and natural gas production taxes the trustees budget in the district's general fund BASE
budget for the upcoming school fiscal year;
(ii) the mills levied under subsection (4)(b)(i) are not eligible for the guaranteed tax base subsidy
under the provisions of 20-9-366 through 20-9-369 ; and
(iii) the general fund BASE budget levy requirement calculated in 20-9-141 must be calculated as
though the trustees budgeted 12.5% of the oil and natural gas production taxes received by the district in the
prior year and the number of mills calculated in subsection (4)(b)(i) must be added to the number of mills
calculated in 20-9-141 (2).
(c) The provisions of subsection (4)(b) do not apply to the following:
(i) a district that has a maximum general fund budget of less than $1 million;
(ii) a district whose oil and natural gas revenue combined with its adopted general fund budget
totals 105% or less of its maximum general fund budget;
(iii) a district that has a maximum general fund budget of $1 million or more and was eligible for a
significant enrollment increase payment pursuant to 20-9-166 in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal
- 105 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
year to which the provisions of this subsection (4) would otherwise apply; or
(iv) a district that has issued outstanding oil and natural gas revenue bonds. Funds received
pursuant to this section must first be applied by the district to payment of debt service obligations for oil and
natural gas revenue bonds for the next 12-month period.
(5) (a) The limit on oil and natural gas production taxes that a school district may retain under
subsection (1) must be increased for any school district that was eligible for a significant enrollment increase
payment pursuant to 20-9-166. The increase in the limit on oil and natural gas production taxes that a school
district may retain under subsection (1) applies in the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which
the district was eligible and must be calculated by multiplying $45,000 times each additional ANB used to
calculate the significant enrollment increase payment pursuant to 20-9-166, including the absorption factor
reduction.
(b) For a district in nonoperating status under 20-9-505, the maximum amount of oil and natural
gas production taxes that a school district may retain is 130% of the school district's maximum budget in the
district's most recent operating year, determined in accordance with 20-9-308.
(6) In any year in which the actual oil and natural gas production taxes received by a school district
are less than 50% of the total oil and natural gas production taxes received by the district in the prior year, the
district may transfer money from any budgeted fund to its general fund in an amount not to exceed the amount
of the shortfall."

Section 136. Section 20-9-332, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-332. Fines and penalties proceeds for elementary county equalization. All fines and
penalties collected under the provisions of this title, except those collected by a justice's court, must be paid into
the elementary county equalization fund as provided by 20-9-331 (2)(c) school equalization and property tax
reduction account provided for in 20-9-336. In order to implement this section and any other provision of law
requiring the deposit of fines in the elementary county equalization fund, a report must be made to the county
superintendent of the county, at the close of each term, by the clerk of each district court, reporting all fines
imposed and collected during the term and indicating the type of violation and the date of collection."

- 106 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
Section 137. Section 20-9-336, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-336. School equalization and property tax reduction account -- uses. (1) There is a school
equalization and property tax reduction account in the state special revenue fund. Contingent on appropriation
by the legislature, money in the account is for distribution to school districts as the second source of funding for
state equalization aid as provided in 20-9-343. At fiscal yearend, any fund balance in the account exceeding
what was appropriated must be transferred to the guarantee account established in 20-9-622 after the property
tax reductions under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The account receives revenue as described in 20-9-331, 20-9-333, and 20-9-360 [sections 44
and 89]. Prior to levying school district property taxes or countywide school property taxes authorized under this
Title 20, the county commissioners shall request funding from the school equalization and property tax
reduction account to eliminate or reduce the need for property tax levies. The state treasurer shall approve
these requests and distribute money to the counties for the following levies in priority order:
(a) school district BASE levies;
(b) countywide school retirement levies;
(c) countywide levies for school transportation;
(d) school district levies for over-schedule transportation costs;
(e) school district levies in support of the bus depreciation fund;
(f) school district levies in support of the tuition fund;
(g) school district levies in support of the building reserve fund;
(h) school district levies in support of the general fund over-BASE budget;
(i) school district levies in support of the adult education fund; and
(j) school district levies in support of the technology acquisition and depreciation fund.
(3) Beginning in fiscal year 2025, each December the superintendent of public instruction shall
forecast the amount of revenue the account will receive in that fiscal year by dividing the sum of the taxable
value of all property in the state reported by the department of revenue pursuant to 20-9-369 by 1,000 to
determine a statewide value mill and then multiplying that amount by 95 mills, or the number of mills calculated
by the department of revenue under 15-10-420 (8) for the applicable fiscal year. If the forecasted amount differs
from the amount determined through the same calculation in the prior fiscal year by $2 million or more and is:
- 107 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(a) less, then the superintendent shall:
(i) decrease the multiplier used to calculate the statewide elementary and high school guaranteed
tax base ratios used for funding BASE budgets under 20-9-366 to the nearest whole number determined by the
superintendent to result in a decrease in the amount of guaranteed tax base aid distributed to eligible school
districts equal to 85% of the decrease in the calculated amount between the 2 years; and
(ii) decrease the multiplier used to calculate the statewide elementary and high school mill value
per ANB for school retirement guaranteed tax base purposes under 20-9-366 to the nearest whole number
determined by the superintendent to result in a decrease in the amount of retirement guaranteed tax base aid
distributed to eligible school districts equal to 15% of the decrease in the calculated amount between the 2
years;
(b) more, then the superintendent shall increase the multipliers used in the guaranteed tax base
formulas under 20-9-366 and in the formula for school major maintenance aid under 20-9-525 to the nearest
whole number by an amount calculated by the superintendent to result in an increase in the amount of
guaranteed tax base aid and school major maintenance aid distributed to eligible counties and school districts
equal to 55% of the increase in the calculated amount between the 2 years in the following order, with any
amount exceeding the caps under subsections (3)(b)(i) through (3)(b)(iii) flowing to the next mechanism:
(i) first, the multiplier used in calculating the statewide mill value per elementary and high school
ANB for retirement purposes, not to exceed 305%;
(ii) second, the multiplier used in calculating the amount of state school major maintenance aid
support for each dollar of local effort, not to exceed 365%; and
(iii) third, the multiplier used in calculating the facility guaranteed mill value per ANB for school
facility entitlement guaranteed tax base purposes, not to exceed 300%.
(4) (a) The adjustments to the multipliers under subsection (3) are applicable to state equalization
aid distributions in the fiscal year following the adjustment.
(b) Adjustments to the multipliers made under subsection (3) remain in effect in subsequent years
unless further changed under 20-9-366 or subsection (3) of this section or as otherwise provided by law."

Section 138. Section 20-9-343, MCA, is amended to read:
- 108 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
"20-9-343. Definition of and revenue for state equalization aid. (1) As used in this title, the term
"state equalization aid" means revenue as required in this section for distribution to the public schools for
guaranteed tax base aid, BASE aid, and state debt service assistance.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction may spend throughout the biennium funds
appropriated for the purposes of guaranteed tax base aid, BASE aid for the BASE funding program, and state
debt service assistance.
(3) The following money must be paid into the guarantee account provided for in 20-9-622 for the
public schools of the state as indicated:
(a) subject to 20-9-516(2)(a), interest and income money described in 20-9-341 and 20-9-342; and
(b) investment income earned by investing interest and income money described in 20-9-341 and
20-9-342."

Section 139. Section 20-9-344, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-344. Duties of board of public education for distribution of BASE aid. (1) The board of
public education shall administer and distribute the BASE aid and state advances for county equalization in the
manner and with the powers and duties provided by law. The board of public education:
(a) shall adopt policies for regulating the distribution of BASE aid and state advances for county
equalization in accordance with the provisions of law;
(b) may require reports from the county superintendents, county treasurers, and trustees that it
considers necessary; and
(c) shall order the superintendent of public instruction to distribute the BASE aid on the basis of
each district's annual entitlement to the aid as established by the superintendent of public instruction. In
ordering the distribution of BASE aid, the board of public education may not increase or decrease the BASE aid
distribution to any district on account of any difference that may occur during the school fiscal year between
budgeted and actual receipts from any other source of school revenue.
(2) The board of public education may order the superintendent of public instruction to withhold
distribution of BASE aid from a district when the district fails to:
(a) submit reports or budgets as required by law or rules adopted by the board of public education;
- 109 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
or
(b) maintain accredited status because of failure to meet the board of public education's assurance
and performance standards.
(3) Prior to any proposed order by the board of public education to withhold distribution of BASE
aid or county equalization money, the district is entitled to a contested case hearing before the board of public
education, as provided under the Montana Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) If a district or county receives more BASE aid than it is entitled to, the county treasurer shall
return the overpayment to the state upon the request of the superintendent of public instruction in the manner
prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction.
(5) Except as provided in 20-9-347(2), the BASE aid payment must be distributed according to the
following schedule:
(a) from August to November of the school fiscal year, to each district 10% of:
(i) direct state aid;
(ii) the total quality educator payment;
(iii) the total at-risk student payment;
(iv) the total Indian education for all payment;
(v) the total American Indian achievement gap payment; and
(vi) the total data-for-achievement payment;
(b) from January to April of the school fiscal year, to each district 10% of:
(i) direct state aid;
(ii) the total quality educator payment;
(iii) the total at-risk student payment;
(iv) the total Indian education for all payment;
(v) the total American Indian achievement gap payment; and
(vi) the total data-for-achievement payment;
(c) in December of the school fiscal year, one-half of the guaranteed tax base aid payment to each
district or county that has submitted a final budget to the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with
the provisions of 20-9-134 ;
- 110 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(d) in May of the school fiscal year, the remainder of the guaranteed tax base aid payment to each
district or county; and
(e) (c) in June of the school fiscal year, the remaining payment to each district of direct state aid, the
total quality educator payment, the total at-risk student payment, the total Indian education for all payment, the
total American Indian achievement gap payment, and the total data-for-achievement payment.
(6) The distribution provided for in subsection (5) must occur by the last working day of each
month."

Section 140. Section 20-9-346, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-346. Duties of superintendent of public instruction for state and county equalization aid
distribution. The superintendent of public instruction shall administer the distribution of the state and county
equalization aid by:
(1) establishing the annual entitlement of each district and county to state and county equalization
aid, based on the data reported in the retirement, general fund, and debt service fund budgets for each district
that have been adopted for the current school fiscal year and verified by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(2) for the purposes of state advances and reimbursements for school facilities, limiting the
distribution to no more than the amount appropriated for the school fiscal year to the districts that are eligible
under the provisions of 20-9-366 through 20-9-371 by:
(a) determining the debt service payment obligation in each district for debt service on bonds that
were sold as provided in 20-9-370 (3) that qualify for a state advance or reimbursement for school facilities
under the provisions of 20-9-366 through 20-9-369 and 20-9-370 ;
(b) based on the limitation of state equalization aid appropriated for debt service purposes,
determining the state advance for school facilities and the proportionate share of state reimbursement for
school facilities that each eligible district must receive for the school fiscal year; and
(c) distributing that amount by May 31 of each school fiscal year to each eligible district for
reducing the property tax for the debt service fund for the ensuing school fiscal year;
(3) (2) distributing by electronic transfer the BASE aid and state advances for county equalization, for
- 111 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
each district or county entitled to the aid, to the county treasurer of the respective county for county equalization
or to the county treasurer of the county where the district is located or to the investment account identified by
the applicable district for BASE aid, in accordance with the distribution ordered by the board of public
education;
(4) (3) keeping a record of the full and complete data concerning money available for state
equalization aid, state advances for county equalization, and the entitlements for BASE aid of the districts of the
state;
(5) (4) reporting to the board of public education the estimated amount that will be available for state
equalization aid; and
(6) (5) reporting to the office of budget and program planning, as provided in 17-7-111:
(a) the figures and data available concerning distributions of state and county equalization aid
during the preceding 2 school fiscal years;
(b) the amount of state equalization aid then available;
(c) the apportionment made of the available money but not yet distributed;
(d) the latest estimate of accruals of money available for state equalization aid; and
(e) the amount of state advances and repayment for county equalization."

Section 141. Section 20-9-347, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-347. Distribution of BASE aid and special education allowable cost payments in support
of BASE funding program -- exceptions. (1) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) supply the county treasurer and the county superintendent with a monthly report of the
payment of BASE aid in support of the BASE funding program of each district of the county;
(b) in the manner described in 20-9-344, provide for a state advance to each county in an amount
that is no less than the amount anticipated to be raised for the elementary and high school county equalization
funds as provided in 20-9-331 and 20-9-333 ; and
(c) adopt rules to implement the provisions of subsection (1)(b).
(2) (a) The superintendent of public instruction is authorized to adjust the schedule prescribed in
20-9-344 for distribution of the BASE aid payments if the distribution will cause a district to register warrants
- 112 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
under the provisions of 20-9-212(8).
(b) To qualify for an adjustment in the payment schedule, a district shall demonstrate to the
superintendent of public instruction, in the manner required by the office, that the payment schedule prescribed
in 20-9-344 will result in insufficient money available in all funds of the district to make payment of the district's
warrants. The county treasurer shall confirm the anticipated deficit. This section may not be construed to
authorize the superintendent of public instruction to exceed a district's annual payment for BASE aid.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) distribute special education allowable cost payments to districts; and
(b) supply the county treasurer and the county superintendent of schools with a report of payments
for special education allowable costs to districts of the county."

Section 142. Section 20-9-351, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-351. Funding of deficiency in BASE aid. If the money available for BASE aid is not the result
of a reduction in spending under 17-7-140 and is not sufficient to provide the guaranteed tax base aid required
under 20-9-366 through 20-9-369 and BASE aid support determined under 20-9-347, the superintendent of
public instruction shall request the budget director to submit a request for a supplemental appropriation in the
second year of the biennium that is sufficient to complete the funding of BASE aid for the elementary and high
school districts for the current biennium."

Section 143. Section 20-9-406, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-406. Limitations on amount of bond issue -- definition of federal impact aid basic support
payment -- oil and natural gas payment. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsection (1)(c), the maximum
amount for which an elementary district or a high school district may become indebted by the issuance of
general obligation bonds, including all indebtedness represented by outstanding general obligation bonds of
previous issues, registered warrants, outstanding obligations under 20-9-471, oil and natural gas revenue
bonds to which a deficiency tax levy is pledged, and any other loans or notes payable that are held as general
obligations of the district, is 100% of the taxable value of the property subject to taxation, as ascertained by the
last assessment for state, county, and school taxes previous to the incurring of the indebtedness.
- 113 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(b) Except as provided in subsection (1)(c), the maximum amount for which a K-12 school district,
as formed pursuant to 20-6-701, may become indebted by the issuance of general obligation bonds, including
all indebtedness represented by outstanding general obligation bonds of previous issues, registered warrants,
outstanding obligations under 20-9-471, oil and natural gas revenue bonds to which a deficiency tax levy is
pledged, and any other loans or notes payable that are held as general obligations of the district, regardless of
whether the general obligation bonds finance elementary program improvements or high school program
improvements, is the sum of 100% of the taxable value of the property in its elementary program subject to
taxation and 100% of the taxable value of the property in its high school program subject to taxation, as
ascertained by the last assessment for state, county, and school taxes previous to the incurring of the
indebtedness.
(c) (i) Unless the maximum amount calculated under subsection (1)(a) yields a greater amount,
the maximum amount for which an elementary district or a high school district with a district mill value per
elementary ANB or per high school ANB that is less than the facility guaranteed mill value per elementary ANB
or high school ANB under 20-9-366 may become indebted by the issuance of general obligation bonds,
including all indebtedness represented by outstanding general obligation bonds of previous issues, registered
warrants, outstanding obligations under 20-9-471, oil and natural gas revenue bonds to which a deficiency tax
levy is pledged, and any other loans or notes payable that are held as general obligations of the district, is the
corresponding facility guaranteed mill value per ANB times 1,000 times the ANB of the district. For a K-12
district, unless the maximum amount calculated under subsection (1)(b) yields a greater amount, the maximum
amount for which the district may become indebted is the sum of the facility guaranteed mill value per
elementary ANB times 1,000 times the elementary ANB of the district and the facility guaranteed mill value per
high school ANB times 1,000 times the high school ANB of the district. For the purpose of calculating ANB
under this subsection, a district may use the greater of the current year ANB or the 3-year ANB calculated
under 20-9-311.
(ii) If mutually agreed upon by the affected districts, for the purpose of calculating its maximum
bonded indebtedness under this subsection (1)(c), a district may include the ANB of the district plus the number
of students residing within the district for which the district or county pays tuition for attendance at a school in
an adjacent district. The receiving district may not use out-of-district ANB for the purpose of calculating its
- 114 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
maximum indebtedness if the out-of-district ANB has been included in the ANB of the sending district pursuant
to the mutual agreement. For the purpose of calculating ANB under this subsection, a district may use the
greater of the current year ANB or the 3-year ANB calculated under 20-9-311.
(2) The maximum amounts determined in subsection (1) do not pertain to indebtedness imposed
by special improvement district obligations or assessments against the school district or to general obligation
bonds issued for the repayment of tax protests lost by the district. All general obligation bonds issued in excess
of the amount are void, except as provided in this section.
(3) The maximum amount of impact aid revenue bonds that an elementary district, high school
district, or K-12 school district may issue may not exceed a total aggregate amount equal to three times the
average of the school district's annual federal impact aid basic support payments for the 5 years immediately
preceding the issuance of the bonds. However, at the time of issuance of the bonds, the average annual
payment of principal of and interest on the impact aid bonds each year may not exceed 35% of the total federal
impact aid basic support payments of the school district for the current year.
(4) The maximum amount of oil and natural gas revenue bonds that an elementary district, high
school district, or K-12 school district may issue may not exceed a total aggregate amount equal to three times
the average of the school district's annual oil and natural gas production taxes received pursuant to 15-36-331,
15-36-332, and 20-9-310 for the 2 fiscal years immediately preceding the issuance of the bonds. At the time of
the issuance of the bonds, the average annual payment of principal of and interest on the oil and natural gas
revenue bonds each year may not exceed 35% of the total oil and natural gas production taxes received by the
school district under the limitations in 20-9-310 for the immediately preceding fiscal year. If the oil and natural
gas revenue bonds are also secured by a deficiency tax levy as provided in 20-9-437, the debt limitation
provided in subsection (1) of this section applies to the bonds.
(5) When the total indebtedness of a school district has reached the limitations prescribed in this
section, the school district may pay all reasonable and necessary expenses of the school district on a cash
basis in accordance with the financial administration provisions of this chapter.
(6) Whenever bonds are issued for the purpose of refunding bonds, any money to the credit of the
debt service fund for the payment of the bonds to be refunded is applied toward the payment of the bonds and
the refunding bond issue is decreased accordingly.
- 115 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(7) As used in this part, "federal impact aid basic support payment" means the annual impact aid
revenue received by a district under 20 U.S.C. 7703(b) but excludes revenue received for impact aid special
education under 20 U.S.C. 7703(d) and impact aid construction under 20 U.S.C. 7707."

Section 144. Section 20-9-408, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-408. Definition of forms of bonds. As used in this part, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Amortization bond" means that form of bond on which a part of the principal is required to be
paid each time that interest becomes due and payable. The part payment of principal increases with each
following installment in the same amount that the interest payment decreases, so that the combined amount
payable on principal and interest is the same on each payment date. However, the payment on the initial
interest payment date may be less or greater than the amount of other payments on the bond, reflecting the
payment of interest only or the payment of interest for a period different from that between other interest
payment dates. The final payment may vary from prior payments in amount as a result of rounding prior
payments.
(2) "General obligation bonds" means bonds that pledge the full faith and credit and the taxing
power of a school district.
(3) "Impact aid revenue bonds" means bonds that pledge and are payable solely from federal
impact aid basic support payments received and deposited to the credit of the fund established in 20-9-514.
(4) "Oil and natural gas revenue bonds" means bonds that pledge and are payable from a first lien
on oil and natural gas production taxes received by a school district pursuant to 20-9-310. Oil and natural gas
revenue bonds to which a tax deficiency is pledged are not considered general obligation bonds that are eligible
to receive guaranteed tax base aid pursuant to 20-9-367 but are to be considered in determining the debt limit
of a school district for the purposes of 20-9-406.
(5) "Serial bonds" means a bond issue payable in annual installments of principal commencing not
more than 2 years from the date of issue, any one installment consisting of one or more bonds, with the
principal amount of bonds maturing or subject to mandatory sinking fund redemption in each installment,
commencing with the installment payable in the fourth year after the date of issue, not exceeding three times
the principal amount of the bonds payable in the immediately preceding installment."
- 116 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1

Section 145. Section 20-9-422, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-422. Additional requirements for trustees' resolution calling bond election. (1) In addition
to the requirements for calling an election that are prescribed in 20-20-201 and 20-20-203, the trustees'
resolution calling a school district bond election must:
(a) specify whether the bonds will be general obligation bonds, oil and natural gas revenue bonds,
or impact aid revenue bonds and, if oil and natural gas revenue bonds, whether a tax deficiency is pledged to
the repayment of the bonds;
(b) fix the exact amount of the bonds proposed to be issued, which may be more or less than the
amounts estimated in a petition;
(c) fix the maximum number of years in which the proposed bonds would be paid;
(d) in the case of initiation by a petition, state the essential facts about the petition and its
presentation; and
(e) state the amount of the state advance for school facilities estimated, pursuant to subsection (2),
to be received by the district in the first school fiscal year in which a debt service payment would be due on the
proposed bonds.
(2) Prior to the adoption of the resolution calling for a school bond election for a general obligation
bond, the trustees of a district may request from the superintendent of public instruction a statement of the
estimated amount of state advance for school facilities that the district will receive for debt service payments on
the proposed general obligation bonds in the first school fiscal year in which a debt service payment is due. The
district shall provide the superintendent with an estimate of the debt service payment due in the first school
fiscal year. The superintendent shall estimate the state advance for the general obligation bond issue pursuant
to 20-9-371 (2)."

Section 146. Section 20-9-439, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-439. Computation of net levy requirement for general obligation bonds -- procedure
when levy inadequate. Subject to 20-6-326, the following provisions apply:
(1) The county superintendent shall compute the levy requirement for each school district's general
- 117 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
obligation debt service fund on the basis of the following procedure:
(a) Determine the total money available in the debt service fund for the reduction of the property
tax on the district by totaling:
(i) the end-of-the-year fund balance in the debt service fund, less any limited operating reserve as
provided in 20-9-438;
(ii) anticipated interest to be earned by the investment of debt service cash in accordance with the
provisions of 20-9-213(4) or by the investment of bond proceeds under the provisions of 20-9-435;
(iii) any state advance for school facilities distributed to a qualified district under the provisions of
20-9-346, 20-9-370, and 20-9-371 ;
(iv) (iii) funds transferred from the impact aid fund established pursuant to 20-9-514 that are authorized
by 20-9-437(2) to be used to repay the district's bonds; and
(v) (iv) any other money, including money from federal sources, anticipated by the trustees to be
available in the debt service fund during the ensuing school fiscal year from sources such as legally authorized
money transfers into the debt service fund or from rental income, excluding any guaranteed tax base aid.
(b) Subtract the total amount available to reduce the property tax, determined in subsection (1)(a),
from the final budget for the debt service fund as established in 20-9-438.
(2) The net debt service fund levy requirement determined in subsection (1)(b) must be reported to
the county commissioners by the later of the first Tuesday in September or within 30 calendar days after
receiving certified taxable values by the county superintendent as the net debt service fund levy requirement for
the district, and a levy must be made by the county commissioners in accordance with 20-9-142.
(3) If the board of county commissioners fails in any school fiscal year to make a levy for any issue
or series of bonds of a school district sufficient to raise the money necessary for payment of interest and
principal becoming due during the next ensuing school fiscal year, in any amounts established under the
provisions of this section, the holder of any bond of the issue or series or any taxpayer of the district may apply
to the district court of the county in which the school district is located for a writ of mandate to compel the board
of county commissioners of the county to make a sufficient levy for payment purposes. If, upon the hearing of
the application, it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the board of county commissioners of the county
has failed to make a levy or has made a levy that is insufficient to raise the amount required to be raised as
- 118 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
established in the manner provided in this section, the court shall determine the amount of the deficiency and
shall issue a writ of mandate directed to and requiring the board of county commissioners, at the next meeting
for the purpose of fixing tax levies for county purposes, to fix and make a levy against all taxable property in the
school district that is sufficient to raise the amount of the deficiency. The levy is in addition to any levy required
to be made at that time for the ensuing school fiscal year. Any costs that may be allowed or awarded the
petitioner in the proceeding must be paid by the members of the board of county commissioners and may not
be a charge against the school district or the county."

Section 147. Section 20-9-501, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-501. Retirement costs and retirement fund. (1) The trustees of a district or the management
board of a cooperative employing personnel who are members of the teachers' retirement system or the public
employees' retirement system, who are covered by unemployment insurance, or who are covered by any
federal social security system requiring employer contributions shall establish a retirement fund for the
purposes of budgeting and paying the employer's contributions to the systems as provided in subsection (2)(a).
The district's or the cooperative's contribution for each employee who is a member of the teachers' retirement
system must be calculated in accordance with Title 19, chapter 20, part 6. The district's or the cooperative's
contribution for each employee who is a member of the public employees' retirement system must be calculated
in accordance with 19-3-316. The district's or the cooperative's contributions for each employee covered by any
federal social security system must be paid in accordance with federal law and regulation. The district's or the
cooperative's contribution for each employee who is covered by unemployment insurance must be paid in
accordance with Title 39, chapter 51, part 11.
(2) (a) The district or the cooperative shall pay the employer's contributions to the retirement,
federal social security, and unemployment insurance systems from the retirement fund for the following:
(i) a district employee whose salary and health-related benefits, if any health-related benefits are
provided to the employee, are paid from state or local funding sources;
(ii) a cooperative employee whose salary and health-related benefits, if any health-related benefits
are provided to the employee, are paid from the cooperative's interlocal cooperative fund if the fund is
supported solely from districts' general funds and state special education allowable cost payments, pursuant to
- 119 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
20-9-321, or are paid from the miscellaneous programs fund, provided for in 20-9-507, from money received
from the medicaid program, pursuant to 53-6-101;
(iii) a district employee whose salary and health-related benefits, if any health-related benefits are
provided to the employee, are paid from the district's school food services fund provided for in 20-10-204; and
(iv) a district employee whose salary and health-related benefits, if any health-related benefits are
provided to the employee, are paid from the district impact aid fund, pursuant to 20-9-514.
(b) For an employee whose benefits are not paid from the retirement fund, the district or the
cooperative shall pay the employer's contributions to the retirement, federal social security, and unemployment
insurance systems from the funding source that pays the employee's salary.
(3) The trustees of a district required to make a contribution to a system referred to in subsection
(1) shall include in the retirement fund of the final budget the estimated amount of the employer's contribution.
After the final retirement fund budget has been adopted, the trustees shall pay the employer contributions to the
systems in accordance with the financial administration provisions of this title.
(4) When the final retirement fund budget has been adopted, the county superintendent shall
establish the levy requirement by:
(a) determining the sum of the money available to reduce the retirement fund levy requirement by
adding:
(i) any anticipated money that may be realized in the retirement fund during the ensuing school
fiscal year;
(ii) oil and natural gas production taxes;
(iii) coal gross proceeds taxes under 15-23-703;
(iv) any fund balance available for reappropriation as determined by subtracting the amount of the
end-of-the-year fund balance earmarked as the retirement fund operating reserve for the ensuing school fiscal
year by the trustees from the end-of-the-year fund balance in the retirement fund. The retirement fund operating
reserve may not be more than 20% of the final retirement fund budget for the ensuing school fiscal year and
must be used for the purpose of paying retirement fund warrants issued by the district under the final retirement
fund budget.
(v) any other revenue anticipated that may be realized in the retirement fund during the ensuing
- 120 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
school fiscal year, excluding any guaranteed tax base aid;
(b) notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (9), subtracting the money available for reduction
of the levy requirement, as determined in subsection (4)(a), from the budgeted amount for expenditures in the
final retirement fund budget.
(5) The county superintendent shall:
(a) total the net retirement fund levy requirements separately for all elementary school districts, all
high school districts, and all community college districts of the county, including any prorated joint district or
special education cooperative agreement levy requirements; and
(b) report each levy requirement to the county commissioners by the later of the first Tuesday in
September or within 30 calendar days after receiving certified taxable values as the respective county levy
requirements for elementary district, high school district, and community college district retirement funds.
(6) The county commissioners shall fix and set the county levy or district levy in accordance with
20-9-142.
(7) The net retirement fund levy requirement for a joint elementary district or a joint high school
district must be prorated to each county in which a part of the district is located in the same proportion as the
district ANB of the joint district is distributed by pupil residence in each county. The county superintendents of
the counties affected shall jointly determine the net retirement fund levy requirement for each county as
provided in 20-9-151.
(8) The net retirement fund levy requirement for districts that are members of special education
cooperative agreements must be prorated to each county in which the district is located in the same proportion
as the special education cooperative budget is prorated to the member school districts. The county
superintendents of the counties affected shall jointly determine the net retirement fund levy requirement for
each county in the same manner as provided in 20-9-151, and the county commissioners shall fix and levy the
net retirement fund levy for each county in the same manner as provided in 20-9-152.
(9) The county superintendent shall calculate the number of mills to be levied on the taxable
property in the county to finance the retirement fund net levy requirement by dividing the amount determined in
subsection (5)(a) by the sum of:
(a) the amount of guaranteed tax base aid that the county will receive for each mill levied, as
- 121 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
certified by the superintendent of public instruction; and
(b) the taxable valuation of the district divided by 1,000.
(10) The levy for a community college district may be applied only to property within the district.
(11) The county superintendent of each county shall submit a report of the revenue amounts used
to establish the levy requirements for county school funds supporting elementary and high school district
retirement obligations to the superintendent of public instruction on or before September 15. The report must be
completed on forms supplied by the superintendent of public instruction."

Section 148. Section 20-9-516, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-516. School facility and technology account. (1) There is a school facility and technology
account in the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102. The purpose of the account is to provide,
contingent on appropriation from the legislature, funding for the following in priority order:
(a) school technology purposes as provided in 20-9-534; and
(b) state debt service assistance as provided in 20-9-371.
(2) There must be deposited in the account:
(a) an amount of money equal to the income attributable to the difference between the average
sale value of 18 million board feet and the total income produced from the annual timber harvest on common
school trust lands during the fiscal year; and
(b) the income received from certain lands and riverbeds as provided in 17-3-1003(5).
(3) If in any fiscal year the amount of revenue in the school facility and technology account is
sufficient to fund debt service assistance without a proration reduction pursuant to 20-9-346 (2)(b) and if in that
same fiscal year the amount of revenue available in the school major maintenance aid account established in
20-9-525 will result in a proration reduction in school major maintenance aid pursuant to 20-9-525(5) for that
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer any excess funds in the school facility and technology account to
the school major maintenance aid account not to exceed the amount required to avoid a proration reduction."

Section 149. Section 20-9-525, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-525. School major maintenance aid account -- formula. (1) There is a school major
- 122 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
maintenance aid account in the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102.
(2) The purpose of the account is to provide, contingent on appropriation from the legislature,
funding for school major maintenance aid as provided in subsection (3) for school facility projects, including the
payment of principal and interest on obligations issued pursuant to 20-9-471 for school facility projects, that
support a basic system of free quality public elementary and secondary schools under 20-9-309, including but
not limited to:
(a) improvements to school and student safety and security as described in 20-9-236(1); and
(b) projects designed to produce operational efficiencies such as utility savings, reduced future
maintenance costs, improved utilization of staff, and enhanced learning environments for students, including
but not limited to projects addressing:
(i) roofing systems;
(ii) heating, air-conditioning, and ventilation systems;
(iii) energy-efficient window and door systems and insulation;
(iv) plumbing systems;
(v) electrical systems and lighting systems;
(vi) information technology infrastructure, including internet connectivity both within and to the
school facility; and
(vii) other critical repairs to an existing school facility or facilities.
(3) (a) In any year in which the legislature has appropriated funds for distribution from the school
major maintenance aid account, the superintendent of public instruction shall administer the distribution of
school major maintenance aid from the school major maintenance aid account for deposit in the subfund of the
building reserve fund provided for in 20-9-502(3)(e). Subject to proration under subsection (5) of this section,
aid must be annually distributed no later than the last working day of May to a school district imposing a levy
pursuant to 20-9-502(3) in the current school fiscal year, with the amount of state support per dollar of local
effort of the applicable elementary and high school program of each district determined as follows:
(i) using the taxable valuation most recently determined by the department of revenue under 20-9-
369:
(A) divide the total statewide taxable valuation by the statewide total of school major maintenance
- 123 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
amounts and, subject to adjustment under 20-9-336, multiply the result by 187%;
(B) multiply the result determined under subsection (3)(a)(i)(A) by the district's school major
maintenance amount;
(C) subtract the district's taxable valuation from the amount determined under subsection
(3)(a)(i)(B); and
(D) divide the amount determined under subsection (3)(a)(i)(C) by 1,000;
(ii) determine the greater of the amount determined in subsection (3)(a)(i) or 18% of the district's
mill value;
(iii) multiply the result determined under subsection (3)(a)(ii) by the district's school major
maintenance amount, then divide the product by the sum of the result determined under subsection (3)(a)(ii)
and the district's mill value; and
(iv) divide the result determined under subsection (3)(a)(iii) by the difference resulting from
subtracting the result determined under subsection (3)(a)(iii) from the district's school major maintenance
amount.
(b) For a district with an adopted general fund budget in the prior year greater than or equal to
97% of the district's general fund maximum budget in the prior year, the amount determined in subsection
(3)(a)(iv) rounded to the nearest cent is the amount of school major maintenance aid per dollar of local effort,
not to exceed an amount that would result in the state aid composing more than 80% of the district's school
major maintenance amount.
(c) For a district with an adopted general fund budget in the prior year less than 97% of the
district's maximum budget in the prior year, multiply the amount determined in subsection (3)(a)(iv) by the ratio
of the district's adopted general fund budget in the prior year to the district's maximum general fund budget in
the prior year. The result, rounded to the nearest cent, is the amount of state school major maintenance aid per
dollar of local effort, not to exceed an amount that would result in the state aid composing more than 80% of the
district's school major maintenance amount.
(4) Using the taxable valuation most recently determined by the department of revenue under 20-
9-369, the superintendent shall provide school districts with a preliminary estimated amount of state school
major maintenance aid per dollar of local effort for the ensuing school year no later than March 1 and a final
- 124 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
amount for the current school year no later than July 31.
(5) If the appropriation from or the available funds in the school major maintenance aid account in
any school fiscal year are less than the amount for which school districts would otherwise qualify, the
superintendent of public instruction shall proportionally prorate the aid distributed to ensure that the distributions
do not exceed the appropriated or available funds.
(6) If in any fiscal year the amount of revenue in the school major maintenance aid account is
sufficient to fund school major maintenance aid without a proration reduction pursuant to subsection (5) and if in
that same fiscal year the amount of revenue available in the school facility and technology account established
in 20-9-516 will result in a proration reduction in debt service assistance pursuant to 20-9-346 (2)(b) for that
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer any excess funds in the school major maintenance aid account to
the school facility and technology account, not to exceed the amount required to avoid a proration reduction.
(7) (6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Local effort" means an amount of money raised by levying no more than 10 mills pursuant to
20-9-502(3) and, provided that 10 mills have been levied, any additional amount of money deposited or
transferred by trustees to the subfund pursuant to 20-9-502(3).
(b) "School major maintenance amount" means the sum of $15,000 and the product of $110
multiplied by the district's budgeted ANB for the prior fiscal year."

Section 150. Section 90-6-304, MCA, is amended to read:
"90-6-304. (Temporary) Accounts established. (1) There is within the state custodial fund type a
hard-rock mining impact account. Money is payable into this account from payments made by a mining
developer in compliance with the written guarantee from the developer to meet the increased costs of public
services and facilities as specified in the impact plan provided for in 90-6-307. The state treasurer shall draw
warrants from this account upon order of the board.
(2) There is within the state special revenue fund a hard-rock mining impact trust account. Within
this trust account, there is established a reserve amount not to exceed $100,000.
(a) Money within the hard-rock mining impact trust account may be used:
(i) for the administrative and operating expenses of the board, as provided by 90-6-303(4);
- 125 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(ii) to establish and maintain the reserve amount; and
(iii) for distribution to the counties of origin, as provided by 90-6-331 and this section.
(b) Money within the hard-rock mining impact trust account may be used for the administrative and
operating expenses of the board if:
(i) the revenue provided under 15-37-117(1)(b) is less than the amount appropriated for the
administrative and operating expenses of the board; or
(ii) the use of the reserve amount of revenue is necessary to allow the board to meet its quasi-
judicial responsibilities under 90-6-307, 90-6-311, or 90-6-403(3) (2).
(3) Money is payable into the hard-rock mining impact trust account under the provisions of 15-37-
117. After first deducting the administrative and operating expenses of the board, as provided in 90-6-303, and
then establishing and maintaining the reserve amount of $100,000, as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the remaining money must be segregated within the account by county of origin. (Terminates June 30, 2027--
sec. 1, Ch. 213, L. 2017.)
90-6-304. (Effective July 1, 2027) Accounts established. (1) There is within the state custodial fund
type a hard-rock mining impact account. Money is payable into this account from payments made by a mining
developer in compliance with the written guarantee from the developer to meet the increased costs of public
services and facilities as specified in the impact plan provided for in 90-6-307. The state treasurer shall draw
warrants from this account upon order of the board.
(2) There is within the state special revenue fund a hard-rock mining impact trust account. Within
this trust account, there is established a reserve amount not to exceed $100,000.
(a) Money within the hard-rock mining impact trust account may be used:
(i) for the administrative and operating expenses of the board, as provided by 90-6-303(4);
(ii) to establish and maintain the reserve amount; and
(iii) for distribution to the counties of origin, as provided by 90-6-331 and this section.
(b) Money within the hard-rock mining impact trust account may be used for the administrative and
operating expenses of the board if:
(i) the revenue provided under 15-37-117(1)(b) is less than the amount appropriated for the
administrative and operating expenses of the board; or
- 126 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
(ii) the use of the reserve amount of revenue is necessary to allow the board to meet its quasi-
judicial responsibilities under 90-6-307, 90-6-311, or 90-6-403(3) (2).
(3) Money is payable into the hard-rock mining impact trust account under the provisions of 15-37-
117. After first deducting the administrative and operating expenses of the board, as provided in 90-6-303, and
then establishing and maintaining the reserve amount of $100,000, as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the remaining money must be segregated within the account by county of origin. The state treasurer shall draw
warrants from this account upon order of the board."

Section 151. Section 90-6-305, MCA, is amended to read:
"90-6-305. Hard-rock mining impact board -- general powers. (1) The board may:
(a) retain professional staff, including its administrative staff, and retain consultants and advisers,
notwithstanding the provisions of 2-15-121;
(b) adopt rules governing its proceedings, determinations, and administration of this part;
(c) make payments to local government units from money paid to the hard-rock mining impact
account as provided in 90-6-307;
(d) make determinations as provided in 90-6-307, 90-6-311, and 90-6-403(3) (2); and
(e) accept grants and other funds to be used in carrying out this part.
(2) The provisions of the Montana Administrative Procedure Act apply to the proceedings and
determinations of the board."

Section 152. Section 90-6-309, MCA, is amended to read:
"90-6-309. Tax prepayment -- large-scale mineral development. (1) After permission to commence
operation is granted by the appropriate governmental agency and upon request of the governing body of a
county in which a facility is to be located, a person intending to construct or locate a large-scale mineral
development in this state shall prepay property taxes as specified in the impact plan. This prepayment must
exclude the 6-mill university levy established under 15-10-109 and may exclude the mandatory county levies for
the school BASE funding program established in 20-9-331 and 20-9-333.
(2) The person who is to prepay under this section is not obligated to prepay the entire amount
- 127 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
established in subsection (1) at one time. Upon request of the governing body of an affected local government
unit, the person shall prepay the amount shown to be needed from time to time as determined by the board.
(3) The person who is to prepay shall guarantee to the hard-rock mining impact board, through an
appropriate financial institution, as may be required by the board, that property tax prepayments will be paid as
needed for expenditures created by the impacts of the large-scale mineral development.
(4) When the mineral development facilities are completed and assessed by the department of
revenue, they are subject during the first 3 years and thereafter to taxation as all other property similarly
situated, except that in each year after the start of production, the local government unit that received a
property tax prepayment shall provide for repayment of prepaid property taxes in accordance with subsection
(5).
(5) A local government unit that received all or a portion of the property tax prepayment under this
section shall provide for tax crediting as specified in the impact plan. The tax credit allowed in any year may
not, however, exceed the tax obligation of the developer for that year, and the time period for tax crediting is
limited to the productive life of the mining operation."

Section 153. Section 90-6-403, MCA, is amended to read:
"90-6-403. Jurisdictional revenue disparity -- conditioned exemption and reallocation of certain
taxable valuation. (1) When an impact plan for a large-scale mineral development approved pursuant to 90-6-
307 identifies a jurisdictional revenue disparity, the board shall promptly notify the developer, all affected local
government units, and the department of revenue of the disparity. Except as provided in 90-6-404 and this
section, the increase in taxable valuation of the mineral development that occurs after the issuance and
validation of a permit under 82-4-335 is not subject to the usual application of county and school district
property tax mill levies. This increase in taxable valuation must be allocated to local government units as
provided in 90-6-404. The increase in taxable valuation allocated as provided in 90-6-404 is subject to 15-10-
420 and the application of property tax mill levies in the local government unit to which it is allocated. The
increase in taxable valuation allocated to the local government unit is considered newly taxable property in the
recipient local government unit as provided in 15-10-420.
(2) Subject to 15-10-420, the total taxable valuation of a large-scale mineral development remains
- 128 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1
subject to the statewide mill levies and basic county levies for elementary and high school BASE funding
programs as provided in 20-9-331 and 20-9-333.
(3) (2) The provisions of subsection (1) remain in effect until the large-scale mineral development
ceases operations or until the existence of the jurisdictional revenue disparity ceases, as determined by the
board."

NEW SECTION. Section 154. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are
repealed:
20-9-331. Basic county tax for elementary equalization and other revenue for county equalization of
elementary BASE funding program.
20-9-333. Basic county tax for high school equalization and other revenue for county equalization of high
school BASE funding program.
20-9-336. School equalization and property tax reduction account -- uses.
20-9-360. State equalization aid levy.
20-9-361. County equalization revenue.
20-9-366. Definitions.
20-9-367. Eligibility to receive guaranteed tax base aid or state debt service assistance for school
facilities.
20-9-368. Amount of guaranteed tax base aid.
20-9-369. Duties of superintendent of public instruction and department of revenue.
20-9-370. Definitions.
20-9-371. Calculation and uses of school facility entitlement amount.

NEW SECTION. Section 155. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 116] are intended to be
codified as a new chapter in Title 15, and the provisions of Title 15 apply to [sections 1 through 116].

NEW SECTION. Section 156. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].
- 129 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558

69th Legislature SB 558.1

NEW SECTION. Section 157. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 158. Effective dates. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), [this act] is
effective January 1, 2026.
(2) [Sections 117 through 154] are effective July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 159. Applicability. [Sections 1 through 116] apply to tax years beginning
after December 31, 2025.
- END -
- 130 - Authorized Print Version – SB 558